Utah, session 2026, SB153.
Section 1. Section 10-2-602 is amended to read:10-2-602Effective 05/25/26. Contents of resolution or petition.(1)The resolution of the governing body or the petition of the electors shall include:(a)a statement fully describing each of the areas to be included within the consolidated municipality;(b)the name of the proposed consolidated municipality; and(c)the names of the municipalities to be consolidated.(2)(a)The resolution or petition shall state the population of each of the municipalities within the area of the proposed consolidated municipality and the total population of the proposed consolidated municipality.(b)The population for each municipality under Subsection (2)(a) shall be derived from:(i)the estimate of the Utah Population Committee created in Section 63C-20-103; or(ii) if the Utah Population Committee estimate is not available, the most recent official census or census estimate of the United States Bureau of the Census.(3)The first page of a petition described in this section shall include the following statement in at least the same size type as the majority of the other statements on the page:"WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record."

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 10-2-701.5 is amended to read:10-2-701.5Effective 05/25/26. Form of petition.A petition for municipal disincorporation shall substantially comply with, and be circulated in, the following form:        PETITION FOR MUNICIPAL DISINCORPORATIONTo the Honorable District Court of ____ County, Utah:We, the undersigned citizens and legal voters of the State of Utah, and residents of ____ City, Utah, respectfully petition the Court to submit a proposal to disincorporate ____ City, Utah, to the legal voters resident within said city for their approval or rejection at a special election ordered held by the court for that purpose; and each signator for himself or herself says: I have personally signed this petition; I am a legal voter of the State of Utah; I am a resident of ____ City, Utah, and my residence and post office address are correctly written after my name.WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 10-2a-208 is amended to read:10-2a-208Effective 05/25/26. Petition for incorporation -- Requirements and form -- Removal of signature.(1)At any time within one year after the day on which the county clerk completes the public hearings required under Section 10-2a-207, individuals within the proposed municipality may proceed with the incorporation process by circulating, and submitting to the county clerk, a petition for incorporation that, to be certified under Subsection 10-2a-209(1)(b)(i), is required to be signed by: (a)10% of all registered voters within the area proposed to be incorporated as a municipality,  as of the day on which the petition for incorporation is filed;(b)if the petition for incorporation proposes the incorporation of a city, and subject to Subsection (5), 10% of all registered voters within 90% of the voting precincts within the area proposed to be incorporated as a city, as of the day on which the petition for incorporation is filed; and(c)the owners of private real property that:(i)is located within the proposed municipality;(ii)covers at least 10% of the total private land area within the proposed municipality; and(iii)on January 1 of the current year, was equal in assessed fair market value to at least 7% of the assessed fair market value of all private real property within the proposed municipality.(2)The petition for incorporation shall:(a)include the typed or printed name and current residence address of each voter who signs the petition for incorporation;(b)describe the area proposed to be incorporated as a municipality, as described in the feasibility request or the modified feasibility request that complies with Subsection 10-2a-205(5)(a);(c)state the proposed name for the proposed municipality;(d)designate five signers of the petition for incorporation as petition sponsors, one of whom is designated as the contact sponsor, with the mailing address and telephone number of each;(e)if the sponsors propose the incorporation of a city, state that the signers of the petition for incorporation appoint the sponsors, if the incorporation measure passes, to represent the signers in:(i)selecting the number of commission or council members the new city will have; and(ii)drawing district boundaries for the election of council members, if the voters decide to elect council members by district;(f)be accompanied by and circulated with an accurate plat or map, prepared by a licensed surveyor, showing the boundaries of the proposed municipality; and(g)substantially comply with and be circulated in the following form:PETITION FOR INCORPORATION OF (insert the proposed name of the proposed municipality)To the Honorable Lieutenant Governor and the [name of county legislative body]:We, the undersigned registered voters within the area described in this petition for incorporation, respectfully petition the lieutenant governor and the county legislative body to submit to the registered voters residing within the area described in this petition for incorporation, at the next regular general election, the question of whether the area should incorporate as a municipality.  Each of the undersigned affirms that each has personally signed this petition for incorporation and is a registered voter who resides within the described area, and that the current residence address of each is correctly written after the signer's name.  WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record.The area proposed to be incorporated as a municipality is described as follows:[insert an accurate description of the area proposed to be incorporated].(3)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), a valid signature on a feasibility request described in Section 10-2a-202 or a modified feasibility request described in Section 10-2a-206 may be used toward fulfilling the signature requirement described in Subsection (1) if the feasibility request notified the signer in conspicuous language that the signature, unless removed, would also be used for a petition for incorporation under this section.(b)A signature described in Subsection (3)(a) may not be used toward fulfilling the signature requirement described in Subsection (1) if the signer files with the county clerk a written statement requesting removal of the signature before the petition for incorporation is filed with the county clerk under this section.(4)(a)A voter who signs a petition for incorporation may have the voter's signature removed from the petition by, no later than three business days after the day on which the petition for incorporation is submitted to the county clerk, submitting to the county clerk a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed.(b)A statement described in Subsection (4)(a) shall comply with the requirements described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(2).(c)The county clerk shall use the procedures described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(3) to determine whether to remove an individual's signature from a petition for incorporation after receiving a timely, valid statement requesting removal of the signature.(5)(a)A signature does not qualify under Subsection (1)(b) if the signature is gathered from a voting precinct that:(i)except in a proposed municipality that will be a city of the fifth class, is not located entirely within the boundaries of a proposed city; or(ii)includes less than 50 registered voters.(b)A voting precinct that is not located entirely within the boundaries of the proposed city does not qualify as a voting precinct under Subsection (1)(b).

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 17-60-302 is amended to read:17-60-302Effective 05/25/26. Initiating a petition to move a county seat -- Certification of petition signatures -- Removal of signature -- Limitation.(1)(a)A voter may file a petition to move the county seat with the county legislative body of the county in which the voter lives if the petition is signed by a majority of registered voters in the county, calculated by the number of votes cast in the county at the preceding general election.(b)The first page of a petition described in this section shall include the following statement in at least the same size type as the majority of the other statements on the page:"WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record."(b)(c)If the county legislative body receives a petition that complies with this section, the county legislative body shall submit the question of moving the county seat to the county's voters at the next general election.(2)(a)Within three business days after the day on which a county legislative body receives a petition under Subsection (1), the county legislative body shall provide the petition to the county clerk.(b)Within 14 days after the day on which a county clerk receives a petition from the county legislative body under Subsection (2)(a), the county clerk shall:(i)use the procedures described in Section 20A-1-1002 to determine whether the petition satisfies the requirements of Subsection (1);(ii)certify on the petition whether each name is that of a registered voter in the county; and(iii)deliver the certified petition to the county legislative body.(3)(a)An individual who signs a petition under this section may have the individual's signature removed from the petition by, no later than three business days after the day on which the county legislative body provides the petition to the county clerk, submitting to the county clerk a statement requesting that the individual's signature be removed.(b)A statement described in Subsection (3)(a) shall comply with the requirements described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(2).(c)The county clerk shall use the procedures described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(3) to determine whether to remove an individual's signature from a petition after receiving a timely, valid statement requesting removal of the signature.(4)The election shall be conducted and the returns canvassed in all respects as provided by law for the conducting of general elections and canvassing the returns.  (5)In accordance with Utah Constitution, Article XI, Section 2, a proposition to move the county seat may not be submitted in the same county more than once in four years, or within four years after the day on which a proposition to move the county seat is submitted to the voters.

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 17-61-201 is amended to read:17-61-201Effective 05/25/26. Consolidation of counties -- Petition -- Certification of petition signatures -- Removal of signature -- Election -- Ballot.(1)(a)A voter of a county who desires to have the county joined to and consolidated with an adjoining county may petition the county legislative body of the county in which the voter resides and the county legislative body of the adjoining county, as described in this section.(b)The first page of a petition described in this section shall include the following statement in at least the same size type as the majority of the other statements on the page:"WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record."(2)Each petition under Subsection (1) shall be:(a)signed by a majority of the voters who reside in the originating county;(b)signed by a majority of the voters who reside in the consolidating county; and(c) presented to the county legislative body of the originating county and the county legislative body of the consolidating county before the first Monday in June of any year.(3)(a)Within three business days after the day on which a county legislative body receives a petition under Subsection (1), the county legislative body shall provide the petition to the county clerk.(b)Within 14 days after the day on which a county clerk receives a petition from the county legislative body under Subsection (3)(a), the county clerk shall:(i)use the procedures described in Section 20A-1-1002 to determine whether the petition satisfies the requirements of Subsection (2) in regard to the voters of the county in which the county clerk is an officer;(ii)certify on the petition whether each name is that of a registered voter in the county in which the county clerk is an officer; and(iii)deliver the certified petition to the county legislative body.(4)(a)An individual who signs a petition under this section may have the individual's signature removed from the petition by, no later than three business days after the day on which the county legislative body provides the petition to the county clerk, submitting to the county clerk a statement requesting that the individual's signature be removed.(b)A statement described in Subsection (4)(a) shall comply with the requirements described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(2).(c)The county clerk shall use the procedures described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(3) to determine whether to remove an individual's signature from a petition after receiving a timely, valid statement requesting removal of the signature.(5)If the county clerks of the originating county and consolidating county each determine that the petition meets the requirements of Subsection (2)(a), each county clerk shall ensure that the petition is submitted to the voters of the respective counties as described in Subsection (6).(6)(a)If a petition under Subsection (1) is presented in a year during which a regular general election is held, the county legislative body of the originating county and the county legislative body of the consolidating county shall cause the proposition to be submitted to the legal voters of the respective counties at the next regular general election.(b)If a petition under Subsection (1) is presented during a year in which there is no regular general election, the county legislative body of the originating county and the county legislative body of the consolidating county shall:(i)call a special election to be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November following the presentation of the petition; and(ii)cause the proposition to be submitted to the voters of the respective counties during the special election.(c)Except as otherwise provided in this part, an election under this Subsection (6) shall be held, the results canvassed, and returns made under the provisions of the general election laws of the state.(d)The ballot language to be used at an election under this Subsection (6) shall be:For combining ____ county with ____ county.Against combining ____ county with ____ county.

Section 6:
Section 6. Section 17-61-301 is amended to read:17-61-301Effective 05/25/26. Annexation of portion of county to adjoining county -- Petition -- Certification of petition signatures -- Removal of signature -- Election -- Ballot.(1)(a)Except as provided in Section 17-61-306, a voter who desires to have initiating county territory in which the voter resides included within the boundary of an adjoining county, the voter may petition the county legislative body of the initiating county and the county legislative body of the annexing county.(b)The first page of a petition described in this section shall include the following statement in at least the same size type as the majority of the other statements on the page:"WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record."(2)A petition under Subsection (1) shall be:(a)signed by a majority of the voters living in the portion of the initiating county proposed to be included within the boundaries of an annexing county; and (b)presented before the first Monday in June of a year during which a general election is held.(3)(a)Within three business days after the day on which a county legislative body receives a petition under Subsection (1), the county legislative body shall provide the petition to the county clerk.(b)Within 14 days after the day on which a county clerk of an initiating county receives a petition from the county legislative body under Subsection (3)(a), the county clerk shall:(i)use the procedures described in Section 20A-1-1002 to determine whether the petition satisfies the requirements of Subsection (2);(ii)certify on the petition whether each name is that of a voter in the portion of the initiating county that is proposed to be annexed; and(iii)deliver the certified petition to the county legislative body.(4)(a)An individual who signs a petition under this section may have the individual's signature removed from the petition by, no later than three business days after the day on which the county legislative body provides the petition to the county clerk, submitting to the county clerk a statement requesting that the individual's signature be removed.(b)A statement described in Subsection (4)(a) shall comply with the requirements described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(2).(c)The county clerk shall use the procedures described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(3) to determine whether to remove an individual's signature from a petition after receiving a timely, valid statement requesting removal of the signature.(5)(a)If the county clerk of the initiating county determines that the petition meets the requirements of Subsection (2), the county clerk of the initiating county and the county clerk of the annexing county shall ensure the petition is submitted to the voters of the respective counties at the next regular general election as described in this Subsection (5). (b)Except as otherwise provided, the election shall be held, the results canvassed, and returns made under the provisions of the general election laws of the state.(c)The ballot language to be used in an election held under this Subsection (5) shall be:For annexing a portion of ____ county to ____ county.Against annexing a portion of ____ county to ____ county.

Section 7:
Section 7. Section 17-61-401 is amended to read:17-61-401Effective 05/25/26. Creating a new county -- Petition -- Certification of petition signatures -- Removal of signature -- Election -- Ballots.(1)(a)Whenever a voter desires to have the territory within which the voter resides created into a new county, the voter may file a petition for the creation of a new county with the county legislative body of the seceding county in which the voter resides as described in this section.  (b)The first page of a petition described in this section shall include the following statement in at least the same size type as the majority of the other statements on the page:"WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record."(2)(a)The petition described in Subsection (1) shall: (i)propose the name and define the boundaries of the new county; and(ii)be signed: (A)by at least one-fourth of the voters residing in the portion of the seceding county proposed to be created into a new county; and (B)by no less than one-fourth of the voters residing in the remaining portion of the seceding county.(b)  If a petition proposes to take territory from more than one seceding county, the requirements of Subsection (2)(a)(ii) apply to each seceding county affected by the petition.(3)A voter shall file a petition for the creation of a new county on or before the first Monday in May of any year with the county legislative body of the seceding county.(4)(a)Within three business days after the day on which a county legislative body receives a petition, the county legislative body shall provide the petition to the county clerk.(b)Within 14 days after the day on which a county clerk receives a petition from the county legislative body under Subsection (4)(a), the county clerk shall:(i)use the procedures described in Section 20A-1-1002 to determine whether the petition satisfies the requirements of Subsection (2);(ii)certify on the petition whether each name is that of a registered voter in the seceding county; and(iii)deliver the certified petition to the county legislative body.(5)(a)An individual who signs a petition under this section may have the individual's signature removed from the petition by, no later than three business days after the day on which the county legislative body provides the petition to the county clerk, submitting to the county clerk a statement requesting that the individual's signature be removed.(b)A statement described in Subsection (5)(a) shall comply with the requirements described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(2).(c)The county clerk shall use the procedures described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(3) to determine whether to remove an individual's signature from a petition after receiving a timely, valid statement requesting removal of the signature.(6)The seceding county legislative body shall cause the proposition to be submitted to the voters residing in the seceding county at a special election to be held according to the dates established in Section 20A-1-204, first causing 30 days' notice of the election to be given in the manner provided by law for giving notice of general elections.  (7)The county clerk shall ensure that the special election is held, the result canvassed, and returns made under the provisions of the general election laws.  (8)The form of ballot to be used at the special election shall be:For the creation of (supplying the name proposed) county.Against the creation of (supplying the name proposed) county.(9)(a)Subject to Subsection (9)(b), the expenses of any special election described in this section shall be paid out of the general fund of the seceding county.(b)If the voters approve the creation of the new county, the new county shall reimburse the seceding county for half of the cost of the special election within one year of the effective date of the new county from the general fund of the new county.

Section 8:
Section 8. Section 17-62-303 is amended to read:17-62-303Effective 05/25/26. Registered voter initiation of adoption of optional plan -- Certification of petition signatures -- Removal of signature -- Procedure.(1)(a)Registered voters of a county may initiate the process of adopting an optional plan by filing with the county clerk a notice of intent to gather signatures for a petition:(i)for the establishment of a study committee described in Section 17-62-402; or(ii)to adopt an optional plan that:(A)accompanies the petition during the signature gathering process and accompanies the petition in the submission to the county clerk under Subsection (2)(b); and(B)complies with the requirements described in Sections 17-62-403 and 17-62-404.(b)A notice of intent described in Subsection (1)(a) shall:(i)designate five sponsors for the petition;(ii)designate a contact sponsor to serve as the primary contact for the petition sponsors;(iii)list the mailing address and telephone number of each of the sponsors; and(iv)be signed by each of the petition sponsors.(c)Registered voters of a county may not file a notice of intent to gather signatures in bad faith.(d)The first page of a petition described in this section shall include the following statement in at least the same size type as the majority of the other statements on the page:"WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record."(2)(a)The sponsors of a petition may circulate the petition after filing a notice of intent to gather signatures under Subsection (1).(b)(i)Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b)(ii), the petition is valid if the petition contains the number of legal signatures required under Subsection 20A-7-501(2).(ii)For a county of the fifth or sixth class, the petition is valid if the petition contains at least the number of legal signatures equal to 30% of the number of active voters, as defined in Section 20A-7-501, in the county.(iii)The county clerk may not count a signature that was collected for the petition before the petition sponsors filed a notice of intent under Subsection (1)(a).(iv)Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an individual may not sign a petition circulated under this section by electronic signature as defined in Section 20A-1-202.(c)Except as provided in Subsection (4)(b)(ii), the sponsors of the petition shall submit the completed petition and any amended or supplemental petition described in Subsection (4) with the county clerk not more than 180 days after the day on which the sponsors file the notice described in Subsection (1).(d)(i)Within 30 days after the day on which the sponsors submit a petition, the sponsors shall submit financial disclosures to the county clerk that include:(A)a list of each contribution received by the sponsors and the name of the donor; and(B)a list of each expenditure for purposes of furthering or sponsoring the petition and the recipient of each expenditure.(ii)The county clerk shall publish the financial disclosures described in Subsection (2)(d)(i).(iii)All sponsors of a petition shall date and sign each list described in Subsection (2)(d)(i).(3)Within 30 days after the day on which the sponsors submit a petition under Subsection (2)(c) or an amended or supplemental petition under Subsection (4), the county clerk shall:(a)(i)use the procedures described in Section 20A-1-1002 to determine whether a signer is a registered voter; and(ii)determine whether the petition or amended or supplemental petition has been signed by the required number of registered voters;(b)(i)if the petition was signed by a sufficient number of registered voters:(A)certify the petition;(B)deliver the petition to the county legislative body and county executive; and(C)notify the contact sponsor in writing of the certification; or(ii)if the petition was not signed by a sufficient number of registered voters:(A)reject the petition; and(B)notify the county legislative body and the contact sponsor in writing of the rejection and the reasons for the rejection; and(c)for a petition described in Subsection (1)(a)(ii), no later than 10 days after the day on which the county clerk certifies the petition under Subsection (3)(b)(i), the county clerk shall send a copy of the optional plan that accompanied the petition to the county attorney for review in accordance with Section 17-62-405.(4)The sponsors of a petition circulated under this section may submit supplemental signatures for the petition:(a)if the county clerk rejects the petition under Subsection (3)(b)(ii); and(b)before the earlier of:(i)the deadline described in Subsection (2)(c); or(ii)20 days after the day on which the county clerk rejects the petition under Subsection (3)(b)(ii).(5)With the unanimous approval of petition sponsors, a petition filed under this section may be withdrawn at any time within 90 days after the day on which the county clerk certifies the petition under Subsection (3)(b)(i) and no later than 45 days before an election under Section 17-62-501 if the petition included a notification to petition signers, in conspicuous language and in a conspicuous location, that the petition sponsors are authorized to withdraw the petition.(6)(a)A voter who signs a petition under this section may have the voter's signature removed from the petition by, no later than three business days after the day on which the sponsors submit the petition to the county clerk, submitting to the county clerk a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed.(b)A statement described in Subsection (6)(a) shall comply with the requirements described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(2).(c)The county clerk shall use the procedures described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(3) to determine whether to remove an individual's signature from a petition after receiving a timely, valid statement requesting removal of the signature.

Section 9:
Section 9. Section 17-62-505 is amended to read:17-62-505Effective 05/25/26. Repeal of optional plan -- Certification of petition signatures -- Removal of signature.(1)An optional plan that the voters in an election adopt under this chapter may be repealed as provided in this section.(2)Registered voters of a county that has adopted an optional plan may initiate the process of repealing an optional plan by filing a petition for the repeal of the optional plan.(3)(a)Registered voters of a county may not file a petition to repeal an optional plan sooner than four years or more than five years after the election of county officers under Section 17-62-503.(b)(i)If the registered voters file a petition to repeal an optional plan under this section, the petition is certified, and the optional plan is not repealed at an election described in Subsection (9), the voters may not circulate or file a subsequent petition to repeal until at least four, and not more than five, years after the certification of the original petition.(ii)If, after four years, the voters file a subsequent petition under Subsection (3)(b)(i), the voters:(A)may not circulate or file another petition to repeal until at least four, and not more than five, years after certification of the subsequent petition; and(B)shall wait an additional four, and not more than five, years after the date of certification of the previous petition for each petition filed thereafter.(4)A petition described in Subsection (2) shall:(a)be signed by registered voters residing in the county:(i)equal in number to at least 15% of the total number of votes cast in each precinct described in Subsection (4)(a)(ii) for all candidates for president of the United States at the most recent election in which a president of the United States was elected; and(ii)who represent at least 85% of the voting precincts located within the county;(b)designate up to five of the petition signers as sponsors, designating one petition signer as the contact sponsor, with the mailing address and telephone number of each; and(c)include the following statement on the first page of the petition in at least the same size type as the majority of the other statements on the page:"WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record."; and(c)(d)be filed in the office of the clerk of the county in which the petition signers reside.(5)Within 30 days after the filing of a petition under Subsection (2) or an amended petition under Subsection (6), the county clerk shall:(a)(i)use the procedures described in Section 20A-1-1002 to determine whether a signer is a registered voter; and(ii)determine whether the required number of voters have signed the petition or amended petition has been signed by the required number of registered voters; and(b)(i)if a sufficient number of voters have signed the petition, certify the petition or amended petition and deliver it to the county legislative body, and notify in writing the contact sponsor of the certification; or(ii)if a sufficient number of voters have not signed the petition, reject the petition or the amended petition and notify the county legislative body and the contact sponsor in writing of the rejection and the reasons for the rejection.(6)If a county clerk rejects a petition or an amended petition under Subsection (5)(b)(ii), the petition may be amended or an amended petition may be further amended with additional signatures and refiled within 20 days of the date of rejection.(7)(a)A voter who signs a petition under this section may have the voter's signature removed from the petition by, no later than three business days after the day on which the sponsors file the petition in the office of the county clerk, submitting to the county clerk a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed.(b)A statement described in Subsection (7)(a) shall comply with the requirements described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(2).(c)The county clerk shall use the procedures described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(3) to determine whether to remove an individual's signature from a petition after receiving a timely, valid statement requesting removal of the signature.(8)If a county clerk certifies a petition under Subsection (2), the county legislative body shall hold an election on the proposal to repeal the optional plan at the next regular general election that is at least 60 days after the day on which the county clerk certifies the petition.(9)If, at an election held under Subsection (8), a majority of voters voting on the proposal to repeal the optional plan vote in favor of repealing:(a)the optional plan is repealed, effective January 1 of the year following the election of county officers under Subsection (9)(c);(b)upon the effective date of the repeal under Subsection (9)(a), the form of government under which the county operates reverts to the form it had before the optional plan was adopted; and(c)the county officers under the form of government to which the county reverts, who are different than the county officers under the repealed optional plan, shall be elected at the next regular general election following the election under Subsection (8).

Section 10:
Section 10. Section 17B-1-205 is amended to read:17B-1-205Effective 05/25/26. Petition and request requirements -- Removal or reinstatement of signature.(1)Each petition and request shall:(a)indicate the typed or printed name and current residence address of each property owner, groundwater right owner, or registered voter signing the petition;(b)(i)if it is a property owner request or petition, indicate the address of the property as to which the owner is signing the request or petition; or(ii)if it is a groundwater right owner request or petition, indicate the location of the diversion of the groundwater as to which the owner is signing the groundwater right owner request or petition;(c)describe the entire area of the proposed special district;(d)be accompanied by a map showing the boundaries of the entire proposed special district;(e)specify the service proposed to be provided by the proposed special district;(f)if the petition or request proposes the creation of a specialized special district, specify the type of specialized special district proposed to be created;(g)for a proposed basic special district:(i)state whether the members of the board of trustees will be elected or appointed or whether some members will be elected and some appointed, as provided in Section 17B-1-1402;(ii)if one or more members will be elected, state the basis upon which each elected member will be elected; and(iii)if applicable, explain how the election or appointment of board members will transition from one method to another based on stated milestones or events, as provided in Section 17B-1-1402;(h)for a proposed improvement district whose remaining area members or county members, as those terms are defined in Section 17B-2a-404, are to be elected, state that those members will be elected; (i)for a proposed service area that is entirely within the unincorporated area of a single county, state whether the initial board of trustees will be:(i)the county legislative body;(ii)appointed as provided in Section 17B-1-304; or(iii)elected as provided in Section 17B-1-306;(j)designate up to five signers of the petition or request as sponsors, one of whom shall be designated as the contact sponsor, with the mailing address and telephone number of each;(k)if the petition or request is a groundwater right owner petition or request proposing the creation of a special district to acquire a groundwater right under Section 17B-1-202, explain the anticipated method:(i)of paying for the groundwater right acquisition; and(ii)of addressing blowing dust created by the reduced use of water; (l)if the petition or request is a groundwater right owner petition or request proposing the creation of a special district to assess a groundwater right under Section 17B-1-202, explain the anticipated method:(i)of assessing the groundwater right and securing payment of the assessment; and(ii)of addressing blowing dust created by the reduced use of water; and(m)for a proposed infrastructure financing district:(i)state whether the members of the board of trustees will be elected or appointed or whether some members will be elected and some appointed;(ii)if one or more members will be elected, state the basis upon which each elected member will be elected;(iii)explain how appointed board member positions will transition to elected board member positions based on stated milestones or events, as provided in Section 17B-2a-1303;(iv)state whether divisions will be established within the boundary of the infrastructure financing district so that some or all board members represent a division rather than the district at large and, if so, describe the boundary of each division; and(v)if applicable, be accompanied by the governing document prepared according to Section 17B-2a-1303.(2)The first page of a petition described in this section shall include the following statement in at least the same size type as the majority of the other statements on the page:"WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record."(2)(3)(a)Subject to Subsection (2)(b)(3)(b), a signer of a request or petition may remove or, once removed, reinstate the signer's signature at any time before the filing of the request or petition by filing a written statement for removal or reinstatement with:(i)in the case of a request:(A)the clerk of the county or the clerk or recorder of the municipality in whose applicable area the signer's property is located, if the request is a property owner request;(B)the clerk of the county or the clerk or recorder of the municipality in whose applicable area the signer's groundwater diversion point is located, if the request is a groundwater right owner request; or(C)the clerk of the county or the clerk or recorder of the municipality in whose applicable area the signer resides, if the request is a registered voter request; or(ii)in the case of a petition, the responsible clerk.(b)The time for a signer of a petition for the creation of an infrastructure financing district to remove or reinstate the signer's signature is any time before the petition is certified under Section 17B-1-209.(3)(4)(a)A clerk of the county who receives a timely, valid written statement for removal or reinstatement from a signer of a registered voter request or registered voter petition shall use the procedures described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(3) to determine whether to remove or reinstate the individual's signature.(b)If a municipal clerk or recorder receives a timely, valid written statement for removal or reinstatement from a signer of a registered voter request or registered voter petition, the clerk of the municipality's county shall assist the municipal clerk or recorder with determining whether to remove or reinstate the individual's signature using the procedures described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(3).

Section 11:
Section 11. Section 17B-1-506 is amended to read:17B-1-506Effective 05/25/26. Withdrawal petition requirements -- Removal or reinstatement of signature.(1)Each petition under Section 17B-1-504 shall:(a)indicate the typed or printed name and current address of each owner of acre-feet of water, property owner, registered voter, or authorized representative of the governing body signing the petition;(b)separately group signatures by municipality and, in the case of unincorporated areas, by county;(c)if it is a petition signed by the owners of land, the assessment of which is based on acre-feet of water, indicate the address of the property and the property tax identification parcel number of the property as to which the owner is signing the request;(d)designate up to three signers of the petition as sponsors, or in the case of a petition filed under Subsection 17B-1-504(1)(a)(iv), designate a governmental representative as a sponsor, and in each case, designate one sponsor as the contact sponsor with the mailing address and telephone number of each;(e)state the reasons for withdrawal; and(f)when the petition is filed with the special district board of trustees, be accompanied by a map generally depicting the boundaries of the area proposed to be withdrawn and a legal description of the area proposed to be withdrawn.; and(g)include the following statement on the first page of the petition in at least the same size type as the majority of the other statements on the page:"WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record."(2)(a)The special district may prepare an itemized list of expenses, other than attorney expenses, that will necessarily be incurred by the special district in the withdrawal proceeding.  The itemized list of expenses may be submitted to the contact sponsor.  If the list of expenses is submitted to the contact sponsor within 21 days after receipt of the petition, the contact sponsor on behalf of the petitioners shall be required to pay the expenses to the special district within 90 days of receipt.  Until funds to cover the expenses are delivered to the special district, the district will have no obligation to proceed with the withdrawal and the time limits on the district stated in this part will be tolled.  If the expenses are not paid within the 90 days, or within 90 days from the conclusion of any arbitration under Subsection (2)(b), the petition requesting the withdrawal shall be considered to have been withdrawn.(b)If there is no agreement between the board of trustees of the special district and the contact sponsor on the amount of expenses that will necessarily be incurred by the special district in the withdrawal proceeding, either the board of trustees or the contact sponsor may submit the matter to binding arbitration in accordance with Title 78B, Chapter 6, Part 2, Alternative Dispute Resolution Act;, provided that, if the parties cannot agree upon an arbitrator and the rules and procedures that will control the arbitration, either party may pursue arbitration under Title 78B, Chapter 11, Utah Uniform Arbitration Act.(3)(a)A signer of a petition may remove or, once removed, reinstate the signer's signature at any time before the public hearing under Section 17B-1-508 by submitting a written statement requesting removal or reinstatement with the board of trustees of the special district in which the area proposed to be withdrawn is located.(b)A statement described in Subsection (3)(a) shall comply with the requirements described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(2).(c)As applicable and using the procedures described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(3), the county clerk shall assist the board of trustees to determine whether to remove or reinstate a registered voter's signature after the voter submits a timely, valid statement described in Subsection (3)(a).(4)If it reasonably appears that, if the withdrawal which is the subject of a petition filed under Subsection 17B-1-504(1)(a)(i) or (ii) is granted, it will be necessary for a municipality to provide to the withdrawn area the service previously supplied by the special district, the board of trustees of the special district may, within 21 days after receiving the petition, notify the contact sponsor in writing that, before it will be considered by the board of trustees, the petition shall be presented to and approved by the governing body of the municipality as provided in Subsection 17B-1-504(1)(a)(iv) before it will be considered by the special district board of trustees.  If the notice is timely given to the contact sponsor, the petition shall be considered to have been withdrawn until the municipality files a petition with the special district under Subsection 17B-1-504(1)(a)(iv).(5)(a)After receiving the notice required by Subsection 17B-1-504(2), unless specifically allowed by law, a public entity may not make expenditures from public funds to support or oppose the gathering of signatures on a petition for withdrawal.(b)Nothing in this section prohibits a public entity from providing factual information and analysis regarding a withdrawal petition to the public, so long as the information grants equal access to both the opponents and proponents of the petition for withdrawal.(c)Nothing in this section prohibits a public official from speaking, campaigning, contributing personal money, or otherwise exercising the public official's constitutional rights.(6)Subsections (2), (3), (4), and (5) do not apply to a petition seeking the withdrawal of an area from an infrastructure financing district.

Section 12:
Section 12. Section 17B-1-1304 is amended to read:17B-1-1304Effective 05/25/26. Petition requirements.(1)Each petition under Subsection 17B-1-1303(1)(a) or (2) shall:(a)indicate the typed or printed name and current residence address of each owner of acre-feet of water, property owner, or registered voter signing the petition;(b)if it is a petition signed by the owners of acre-feet of water or property owners, indicate the address of the property as to which the owner is signing;(c)designate up to three signers of the petition as sponsors, one of whom shall be designated the contact sponsor, with the mailing address and telephone number of each; and(d)be filed with the clerk.(2)A signer of a petition to dissolve a special district may withdraw, or, once withdrawn, reinstate the signer's signature at any time until 30 days after the public hearing under Section 17B-1-1306.(3)The first page of a petition described in this section shall include the following statement in at least the same size type as the majority of the other statements on the page:"WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record."

Section 13:
Section 13. Section 17D-2-502 is amended to read:17D-2-502Effective 05/25/26. Required process for issuance of local building authority bonds -- Certification of petition signatures -- Removal of signature.(1)A local building authority may not issue bonds unless the creating local entity's governing body approves the issuance and terms of the bonds.(2)(a)Before issuing bonds, the authority board of a local building authority shall give public notice of the authority board's intent to issue bonds.(b)(i)A local building authority may not issue bonds without the approval of the creating local entity's voters if, within 30 days after the notice under Subsection (2)(a) is given, a written petition requesting an election is filed with the local building authority, signed by at least 20% of the active voters, as defined in Section 20A-1-102, within the creating local entity.(ii)The first page of a petition described in this section shall include the following statement in at least the same size type as the majority of the other statements on the page:"WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record."(ii)(iii)Each election under Subsection (2)(b)(i) shall be held as provided in Title 11, Chapter 14, Local Government Bonding Act, in the same manner as an election for general obligation bonds issued by the creating local entity.(3)(a)Within three business days after the day on which a local building authority receives a petition under Subsection (2)(b)(i), the local building authority shall provide the petition to the county clerk of the county in which the creating local entity is located.(b)Within 14 days after the day on which a county clerk receives a petition from the local building authority under Subsection (3)(a), the county clerk shall:(i)use the procedures described in Section 20A-1-1002 to determine whether the petition satisfies the requirements of Subsection (2)(b)(i);(ii)certify on the petition whether each name is that of an active voter within the creating local entity; and(iii)deliver the certified petition to the local building authority.(4)(a)A voter who signs a petition under this section may have the voter's signature removed from the petition by, no later than three business days after the day on which the local building authority provides the petition to the county clerk, submitting to the county clerk a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed.(b)A statement described in Subsection (4)(a) shall comply with the requirements described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(2).(c)The county clerk shall use the procedures described in SectionSubsection 20A-1-1003(3) to determine whether to remove an individual's signature from a petition after receiving a timely, valid statement requesting removal of the signature.

Section 14:
Section 14. Section 20A-1-102 is amended to read:20A-1-102Effective upon governor's approval. Definitions.As used in this title:(1)"Active voter" means a registered voter who has not been classified as an inactive voter by the county clerk.(2)"Automatic tabulating equipment" means apparatus that automatically examines and counts votes recorded on ballots and tabulates the results.(3)(a)"Ballot" means the storage medium, including a paper, mechanical, or electronic storage medium, that records an individual voter's vote.(b)"Ballot" does not include a record to tally multiple votes.(4)"Ballot proposition" means a question, issue, or proposal that is submitted to voters on the ballot for their approval or rejection including:(a)an opinion question specifically authorized by the Legislature;(b)a constitutional amendment;(c)an initiative;(d)a referendum;(e)a bond proposition;(f)a judicial retention question;(g)an incorporation of a city or town; or(h)any other ballot question specifically authorized by the Legislature.(5)"Bind," "binding," or "bound" means securing more than one piece of paper together using staples or another means in at least three places across the top of the paper in the blank space reserved for securing the paper.(6)"Board of canvassers" means the entities established by Sections 20A-4-301 and 20A-4-306 to canvass election returns.(7)"Bond election" means an election held for the purpose of approving or rejecting the proposed issuance of bonds by a government entity.(8)"Business day" means a Monday, Tuesday, Wednesday, Thursday, or Friday that is not a holiday.(9)"Business reply mail envelope" means an envelope that may be mailed free of charge by the sender.(10)"Calendar day" means any day, regardless of whether the day is a weekend, a holiday, a business day, or any other type of day.(11)"Canvass" means the review of election returns and the official declaration of election results by the board of canvassers.(12)"Canvassing judge" means a poll worker designated to assist in counting ballots at the canvass.(13)"Contracting election officer" means an election officer who enters into a contract or interlocal agreement with a provider election officer.(14)"Convention" means the political party convention at which party officers and delegates are selected.(15)"Counting center" means one or more locations selected by the election officer in charge of the election for the automatic counting of ballots.(16)"Counting judge" means a poll worker designated to count the ballots during election day.(17)"Counting room" means a suitable and convenient private place or room for use by the poll workers and counting judges to count ballots.(18)"County officers" means those county officers that are required by law to be elected.(19)"Date of the election" or "election day" or "day of the election":(a)means the day that is specified in the calendar year as the day on which the election occurs; and(b)does not include:(i)deadlines established for voting by mail, military-overseas voting, or emergency voting; or(ii)any early voting or early voting period as provided under Chapter 3a, Part 6, Early Voting.(20)"Elected official" means:(a)a person elected to an office under Section 20A-1-303 or Chapter 4, Part 6, Municipal Alternate Voting Methods Pilot Project;(b)a person who is considered to be elected to a municipal office in accordance with Subsection 20A-1-206(1)(c)(ii); or(c)a person who is considered to be elected to a special district office in accordance with Subsection 20A-1-206(3)(b)(ii).(21)"Election" means a regular general election, a municipal general election, a statewide special election, a local special election, a regular primary election, a municipal primary election, and a special district election.(22)"Election Assistance Commission" means the commission established by the Help America Vote Act of 2002, Pub. L. No. 107-252.(23)"Election cycle" means the period beginning on the first day on which individuals are eligible to file declarations of candidacy and ending when the canvass is completed.(24)"Election judge" means a poll worker that is assigned to:(a)preside over other poll workers at a polling place;(b)act as the presiding election judge; or(c)serve as a canvassing judge, counting judge, or receiving judge.(25)"Election material" includes:(a)the verification documentation described in Subsection 20A-3a-401(9)(b)(iv);(b)the list of voters contacted to cure a ballot described in Subsection 20A-3a-401(10)(b);(c)the record of rejected and resolved ballots described in Subsection 20A-3a-401(11)(a);(d)any chain of custody documentation described in Section 20A-3a-401.1, including:(i)the count of ballots described in Subsection 20A-3a-401.1(3); and(ii)the batch log described in Subsection 20A-3a-401.1(5);(e)the record of signature verification audits described in Subsection 20A-3a-402.5(4);(f)the affidavit of compliance described in Subsection 20A-3a-404(2);(g)the physical and electronic log of replicated ballots described in Subsection 20A-4-104(3);(h)the physical or electronic log of adjudicated ballots described in Section 20A-5-802.5;(i)the record of voter database access described in Subsection 20A-5-905(2);(j)the reports on military and overseas voters described in Section 20A-16-202;(k)scanned copies of return envelopes;(l)a copy of the final election results database described in Section 20A-5-802.5; and(m)the materials used in the programming of the automatic tabulating equipment.(26)"Election officer" means:(a)the lieutenant governor, for all statewide ballots and elections;(b)the county clerk for:(i)a county ballot and election; and(ii)a ballot and election as a provider election officer as provided in Section 20A-5-400.1 or 20A-5-400.5;(c)the municipal clerk for:(i)a municipal ballot and election; and(ii)a ballot and election as a provider election officer as provided in Section 20A-5-400.1 or 20A-5-400.5;(d)the special district clerk or chief executive officer for:(i)a special district ballot and election; and(ii)a ballot and election as a provider election officer as provided in Section 20A-5-400.1 or 20A-5-400.5; or(e)the business administrator or superintendent of a school district for:(i)a school district ballot and election; and(ii)a ballot and election as a provider election officer as provided in Section 20A-5-400.1 or 20A-5-400.5.(27)"Election official" means any election officer, election judge, or poll worker.(28)"Election results" means:(a)for an election other than a bond election, the count of votes cast in the election and the election returns requested by the board of canvassers; or(b)for bond elections, the count of those votes cast for and against the bond proposition plus any or all of the election returns that the board of canvassers may request.(29)"Election results database" means the following information generated by voting equipment:(a)one or more electronic files that contains a digital interpretation of each ballot that is counted in an election;(b)a ballot image; and(c)other information related to a ballot that is adjudicated under Section 20A-4-105.(30)"Election returns" means:(a)the pollbook;(b)the military and overseas absentee voter registration and voting certificates;(c)one of the tally sheets;(d)any unprocessed ballots;(e)all counted ballots;(f)all excess ballots;(g)all unused ballots;(h)all spoiled ballots;(i)all ballot disposition forms, including any provisional ballot disposition forms;(j)the final election results database described in Section 20A-5-802.5;(k)all return envelopes;(l)any provisional ballot envelopes; and(m)the total votes cast form.(31)"Electronic signature" means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with a record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the record.(32)"Holiday" means a legal holiday described in Subsections 63G-1-301(1) and (2).(33)"Inactive voter" means a registered voter who is listed as inactive by a county clerk under Subsection 20A-2-505(4)(c)(i) or (ii).(34)"Judicial office" means the office filled by any judicial officer.(35)"Judicial officer" means any justice or judge of a court of record or any county court judge.(36)"Local election" means a regular county election, a regular municipal election, a municipal primary election, a local special election, a special district election, and a bond election.(37)"Local political subdivision" means a county, a municipality, a special district, or a local school district.(38)"Local special election" means a special election called by the governing body of a local political subdivision in which all registered voters of the local political subdivision may vote.(39)"Manual ballot" means a paper document produced by an election officer on which an individual records an individual's vote by directly placing a mark on the paper document using a pen or other marking instrument.(40)"Mechanical ballot" means a record, including a paper record, electronic record, or mechanical record, that:(a)is created via electronic or mechanical means; and(b)records an individual voter's vote cast via a method other than an individual directly placing a mark, using a pen or other marking instrument, to record an individual voter's vote.(41)"Municipal executive" means:(a)the mayor in the council-mayor form of government defined in Section 10-3b-102; or(b)the mayor in the council-manager form of government defined in Subsection 10-3b-103(6).(42)"Municipal general election" means the election held in municipalities and, as applicable, special districts on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of each odd-numbered year for the purposes established in Section 20A-1-202.(43)"Municipal legislative body" means the council of the city or town in any form of municipal government.(44)"Municipal office" means an elective office in a municipality.(45)"Municipal officers" means those municipal officers that are required by law to be elected.(46)"Municipal primary election" means an election held to nominate candidates for municipal office.(47)"Municipality" means a city or town.(48)"Official ballot" means the ballots distributed by the election officer for voters to record their votes.(49)"Official endorsement" means  the information on the ballot that identifies:(a)the ballot as an official ballot;(b)the date of the election; and(c)(i)for a ballot prepared by an election officer other than a county clerk, the facsimile signature required by Subsection 20A-6-401(1)(a)(iii); or(ii)for a ballot prepared by a county clerk, the words required by Subsection 20A-6-301(1)(b)(iii).(50)"Official register" means the official record furnished to election officials by the election officer that contains the information required by Section 20A-5-401.(51)"Political party" means an organization of registered voters that has qualified to participate in an election by meeting the requirements of Chapter 8, Political Party Formation and Procedures.(52)(a)"Poll worker" means a person assigned by an election official to assist with an election, voting, or counting votes.(b)"Poll worker" includes election judges.(c)"Poll worker" does not include a watcher.(53)"Pollbook" means a record of the names of voters in the order that the voters appear to cast votes.(54)"Polling place" means a building where voting is conducted.(55)"Position" means a square, circle, rectangle, or other geometric shape on a ballot in which the voter marks the voter's choice.(56)"Presidential Primary Election" means the election established in Chapter 9, Part 8, Presidential Primary Election.(57)"Primary convention" means the political party conventions held during the year of the regular general election.(58)"Protective counter" means a separate counter, which cannot be reset, that:(a)is built into a voting machine; and(b)records the total number of movements of the operating lever.(59)"Provider election officer" means an election officer who enters into a contract or interlocal agreement with a contracting election officer to conduct an election for the contracting election officer's local political subdivision in accordance with Section 20A-5-400.1.(60)"Provisional ballot" means a ballot voted provisionally by a person:(a)whose name is not listed on the official register at the polling place;(b)whose legal right to vote is challenged as provided in this title; or(c)whose identity was not sufficiently established by a poll worker.(61)"Provisional ballot envelope" means an envelope printed in the form required by Section 20A-6-105 that is used to identify provisional ballots and to provide information to verify a person's legal right to vote.(62)(a)"Public figure" means an individual who, due to the individual being considered for, holding, or having held a position of prominence in a public or private capacity, or due to the individual's celebrity status, has an increased risk to the individual's safety.(b)"Public figure" does not include an individual:(i)elected to public office; or(ii)appointed to fill a vacancy in an elected public office.(b)"Public figure" includes an individual who is elected to public office, appointed to fill a vacancy in an elected public office, or employed by a government entity if, in relation to the individual's service in public office or employment as an employee of a government entity, the individual has received a threat of harm to a person or property.(63)"Qualify" or "qualified" means to take the oath of office and begin performing the duties of the position for which the individual was elected.(64)"Receiving judge" means the poll worker that checks the voter's name in the official register at a polling place and provides the voter with a ballot.(65)"Registration form" means a form by which an individual may register to vote under this title.(66)"Regular ballot" means a ballot that is not a provisional ballot.(67)"Regular general election" means the election held throughout the state on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of each even-numbered year for the purposes established in Section 20A-1-201.(68)"Regular primary election" means the election, held on the date specified in Section 20A-1-201.5, to nominate candidates of political parties and candidates for nonpartisan local school board positions to advance to the regular general election.(69)"Resident" means a person who resides within a specific voting precinct in Utah.(70)"Return envelope" means the envelope, described in Subsection 20A-3a-202(4), provided to a voter with a manual ballot:(a)into which the voter places the manual ballot after the voter has voted the manual ballot in order to preserve the secrecy of the voter's vote; and(b)that includes the voter affidavit and a place for the voter's signature.(71)"Sample ballot" means a mock ballot similar in form to the official ballot, published as provided in Section 20A-5-405.(72)"Special district" means a local government entity under Title 17B, Limited Purpose Local Government Entities - Special Districts, and includes a special service district under Title 17D, Chapter 1, Special Service District Act.(73)"Special district officers" means those special district board members who are required by law to be elected.(74)"Special election" means an election held as authorized by Section 20A-1-203.(75)"Spoiled ballot" means each ballot that:(a)is spoiled by the voter;(b)is unable to be voted because it was spoiled by the printer or a poll worker; or(c)lacks the official endorsement.(76)"Statewide special election" means a special election called by the governor or the Legislature in which all registered voters in Utah may vote.(77)"Tabulation system" means a device or system designed for the sole purpose of tabulating votes cast by voters at an election.(78)"Ticket" means  a list of:(a)political parties;(b)candidates for an office; or(c)ballot propositions.(79)"Transfer case" means the sealed box used to transport voted ballots to the counting center.(80)"Vacancy" means:(a)except as provided in Subsection (80)(b), the absence of an individual to serve in a position created by state constitution or state statute, whether that absence occurs because of death, disability, disqualification, resignation, or other cause; or(b)in relation to a candidate for a position created by state constitution or state statute, the removal of a candidate due to the candidate's death, resignation, or disqualification.(81)"Valid voter identification" means:(a)a form of identification that bears the name and photograph of the voter which may include:(i)a currently valid Utah driver license;(ii)a currently valid identification card issued under Title 53, Chapter 3, Part 8, Identification Card Act;(iii)a currently valid identification card that is issued by:(A)the state; or(B)a branch, department, or agency of the United States;(iv)a currently valid Utah permit to carry a concealed weapon;(v)a currently valid United States passport; or(vi)a currently valid United States military identification card;(b)one of the following identification cards, regardless of whether the card includes a photograph of the voter:(i)a valid tribal identification card;(ii)a Bureau of Indian Affairs card; or(iii)a tribal treaty card; or(c)two forms of identification not listed under Subsection (81)(a) or (b) but that bear the name of the voter and provide evidence that the voter resides in the voting precinct, which may include:(i)before January 1, 2029, an original or copy of a current utility bill, dated no more than 90 calendar days before the date of the election;(ii)before January 1, 2029, an original or copy of a bank or other financial account statement, dated no more than 90 calendar days before the date of the election;(iii)a certified birth certificate;(iv)a valid social security card;(v)an original or copy of a check issued by the state or the federal government, dated no more than 90 calendar days before the date of the election;(vi)an original or copy of a paycheck from the voter's employer, dated no more than 90 calendar days before the date of the election;(vii)a currently valid Utah hunting or fishing license;(viii)certified naturalization documentation;(ix)a currently valid license issued by an authorized agency of the United States;(x)a certified copy of court records showing the voter's adoption or name change;(xi)a valid Medicaid card, Medicare card, or Electronic Benefits Transfer Cardcard;(xii)a currently valid identification card issued by:(A)a local government within the state;(B)an employer for an employee; or(C)a college, university, technical school, or professional school located within the state; or(xiii)a current Utah vehicle registration.(82)"Valid write-in candidate" means a candidate who has qualified as a write-in candidate by following the procedures and requirements of this title.(83)"Vote by mail" means to vote, using a manual ballot that is mailed to the voter, by:(a)mailing the ballot to the location designated in the mailing; or(b)depositing the ballot in a ballot drop box designated by the election officer.(84)"Voter" means an individual who:(a)meets the requirements for voting in an election;(b)meets the requirements of election registration;(c)is registered to vote; and(d)is listed in the official register.(85)"Voter registration deadline" means the registration deadline provided in Section 20A-2-102.5.(86)"Voting area" means the area within six feet of the voting booths, voting machines, and ballot box.(87)"Voting booth" means:(a)the space or compartment within a polling place that is provided for the preparation of ballots, including the voting enclosure or curtain; or(b)a voting device that is free standing.(88)"Voting device" means any device provided by an election officer for a voter to vote a mechanical ballot.(89)"Voting precinct" means the smallest geographical voting unit, established under Chapter 5, Part 3, Duties of the County and Municipal Legislative Bodies.(90)"Watcher" means an individual who complies with the requirements described in Section 20A-3a-801 to become a watcher for an election.(91)"Write-in ballot" means a ballot containing any write-in votes.(92)"Write-in vote" means a vote cast for an individual, whose name is not printed on the ballot, in accordance with the procedures established in this title.

Section 15:
Section 15. Section 20A-1-1004 is enacted to read:20A-1-1004Effective 05/25/26. Signing a petition -- Waiver of privacy status by at-risk voter.(1)As used in this section, "at-risk voter" means the same as that term is defined in Section 20A-2-601.(2)Subject to Subsection (3), if an at-risk voter signs a petition, the voter's voter identification number and date of signature are subject to disclosure to the same extent, and in the same manner, as the voter identification number and date of signature of a voter who is not an at-risk voter who signs the petition.(3)(a)Subsection (2) applies only to the extent of a disclosure made in direct relation to the petition, including:(i)disclosing the voter identification number and date of signature of an at-risk voter who signed the petition;(ii)signature verification or certification for the petition; or(iii)removing a signature from the petition.(b)Except to the extent described in Subsection (3)(a), the voter registration record of an at-risk voter retains the classification as a private record.

Section 16:
Section 16. Section 20A-2-101.1 is amended to read:20A-2-101.1Effective 04/06/26. Preregistering to vote.(1)An individual may preregister to vote if the individual:(a)is 16 or 17 years of ageold;(b)is not eligible to register to vote because the individual does not comply with the age requirements described in Subsection 20A-2-101(1)(c);(c)is a citizen of the United States;(d)has been a resident of Utah for at least 30 calendar days; and(e)currently resides within the voting district or precinct in which the individual preregisters to vote.(2)An individual described in Subsection (1) may not vote in an election and is not registered to vote until:(a)the individual is otherwise eligible to register to vote because the individual complies with the age requirements described in Subsection 20A-2-101(1)(c); and(b)the county clerk registers the individual to vote under Subsection (4).(3)An individual who preregisters to vote shall:(a)complete a voter registration form, including an indication that the individual is preregistering to vote; and(b)submit the voter registration form to a county clerk in person, by mail, or in any other manner authorized by this chapter for the submission of a voter registration form.(4)(a)A county clerk shall:(i)retain the voter registration form of an individual who meets the qualifications for preregistration and who submits a completed voter registration form to the county clerk under Subsection (3)(b);(ii)register the individual to vote in the next election in which the individual will be eligible to vote, before the voter registration deadline established in Section 20A-2-102.5 for that election; and(iii)send a notice to the individual that:(A)informs the individual that the individual's voter registration form has been accepted as an application for preregistration;(B)informs the individual that the individual will be registered to vote in the next election in which the individual will be eligible to vote; and(C)indicates in which election the individual will be registered to vote.(b)An individual who the county clerk registers under Subsection (4)(a)(ii) is considered to have applied for voter registration on the earlier of:(i)the day of the voter registration deadline immediately preceding the election day on which the individual will be at least 18 years of ageold; or(ii)the day on which the individual turns 18 years of ageold.(c)A county clerk shall refer a voter registration form to the county attorney for investigation and possible prosecution if the clerk or the clerk's designee believes the individual is attempting to preregister to vote in an election in which the individual will not be legally entitled to vote.(5)(a)The lieutenant governor or a county clerk shall classify the voter registration record of an individual who preregisters to vote as a private record until the day on which the individual turns 18 years of ageold.(b)OnSubject to Subsection 63G-2-301(2)(l), and except as otherwise provided in Subsections 63G-2-302(1)(j) through (m), on the day on which the individual described in Subsection (5)(a) turns 18 years of ageold, the lieutenant governor or county clerk shall classify the individual's voter registration record as a public record in accordance with Subsection 63G-2-301(2)(l).(6)If an individual who is at least 18 years of ageold erroneously indicates on the voter registration form that the individual is preregistering to vote, the county clerk shall consider the form as a voter registration form and shall process the form in accordance with this chapter.

Section 17:
Section 17. Section 20A-2-104 is amended to read:20A-2-104Effective 04/06/26. Voter registration form -- Registered voter lists -- Fees for copies.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Candidate for public office" means an individual:(i)who files a declaration of candidacy for a public office;(ii)who files a notice of intent to gather signatures under Section 20A-9-408; or(iii)employed by, under contract with, or a volunteer of, an individual described in Subsection (1)(a)(i) or (ii) for political campaign purposes.(b)"Dating violence" means the same as that term is defined in Section 78B-7-402 and the federal Violence Against Women Act of 1994, as amended.(c)"Domestic violence" means the same as that term is defined in Section 77-36-1 and the federal Violence Against Women Act of 1994, as amended.(d)"Hash Code" means a code generated by applying an algorithm to a set of data to produce a code that:(i)uniquely represents the set of data;(ii)is always the same if the same algorithm is applied to the same set of data; and(iii)cannot be reversed to reveal the data applied to the algorithm.(e)"Protected individual" means an individual:(i)who submits a withholding request form with the individual's voter registration record, or to the lieutenant governor or a county clerk, if the individual indicates on the form that the individual, or an individual who resides with the individual, is a victim of domestic violence or dating violence or is likely to be a victim of domestic violence or dating violence;(ii)who submits a withholding request form with the individual's voter registration record, or to the lieutenant governor or a county clerk, if the individual indicates on the form and provides verification that the individual, or an individual who resides with the individual, is a law enforcement officer, a member of the armed forces as defined in Section 20A-1-513, a public figure, or protected by a protective order or protection order; or(iii)whose voter registration record was classified as a private record at the request of the individual before May 12, 2020.(2)(1)(a)An individual applying for voter registration, or an individual preregistering to vote, shall complete a voter registration form in substantially the following form:(i)the first part of the form shall include the following:"---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------UTAH ELECTION REGISTRATION FORMAre you a citizen of the United States of America?YesNoIf you checked "no" to the above question, do not complete this form.Will you be 18 years of ageold on or before election day?YesNoIf you checked "no" to the above question, are you 16 or 17 years of ageold and preregistering to vote?YesNoIf you checked "no" to both of the prior two questions, do not complete this form.Name of Voter _________________________________________________________________First Middle      LastUtah Driver License or Utah Identification Card Number____________________________Date of Birth ______________________________________________________Street Address of Principal Place of Residence____________________________________________________________________________City            County            State        Zip CodeTelephone Number (optional) _________________________Email Address (optional) _____________________________________________";(ii)beginning on January 1, 2027, immediately following the portion of the form described in Subsection (1)(a)(i), the form shall include the following:"Do you consent to the election officer providing the following information to the political party with which you affiliate? (optional): The email address you provided above? Yes No The phone number you provided above? Yes No"; and(iii)following the portions of the form required under Subsections (1)(a)(i) and (ii), the form shall include the following:"Last four digits of Social Security Number ______________________Last former address at which I was registered to vote (if known)______________________________________________________________________________________________________CityCountyState       Zip CodePolitical Party(a listing of each registered political party, as defined in Section 20A-8-101 and maintained by the lieutenant governor under Section 67-1a-2, with each party's name preceded by a checkbox)Unaffiliated (no political party preference)    Other (Please specify)___________________I do swear (or affirm), subject to penalty of law for false statements, that the information contained in this form is true, and that I am a citizen of the United States and a resident of the state of Utah, residing at the above address.  Unless I have indicated above that I am preregistering to vote in a later election, I will be at least 18 years of ageold and will have resided in Utah for 30 calendar days immediately before the next election.  I am not a convicted felon currently incarcerated for commission of a felony.Signed and sworn__________________________________________________________Voter's Signature_______________(month/day/year).          PRIVACY INFORMATIONVoter registration records contain some information that is available to the public, such as your name, address, and age range. Your date of birth, driver license number, state identification card number, and social security number are available only to an authorized government entity. Your email address and phone number are also only available to an authorized government entity, unless you have consented, above, to disclose them to the political party with which you choose to affiliate.REQUEST FOR ADDITIONAL PRIVACY PROTECTIONIn addition to the protections provided above, you may request that your voter registration record be withheld from public disclosure if you are, or reside with: an individual who is a victim of, or is threatened with, domestic violence or dating violence; a law enforcement officer; a member of the armed forces; a public figure; or an individual who is protected by a court order.To make this request for additional privacy protection, you must prove that you qualify by submitting an at-risk designation request form, and any required proof, to your county clerk. You may obtain the form, and information on the proof required, from your county clerk or at the following website [insert the website address specified by the lieutenant governor].Voter registration records contain some information that is available to the public, such as your name and address, some information that is available only to government entities, and some information that is available only to certain third parties in accordance with the requirements of law.Your driver license number, identification card number, social security number, email address, full date of birth, and phone number are available only to government entities. Your year of birth is available to political parties, candidates for public office, certain third parties, and their contractors, employees, and volunteers, in accordance with the requirements of law.You may request that all information on your voter registration records be withheld from all persons other than government entities, political parties, candidates for public office, and their contractors, employees, and volunteers, by indicating here:_____ Yes, I request that all information on my voter registration records be withheld from all persons other than government entities, political parties, candidates for public office, and their contractors, employees, and volunteers.REQUEST FOR ADDITIONAL PRIVACY PROTECTIONIn addition to the protections provided above, you may request that identifying information on your voter registration records be withheld from all political parties, candidates for public office, and their contractors, employees, and volunteers, by submitting a withholding request form, and any required verification, as described in the following paragraphs.A person may request that identifying information on the person's voter registration records be withheld from all political parties, candidates for public office, and their contractors, employees, and volunteers, by submitting a withholding request form with this registration record, or to the lieutenant governor or a county clerk, if the person is or is likely to be, or resides with a person who is or is likely to be, a victim of domestic violence or dating violence.A person may request that identifying information on the person's voter registration records be withheld from all political parties, candidates for public office, and their contractors, employees, and volunteers, by submitting a withholding request form and any required verification with this registration form, or to the lieutenant governor or a county clerk, if the person is, or resides with a person who is, a law enforcement officer, a member of the armed forces, a public figure, or protected by a protective order or a protection order.CITIZENSHIP AFFIDAVITName:Name at birth, if different:Place of birth:Date of birth:Date and place of naturalization (if applicable):I hereby swear and affirm, under penalties for voting fraud set forth below, that I am a citizen and that to the best of my knowledge and belief the information above is true and correct.____________________________Signature of ApplicantIn accordance with Section 20A-2-401, the penalty for willfully causing, procuring, or allowing yourself to be registered or preregistered to vote if you know you are not entitled to register or preregister to vote is up to one year in jail and a fine of up to $2,500.NOTICE:  IN ORDER TO BE ALLOWED TO VOTE, YOU MUST PRESENT VALID VOTER IDENTIFICATION TO THE POLL WORKER, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF LAW.FOR OFFICIAL USE ONLYType of I.D. ____________________________Voting Precinct _________________________Voting I.D. Number _____________________------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------"(b)The voter registration form described in Subsection (2)(a)(1)(a) shall include:(i)a section in substantially the following form:"------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------BALLOT NOTIFICATIONSDo you consent to receive communications about the status of your ballot and other official communications, by text, at the phone number you provided above?             Yes          No        ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------"; and(ii)no later than November 5, 2025, the following, immediately after the question described in Subsection (2)(b)(i)(1)(b)(i):"Indicate below how you want to vote in upcoming elections:_____ Mail a ballot to me._____ Do not mail a ballot to me. I will vote in person."(c)(i)Except as provided under Subsection (2)(c)(ii), the county clerk shall retain a copy of each voter registration form in a permanent countywide alphabetical file, which may be electronic or some other recognized system.(ii)The county clerk may transfer a superseded voter registration form to the Division of Archives and Records Service created under Section 63A-12-101.(3)(a)Each county clerk shall retain lists of currently registered voters.(b)The lieutenant governor shall maintain a list of registered voters in electronic form.(c)If there are any discrepancies between the two lists, the county clerk's list is the official list.(d)The lieutenant governor and the county clerks may charge the fees established under the authority of Subsection 63G-2-203(10) to individuals who wish to obtain a copy of the list of registered voters.(4)(a)As used in this Subsection (4), "qualified person" means:(i)a government official or government employee acting in the government official's or government employee's capacity as a government official or a government employee;(ii)a health care provider, as defined in Section 26B-8-501, or an agent, employee, or independent contractor of a health care provider;(iii)an insurance company, as defined in Section 67-4a-102, or an agent, employee, or independent contractor of an insurance company;(iv)a financial institution, as defined in Section 7-1-103, or an agent, employee, or independent contractor of a financial institution;(v)a political party, or an agent, employee, or independent contractor of a political party;(vi)a candidate for public office, or an employee, independent contractor, or volunteer of a candidate for public office;(vii)a person described in Subsections (4)(a)(i) through (vi) who, after obtaining a year of birth from the list of registered voters:(A)provides the year of birth only to a person described in Subsections (4)(a)(i) through (vi);(B)verifies that the person described in Subsection (4)(a)(vii)(A)  is a person described in Subsections (4)(a)(i) through (vi);(C)ensures, using industry standard security measures, that the year of birth may not be accessed by a person other than a person described in Subsections (4)(a)(i) through (vi);(D)verifies that each person described in Subsections (4)(a)(ii) through (iv) to whom the person provides the year of birth will only use the year of birth to verify the accuracy of personal information submitted by an individual or to confirm the identity of a person in order to prevent fraud, waste, or abuse;(E)verifies that each person described in Subsection (4)(a)(i) to whom the person provides the year of birth will only use the year of birth in the person's capacity as a government official or government employee; and(F)verifies that each person described in Subsection (4)(a)(v) or (vi) to whom the person provides the year of birth will only use the year of birth for a political purpose of the political party or candidate for public office; or(viii)a person described in Subsection (4)(a)(v) or (vi) who, after obtaining information under Subsection (4)(n) and (o):(A)provides the information only to another person described in Subsection (4)(a)(v) or (vi);(B)verifies that the other person described in Subsection (4)(a)(viii)(A) is a person described in Subsection (4)(a)(v) or (vi);(C)ensures, using industry standard security measures, that the information may not be accessed by a person other than a person described in Subsection (4)(a)(v) or (vi); and(D)verifies that each person described in Subsection (4)(a)(v) or (vi) to whom the person provides the information will only use the information for a political purpose of the political party or candidate for public office.(b)Notwithstanding Subsection 63G-2-302(1)(j)(iv), and except as provided in Subsection 63G-2-302(1)(k) or (l), the lieutenant governor or a county clerk shall, when providing the list of registered voters to a qualified person under this section, include, with the list, the years of birth of the registered voters, if:(i)the lieutenant governor or a county clerk verifies the identity of the person and that the person is a qualified person; and(ii)the qualified person signs a document that includes the following:(A)the name, address, and telephone number of the person requesting the list of registered voters;(B)an indication of the type of qualified person that the person requesting the list claims to be;(C)a statement regarding the purpose for which the person desires to obtain the years of birth;(D)a list of the purposes for which the qualified person may use the year of birth of a registered voter that is obtained from the list of registered voters;(E)a statement that the year of birth of a registered voter that is obtained from the list of registered voters may not be provided or used for a purpose other than a purpose described under Subsection (4)(b)(ii)(D);(F)a statement that if the person obtains the year of birth of a registered voter from the list of registered voters under false pretenses, or provides or uses the year of birth of a registered voter that is obtained from the list of registered voters in a manner that is prohibited by law, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor and is subject to a civil fine;(G)an assertion from the person that the person will not provide or use the year of birth of a registered voter that is obtained from the list of registered voters in a manner that is prohibited by law; and(H)notice that if the person makes a false statement in the document, the person is punishable by law under Section 76-8-504.(c)The lieutenant governor or a county clerk:(i)may not disclose the year of birth of a registered voter to a person that the lieutenant governor or county clerk reasonably believes:(A)is not a qualified person or a person described in Subsection (4)(l); or(B)will provide or use the year of birth in a manner prohibited by law; and(ii)may not disclose information under Subsections (4)(n) or (o) to a person that the lieutenant governor or county clerk reasonably believes:(A)is not a person described in Subsection (4)(a)(v) or (vi); or(B)will provide or use the information in a manner prohibited by law.(d)The lieutenant governor or a county clerk may not disclose the voter registration form of a person, or information included in the person's voter registration form, whose voter registration form is classified as private under Subsection (4)(h) to a person other than:(i)a government official or government employee acting in the government official's or government employee's capacity as a government official or government employee; or(ii)subject to Subsection (4)(e), a person described in Subsection (4)(a)(v) or (vi) for a political purpose.(e)(i)Except as provided in Subsection (4)(e)(ii), when disclosing a record or information under Subsection (4)(d)(ii), the lieutenant governor or county clerk shall exclude the information described in Subsection 63G-2-302(1)(j), other than the year of birth.(ii)If disclosing a record or information under Subsection (4)(d)(ii) in relation to the voter registration record of a protected individual, the lieutenant governor or county clerk shall comply with Subsections (4)(n) through (p).(f)The lieutenant governor or a county clerk may not disclose a withholding request form, described in Subsections (7) and (8), submitted by an individual, or information obtained from that form, to a person other than a government official or government employee acting in the government official's or government employee's capacity as a government official or government employee.(g)A person is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if the person:(i)obtains from the list of registered voters, under false pretenses, the year of birth of a registered voter or information described in Subsection (4)(n) or (o);(ii)uses or provides the year of birth of a registered voter, or information described in Subsection (4)(n) or (o), that is obtained from the list of registered voters in a manner that is not permitted by law;(iii)obtains a voter registration record described in Subsection 63G-2-302(1)(k) under false pretenses;(iv)uses or provides information obtained from a voter registration record described in Subsection 63G-2-302(1)(k) in a manner that is not permitted by law;(v)unlawfully discloses or obtains a voter registration record withheld under Subsection (7) or a withholding request form described in Subsections (7) and (8); or(vi)unlawfully discloses or obtains information from a voter registration record withheld under Subsection (7) or a withholding request form described in Subsections (7) and (8).(h)The lieutenant governor or a county clerk shall classify the voter registration record of a voter as a private record if the voter:(i)submits a written application, created by the lieutenant governor, requesting that the voter's voter registration record be classified as private;(ii)requests on the voter's voter registration form that the voter's voter registration record be classified as a private record; or(iii)submits a withholding request form described in Subsection (7) and any required verification.(i)Except as provided in Subsections (4)(d)(ii) and (e)(ii), the lieutenant governor or a county clerk may not disclose to a person described in Subsection (4)(a)(v) or (vi) a voter registration record, or information obtained from a voter registration record, if the record is withheld under Subsection (7).(j)In addition to any criminal penalty that may be imposed under this section, the lieutenant governor may impose a civil fine against a person who violates a provision of this section, in an amount equal to the greater of:(i)the product of 30 and the square root of the total number of:(A)records obtained, provided, or used unlawfully, rounded to the nearest whole dollar; or(B)records from which information is obtained, provided, or used unlawfully, rounded to the nearest whole dollar; or(ii)$200.(k)A qualified person may not obtain, provide, or use the year of birth of a registered voter, if the year of birth is obtained from the list of registered voters or from a voter registration record, unless the person:(i)is a government official or government employee who obtains, provides, or uses the year of birth in the government official's or government employee's capacity as a government official or government employee;(ii)is a qualified person described in Subsection (4)(a)(ii), (iii), or (iv) and obtains or uses the year of birth only to verify the accuracy of personal information submitted by an individual or to confirm the identity of a person in order to prevent fraud, waste, or abuse;(iii)is a qualified person described in Subsection (4)(a)(v) or (vi) and obtains, provides, or uses the year of birth for a political purpose of the political party or candidate for public office; or(iv)is a qualified person described in Subsection (4)(a)(vii) and obtains, provides, or uses the year of birth to provide the year of birth to another qualified person to verify the accuracy of personal information submitted by an individual or to confirm the identity of a person in order to prevent fraud, waste, or abuse.(l)The lieutenant governor or a county clerk may provide a year of birth to a member of the media, in relation to an individual designated by the member of the media, in order for the member of the media to verify the identity of the individual.(m)A person described in Subsection (4)(a)(v) or (vi) may not use or disclose information from a voter registration record for a purpose other than a political purpose.(n)Notwithstanding Subsection 63G-2-302(1)(k) or (l), the lieutenant governor or a county clerk shall, when providing the list of registered voters to a qualified person described in Subsection (4)(a)(v) or (vi), include, from the record of a voter whose record is withheld under Subsection (7), the information described in Subsection (4)(o), if:(i)the lieutenant governor or a county clerk verifies the identity of the person and that the person is a qualified person described in Subsection (4)(a)(v) or (vi); and(ii)the qualified person described in Subsection (4)(a)(v) or (vi) signs a document that includes the following:(A)the name, address, and telephone number of the person requesting the list of registered voters;(B)an indication of the type of qualified person that the person requesting the list claims to be;(C)a statement regarding the purpose for which the person desires to obtain the information;(D)a list of the purposes for which the qualified person may use the information;(E)a statement that the information may not be provided or used for a purpose other than a purpose described under Subsection (4)(n)(ii)(D);(F)a statement that if the person obtains the information under false pretenses, or provides or uses the information in a manner that is prohibited by law, the person is guilty of a class A misdemeanor and is subject to a civil fine;(G)an assertion from the person that the person will not provide or use the information in a manner that is prohibited by law; and(H)notice that if the person makes a false statement in the document, the person is punishable by law under Section 76-8-504.(o)Except as provided in Subsection (4)(p), the information that the lieutenant governor or a county clerk is required to provide, under Subsection (4)(n), from the record of a protected individual is:(i)a single hash code, generated from a string of data that includes both the voter's voter identification number and residential address;(ii)the voter's residential address;(iii)the voter's mailing address, if different from the voter's residential address;(iv)the party affiliation of the voter;(v)the precinct number for the voter's residential address;(vi)the voter's voting history; and(vii)a designation of which age group, of the following age groups, the voter falls within:(A)25 or younger;(B)26 through 35;(C)36 through 45;(D)46 through 55;(E)56 through 65;(F)66 through 75; or(G)76 or older.(p)The lieutenant governor or a county clerk may not disclose:(i)information described in Subsection (4)(o) that, due to a small number of voters affiliated with a particular political party, or due to another reason, would likely reveal the identity of a voter if disclosed; or(ii)the address described in Subsection (4)(o)(iii) if the lieutenant governor or the county clerk determines that the nature of the address would directly reveal sensitive information about the voter.(q)A qualified person described in Subsection (4)(a)(v) or (vi), may not obtain, provide, or use the information described in Subsection (4)(n) or (o), except to the extent that the qualified person uses the information for a political purpose of a political party or candidate for public office.(5)(2)When political parties not listed on the voter registration form qualify as registered political parties under Chapter 8, Political Party Formation and Procedures, the lieutenant governor shall inform the county clerks of the name of the new political party and direct the county clerks to ensure that the voter registration form is modified to include that political party.(6)(3)Upon receipt of a voter registration form from an applicant, the county clerk or the clerk's designee shall:(a)review each voter registration form for completeness and accuracy; and(b)if the county clerk believes, based upon a review of the form, that an individual may be seeking to register or preregister to vote who is not legally entitled to register or preregister to vote, refer the form to the county attorney for investigation and possible prosecution.(7)The lieutenant governor or a county clerk shall withhold from a person, other than a person described in Subsection (4)(a)(i), the voter registration record, and information obtained from the voter registration record, of a protected individual.(8)(a)The lieutenant governor shall design and distribute a withholding request form for the purpose described in Subsections (1)(e)(i), (1)(e)(ii), (7), and this Subsection (8) to each election officer and to each agency that provides a voter registration form.(b)An individual described in Subsection (1)(e)(i) is not required to provide verification, other than the individual's attestation and signature on the withholding request form, that the individual, or an individual who resides with the individual, is a victim of domestic violence or dating violence or is likely to be a victim of domestic violence or dating violence.(c)The director of elections within the Office of the Lieutenant Governor shall make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, establishing requirements for providing the verification described in Subsection (1)(e)(ii).(9)An election officer or an employee of an election officer may not encourage an individual to submit, or discourage an individual from submitting, a withholding request form.(10)(a)The lieutenant governor shall make and execute a plan to provide notice to registered voters who are protected individuals, that includes the following information:(i)that the voter's classification of the record as private remains in effect;(ii)that certain non-identifying information from the voter's voter registration record may, under certain circumstances, be released to political parties and candidates for public office;(iii)that the voter's name, driver license or identification card number, social security number, email address, phone number, and the voter's day, month, and year of birth will remain private and will not be released to political parties or candidates for public office;(iv)that a county clerk will only release the information to political parties and candidates in a manner that does not associate the information with a particular voter; and(v)that a county clerk may, under certain circumstances, withhold other information that the county clerk determines would reveal identifying information about the voter.(b)The lieutenant governor may include in the notice described in this Subsection (10) a statement that a voter may obtain additional information on the lieutenant governor's website.(c)The plan described in Subsection (10)(a) may include providing the notice described in Subsection (10)(a) by:(i)publication on the Utah Public Notice Website, created in Section 63A-16-601;(ii)publication on the lieutenant governor's website or a county's website;(iii)posting the notice in public locations;(iv)publication in a newspaper;(v)sending notification to the voters by electronic means;(vi)sending notice by other methods used by government entities to communicate with citizens; or(vii)providing notice by any other method.(d)The lieutenant governor shall provide the notice included in a plan described in this Subsection (10) before June 16, 2023.

Section 18:
Section 18. Section 20A-2-108 is amended to read:20A-2-108Effective 04/06/26. Driver license or state identification card registration form -- Transmittal of information.(1)As used in this section, "qualifying form" means:(a)a driver license application form; or(b)a state identification card application form.(2)The lieutenant governor and the Driver License Division shall design each qualifying form to include:(a)(i)the following question, which an applicant is required to answer: "Do you authorize the use of information in this form for voter registration purposes? YES____ NO____"; and(ii)no later than November 5, 2025, the following:"Indicate below how you want to vote in upcoming elections:_____ Mail a ballot to me._____ Do not mail a ballot to me. I will vote in person.";(b)the following statement:                        "PRIVACY INFORMATIONVoter registration records contain some information that is available to the public, such as your name, address, and age range. Your date of birth, driver license number, state identification card number, and social security number are available only to an authorized government entity. Your email address and phone number are also only available to an authorized government entity, unless you have consented, above, to disclose them to the political party with which you choose to affiliate.REQUEST FOR ADDITIONAL PRIVACY PROTECTIONIn addition to the protections provided above, you may request that your voter registration record be withheld from public disclosure if you are, or reside with: an individual who is a victim of, or is threatened with, domestic violence or dating violence; a law enforcement officer; a member of the armed forces; a public figure; or an individual who is protected by a court order.To make this request for additional privacy protection, you must prove that you qualify by submitting an at-risk designation request form, and any required proof, to your county clerk. You may obtain the form, and information on the proof required, from your county clerk or at the following website [insert the website address specified by the lieutenant governor]."; andVoter registration records contain some information that is available to the public, such as your name and address, some information that is available only to government entities, and some information that is available only to certain third parties in accordance with the requirements of law.Your driver license number, identification card number, social security number, email address, full date of birth, and phone number are available only to government entities. Your year of birth is available to political parties, candidates for public office, certain third parties, and their contractors, employees, and volunteers, in accordance with the requirements of law.You may request that all information on your voter registration records be withheld from all persons other than government entities, political parties, candidates for public office, and their contractors, employees, and volunteers, by indicating here:_____ Yes, I request that all information on my voter registration records be withheld from all persons other than government entities, political parties, candidates for public office, and their contractors, employees, and volunteers.REQUEST FOR ADDITIONAL PRIVACY PROTECTIONIn addition to the protections provided above, you may request that identifying information on your voter registration records be withheld from all political parties, candidates for public office, and their contractors, employees, and volunteers, by submitting a withholding request form, and any required verification, as described in the following paragraphs.A person may request that identifying information on the person's voter registration records be withheld from all political parties, candidates for public office, and their contractors, employees, and volunteers, by submitting a withholding request form with this registration record, or to the lieutenant governor or a county clerk, if the person is or is likely to be, or resides with a person who is or is likely to be, a victim of domestic violence or dating violence.A person may request that identifying information on the person's voter registration records be withheld from all political parties, candidates for public office, and their contractors, employees, and volunteers, by submitting a withholding request form and any required verification with this registration form, or to the lieutenant governor or a county clerk, if the person is, or resides with a person who is, a law enforcement officer, a member of the armed forces, a public figure, or protected by a protective order or a protection order."; and(c)a section in substantially the following form:"------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------BALLOT NOTIFICATIONSDo you consent to receive communications about the status of your ballot and other official communications, by text, at the phone number you provided above?             Yes          No                    ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------".(3)The lieutenant governor and the Driver License Division shall ensure that a qualifying form contains:(a)a place for an individual to affirm the individual's citizenship, voting eligibility, and Utah residency, and that the information provided in the form is true;(b)a records disclosure that is similar to the records disclosure on a voter registration form described in Section 20A-2-104;(c)a statement that if an applicant declines to register or preregister to vote, the fact that the applicant has declined to register or preregister will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration purposes;(d)a statement that if an applicant does register or preregister to vote, the office at which the applicant submits a voter registration application will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration purposes; and(e)if the applicant answers "yes" to the question described in Subsection (2)(a)(2)(a)(i), a space where an individual may, if desired:(i)indicate the individual's desired political affiliation from a listing of each registered political party, as defined in Section 20A-8-101;(ii)specify a political party that is not listed under Subsection (3)(e)(i) with which the individual desires to affiliate; or(iii)indicate that the individual does not wish to affiliate with a political party.

Section 19:
Section 19. Section 20A-2-204 is amended to read:20A-2-204Effective 04/06/26. Registering to vote when applying for or renewing a driver license or other qualifying form.(1)As used in this section, "voter registration form" means, when an individual named on a qualifying form, as defined in Section 20A-2-108, answers "yes" to the question described in Subsection 20A-2-108(2)(a)(i), the information on the qualifying form that can be used for voter registration purposes.(2)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), a citizen who is qualified to vote may register to vote, and a citizen who is qualified to preregister to vote may preregister to vote, by answering "yes" to the question described in Subsection 20A-2-108(2)(a)(i) and completing the voter registration form.(b)A citizen who is a program participant in the Safe at Home Program created in Section 77-38-602 is not eligible to register to vote as described in Subsection (2)(a), but is eligible to register to vote by any other means described in this part.(3)The Driver License Division shall:(a)assist an individual in completing the voter registration form unless the individual refuses assistance;(b)electronically transmit each address change to the lieutenant governor on or before the first business day that is at least five calendar days after the day on which the division receives the address change; and(c)on or before the first business day that is at least five calendar days after the day on which the division receives a voter registration form, electronically transmit the form to the Office of the Lieutenant Governorlieutenant governor, including the following for the individual named on the form:(i)the name, date of birth, driver license or state identification card number, last four digits of the social security number, Utah residential address, place of birth, and signature;(ii)a mailing address, if different from the individual's Utah residential address;(iii)an email address and phone number, if available;(iv)the desired political affiliation, if indicated; and(v)an indication of whether the individual requested that the individual's voter registration record be classified as a private record under Subsection 20A-2-108(2)(b); and(vi)(v)a withholdingan at-risk designation request form described in Subsections 20A-2-104(7) and (8)Section 20A-2-606 and any verification submitted with the form.(4)Upon receipt of an individual's voter registration form from the Driver License Division under Subsection (3), the lieutenant governor or county clerk shall:(a)enter the information into the statewide voter registration database; and(b)if the individual requests on the individual's voter registration form that the individual's voter registration record be classified as a private record or the individual submits a withholding request form described in Subsections 20A-2-104(7) and (8)submits an at-risk designation request form described in Section 20A-2-606 and any required verification, classify the individual's voter registration record as a private record.(5)The county clerk of an individual whose information is entered into the statewide voter registration database under Subsection (4) shall:(a)ensure that the individual meets the qualifications to be registered or preregistered to vote; and(b)(i)if the individual meets the qualifications to be registered to vote:(A)ensure that the individual is assigned to the proper voting precinct; and(B)send the individual the notice described in Section 20A-2-304; or(ii)if the individual meets the qualifications to be preregistered to vote, process the form in accordance with the requirements of Section 20A-2-101.1.(6)(a)When the county clerk receives a correctly completed voter registration form under this section, the clerk shall:(i)comply with the applicable provisions of this Subsection (6); or(ii)if the individual is preregistering to vote, comply with Section 20A-2-101.1.(b)If the county clerk receives a correctly completed voter registration form under this section no later than 5 p.m. or, if submitting the form electronically, midnight, 11 calendar days before the date of an election, the county clerk shall:(i)accept the voter registration form; and(ii)unless the individual is preregistering to vote:(A)enter the individual's name on the list of registered voters for the voting precinct in which the individual resides; and(B)notify the individual that the individual is registered to vote in the upcoming election; and(iii)if the individual named in the form is preregistering to vote, comply with Section 20A-2-101.1.(c)If the county clerk receives a correctly completed voter registration form under this section after the deadline described in Subsection (6)(b), the county clerk shall, unless the individual named in the form is preregistering to vote:(i)accept the application for registration of the individual;(ii)process the voter registration form; and(iii)unless the individual is preregistering to vote, and except as provided in Subsection 20A-2-207(6), inform the individual that the individual will not be registered to vote in the pending election, unless the individual registers to vote by provisional ballot during the early voting period, if applicable, or on election day, in accordance with Section 20A-2-207.(7)(a)If the county clerk determines that an individual's voter registration form received from the Driver License Division is incorrect because of an error, because the form is incomplete, or because the individual does not meet the qualifications to be registered to vote, the county clerk shall mail notice to the individual stating that the individual has not been registered or preregistered because of an error, because the registration form is incomplete, or because the individual does not meet the qualifications to be registered to vote.(b)If a county clerk believes, based upon a review of a voter registration form, that an individual, who knows that the individual is not legally entitled to register or preregister to vote, may be intentionally seeking to register or preregister to vote, the county clerk shall refer the form to the county attorney for investigation and possible prosecution.

Section 20:
Section 20. Section 20A-2-206 is amended to read:20A-2-206Effective 04/06/26. Electronic registration -- Requesting to receive a ballot by mail.(1)The lieutenant governor shall create and maintain an electronic system that is publicly available on the Internetinternet for an individual to:(a)apply for voter registration or preregistration; or(b)beginning no later than July 1, 2025, request to receive a ballot by mail.(2)The electronic system described in Subsection (1) shall require, to register to vote, the applicant to:(a)enter the applicant's name, address, date of birth, driver license number or state identification card number, and any other information determined to be necessary by the lieutenant governor;(b)provide the information required by Section 20A-2-104, except that the applicant's signature may be obtained in the manner described in Subsections (2)(d) and (5);(c)attest to the truth of the information provided; and(d)authorize the lieutenant governor's and county clerk's use of the applicant's:(i)driver license or identification card signature, obtained under Title 53, Chapter 3, Uniform Driver License Act, for voter registration or preregistration purposes; or(ii)signature on file in the lieutenant governor's statewide voter registration database developed under Section 20A-2-502, for voter registration or preregistration purposes.(3)Notwithstanding Section 20A-2-104, an applicant using the electronic system described in Subsection (1) is not required to complete a printed registration form.(4)A system created and maintained under this section shall provide to an individual who is registering to vote the notices concerning a voter's presentation of identification described in Subsection 20A-2-104(2)20A-2-104(1).(5)The lieutenant governor shall, in relation to an individual who is registering to vote:(a)obtain a digital copy of the applicant's driver license signature or identification card signature from the Driver License Division; or(b)ensure that the applicant's signature is on file in the lieutenant governor's statewide voter registration database developed under Section 20A-2-502.(6)The lieutenant governor shall send the information described in Subsections (2) and (5) to the county clerk for the county in which the applicant's principal place of residence is found for further action as required by Section 20A-2-304 after:(a)receiving all information from an applicant; and(b)(i)receiving all information from the Driver License Division, if applicable; and(ii)(c)ensuring that the applicant's signature is on file in the lieutenant governor's statewide voter registration database developed under Section 20A-2-502.(7)The lieutenant governor may use additional security measures to ensure the accuracy and integrity of information submitted electronically under this section.(8)If an individual applies to register under this section no later than 11 calendar days before the date of an election, the county clerk shall:(a)accept and process the voter registration form;(b)unless the individual named in the form is preregistering to vote:(i)enter the applicant's name on the list of registered voters for the voting precinct in which the applicant resides; and(ii)notify the individual that the individual is registered to vote in the upcoming election; and(c)if the individual named in the form is preregistering to vote, comply with Section 20A-2-101.1.(9)If an individual applies to register under this section after the deadline described in Subsection (8), the county clerk shall, unless the individual is preregistering to vote:(a)accept the application for registration; and(b)except as provided in Subsection 20A-2-207(6), if possible, promptly inform the individual that the individual will not be registered to vote in the pending election, unless the individual registers to vote by provisional ballot during the early voting period, if applicable, on election day, in accordance with Section 20A-2-207.(10)The lieutenant governor shall provide a means by which a registered voter shall sign the application form.(11)For an individual who is registering to vote or is already registered to vote, the electronic system described in Subsection (1) shall include the following:"Indicate below how you want to vote in upcoming elections:_____ Mail a ballot to me._____ Do not mail a ballot to me. I will vote in person."

Section 21:
Section 21. Section 20A-2-304 is amended to read:20A-2-304Effective 04/06/26. County clerk's responsibilities -- Notice of disposition.Each county clerk shall:(1)register to vote each individual who meets the requirements for registration and who:(a)submits a completed voter registration form to the county clerk;(b)submits a completed voter registration form, as defined in Section 20A-2-204Subsection 20A-2-204(1), to the Driver License Division;(c)submits a completed voter registration form to a public assistance agency or a discretionary voter registration agency; or(d)mails a completed voter registration form to the county clerk; and(2)within 30 calendar days after the day on which the county clerk processes a voter registration form, send a notice to the individual who submits the form that:(a)(i)informs the individual that the individual's voter registration form has been accepted and that the individual is registered to vote;(ii)informs the individual of the procedure for designating or changing the individual's political affiliation;(iii)informs the individual of the procedure to cancel a voter registration;(iv)provides instructions to the voter on how the voter may sign up to receive electronic ballot status notifications via the ballot tracking system described in Section 20A-3a-401.5; and(v)confirms that the individual has chosen to receive electronic ballot status notifications if the individual opted to receive electronic ballot status notifications on the voter registration form;(b)informs the individual that the individual's voter registration form has been rejected and the reason for the rejection; or(c)(i)informs the individual that the individual's voter registration form is being returned to the individual for further action because the form is incomplete; and(ii)gives instructions to the individual on how to properly complete the form.

Section 22:
Section 22. Section 20A-2-504 is amended to read:20A-2-504Effective upon governor's approval. Removing names from the official register -- General requirements -- Deceased individuals.(1)The county clerk may not remove a voter's name from the official register solely because the voter has failed to vote in an election.(2)The county clerk shall remove a voter's name from the official register if:(a)the voter dies and the requirements of Subsection (3)(4) are met;(b)the county clerk, after complying with the requirements of Section 20A-2-505, receives written confirmation from the voter that the voter no longer resides within the county clerk's county;(c)(i)the county clerk obtains evidence that the voter's residence has changed;(ii)the county clerk mails notice to the voter as required under Section 20A-2-505;(iii)the county clerk:(A)receives no response from the voter; or(B)does not receive information that confirms the voter's residence; and(iv)the voter does not vote or appear to vote in an election during the period beginning on the date of the notice described in Section 20A-2-505 and ending on the day after the date of the second regular general election occurring after the date of the notice;(d)the voter requests, in writing, that the voter's name be removed from the official register;(e)the county clerk receives notice that a voter has been convicted of any felony or a misdemeanor for an offense under this title and the voter's right to vote has not been restored as provided in Section 20A-2-101.3 or 20A-2-101.5; or(f)the county clerk receives notice that a voter has registered to vote in another state after the day on which the voter registered to vote in this state.(3)The lieutenant governor shall make available to a county clerk the United States Social Security Administration data received by the lieutenant governor regarding deceased individuals.(3)(4)The county clerk shall remove a voter's name from the official register within five business days after the day on which the county clerk :(a)receives, from the lieutenant governor, the information described in Subsection (3) or 26B-8-114(11) in relation to the voter; or(b)receives confirmation from the Office of Vital Records and Statistics that the voter is deceased.(4)(5)No later than 90 calendar days before each primary election day and general election day, :(a)the county clerk shall update the official register by reviewing the official register and taking the actions permitted or required by law under this section, Section 20A-2-503, and Section 20A-2-505.; and(b)the lieutenant governor shall compare the records that the lieutenant governor receives under Subsections (3) and 26B-8-114(11) to the official register to ensure that each county clerk complies with Subsection (4).

Section 23:
Section 23. Section 20A-2-505 is amended to read:20A-2-505Effective 04/06/26. Removing names from the official register -- Determining and confirming change of residence.(1)A county clerk may not remove a voter's name from the official register on the grounds that the voter has changed residence unless the voter:(a)confirms in writing that the voter has changed residence to a place outside the county; or(b)(i)does not vote in an election during the period beginning on the date of the notice described in Subsection (3), and ending on the day after the date of the second regular general election occurring after the date of the notice; and(ii)does not respond to the notice described in Subsection (3).(2)(a)Within 31 calendar days after the day on which a county clerk obtains information that a voter's address has changed, if it appears that the voter still resides within the same county, the county clerk shall:(i)change the official register to show the voter's new address; and(ii)send to the voter, by forwardable mail, the notice described in Subsection (3).(b)When a county clerk obtains information that a voter's address has changed and it appears that the voter now resides in a different county, the county clerk shall verify the changed residence by sending to the voter, by forwardable mail, the notice described in Subsection (3), printed on a postage prepaid, preaddressed return form.(3)(a)Each county clerk shall use substantially the following form to notify voters whose addresses have changed:(i)the first part of the form shall include the following:                        "VOTER REGISTRATION NOTICEWe have been notified that your residence has changed.  Please read, complete, and return this form so that we can update our voter registration records.  What is your current street address?___________________________________________________________________________Street  City CountyStateZipWhat is your current phone number (optional)?________________________________What is your current email address (optional)?_________________________________";(ii)beginning on January 1, 2027, immediately following the portion of the form described in Subsection (3)(a)(i), the form shall include the following:"Do you consent to the election officer providing the following information to the political party with which you affiliate? (optional): The email address you provided above? Yes No The phone number you provided above? Yes No"; and(iii)following the portions of the form required under Subsections (3)(a)(i) and (ii), the form shall include the following:"If you have not changed your residence, or have moved but stayed within the same county, you must complete and return this form to the county clerk so that it is received by the county clerk before 5 p.m. no later than 30 calendar days before the date of the election.  If you fail to return this form within that time:- you may be required to show evidence of your address to the poll worker before being allowed to vote in either of the next two regular general elections; or- if you fail to vote at least once, from the date this notice was mailed until the passing of two regular general elections, you will no longer be registered to vote.  If you have changed your residence and have moved to a different county in Utah, you may register to vote by contacting the county clerk in your county.________________________________________Signature of VoterPRIVACY INFORMATIONVoter registration records contain some information that is available to the public, such as your name, address, and age range. Your date of birth, driver license number, state identification card number, and social security number are available only to an authorized government entity. Your email address and phone number are also only available to an authorized government entity, unless you have consented, above, to disclose them to the political party with which you choose to affiliate.REQUEST FOR ADDITIONAL PRIVACY PROTECTIONIn addition to the protections provided above, you may request that your voter registration record be withheld from public disclosure if you are, or reside with: an individual who is a victim of, or is threatened with, domestic violence or dating violence; a law enforcement officer; a member of the armed forces; a public figure; or an individual who is protected by a court order.To make this request for additional privacy protection, you must prove that you qualify by submitting an at-risk designation request form, and any required proof, to your county clerk. You may obtain the form, and information on the proof required, from your county clerk or at the following website [insert the website address specified by the lieutenant governor]."Voter registration records contain some information that is available to the public, such as your name and address, some information that is available only to government entities, and some information that is available only to certain third parties in accordance with the requirements of law.Your driver license number, identification card number, social security number, email address, full date of birth, and phone number are available only to government entities. Your year of birth is available to political parties, candidates for public office, certain third parties, and their contractors, employees, and volunteers, in accordance with the requirements of law.You may request that all information on your voter registration records be withheld from all persons other than government entities, political parties, candidates for public office, and their contractors, employees, and volunteers, by indicating here:_____ Yes, I request that all information on my voter registration records be withheld from all persons other than government entities, political parties, candidates for public office, and their contractors, employees, and volunteers.REQUEST FOR ADDITIONAL PRIVACY PROTECTIONIn addition to the protections provided above, you may request that identifying information on your voter registration records be withheld from all political parties, candidates for public office, and their contractors, employees, and volunteers, by submitting a withholding request form, and any required verification, as described in the following paragraphs.A person may request that identifying information on the person's voter registration records be withheld from all political parties, candidates for public office, and their contractors, employees, and volunteers, by submitting a withholding request form with this registration record, or to the lieutenant governor or a county clerk, if the person is or is likely to be, or resides with a person who is or is likely to be, a victim of domestic violence or dating violence.A person may request that identifying information on the person's voter registration records be withheld from all political parties, candidates for public office, and their contractors, employees, and volunteers, by submitting a withholding request form and any required verification with this registration form, or to the lieutenant governor or a county clerk, if the person is, or resides with a person who is, a law enforcement officer, a member of the armed forces, a public figure, or protected by a protective order or a protection order."(b)The form described in Subsection (3)(a) shall also include:(i)a section in substantially the following form:"------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------BALLOT NOTIFICATIONSDo you consent to receive communications about the status of your ballot and other official communications, by text, at the phone number you provided above?             Yes          No        ------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------"; and(ii)no later than November 5, 2025, the following, immediately after the question described in Subsection (3)(b)(i):"Indicate below how you want to vote in upcoming elections:_____ Mail a ballot to me._____ Do not mail a ballot to me. I will vote in person."(4)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (4)(b), the county clerk may not remove the names of any voters from the official register during the 90 calendar days before a regular primary election or the 90 calendar days before a regular general election.(b)The county clerk may remove the names of voters from the official register during the 90 calendar days before a regular primary election or the 90 calendar days before a regular general election if:(i)the voter requests, in writing, that the voter's name be removed; or(ii)the voter dies.(c)(i)After a county clerk mails a notice under this section, the county clerk shall, unless otherwise prohibited by law, list that voter as inactive.(ii)If a county clerk receives a returned voter identification card, determines that there was no clerical error causing the card to be returned, and has no further information to contact the voter, the county clerk shall, unless otherwise prohibited by law, list that voter as inactive.(iii)An inactive voter may vote, sign petitions, and have all other privileges of a registered voter.(iv)A county is not required to:(A)send routine mailings to an inactive voter; or(B)count inactive voters when dividing precincts and preparing supplies.(5)The lieutenant governor shall make available to a county clerk United States Social Security Administration data received by the lieutenant governor regarding deceased individuals.(6)A county clerk shall, within 10 business days after the day on which the county clerk receives the information described in Subsection (5) or Subsections 26B-8-114(11) and (12) relating to a decedent whose name appears on the official register, remove the decedent's name from the official register.(7)Ninety calendar days before each primary and general election the lieutenant governor shall compare the information the lieutenant governor has received under Subsection 26B-8-114(11) with the official register of voters to ensure that all deceased voters have been removed from the official register.

Section 24:
Section 24. Section 20A-2-601 is enacted to read:6. Provision and Protection of Voter Data20A-2-601Effective upon governor's approval. Definitions.As used in this part:(1)"Age range" means one of the following age ranges within which a registered voter's age falls:(a)18 through 19 years old;(b)20 through 22 years old;(c)23 through 25 years old;(d)26 through 30 years old;(e)31 through 35 years old;(f)36 through 40 years old;(g)41 through 45 years old;(h)46 through 55 years old; or(i)an age range above the age range described in Subsection (1)(h), in increasing 10-year increments.(2)"Armed forces" means the same as that term is defined in Section 20A-1-513.(3)"At-risk voter" means a voter who is designated as an at-risk voter under Subsection 20A-2-602(4)(a) or Section 20A-2-606.(4)(a)"Candidate for public office" means an individual:(i)who files a declaration of candidacy for a public office;(ii)who files a notice of intent to gather signatures under Section 20A-9-408; or(iii)who is employed by, under contract with, or a volunteer of, an individual described in Subsection (4)(a)(i) or (ii), who is authorized to act on behalf of the individual described in Subsection (4)(a)(i) or (ii) for political purposes.(b)"Candidate for public office" does not include:(i)an individual described in Subsection (4)(a)(i) or (ii) who is eliminated as a candidate for:(A)failure to qualify for the primary election ballot via signature-gathering or convention;(B)failure to advance to the general election; or(C)any other reason provided by law; or(ii)an individual who is employed by, under contract with, or a volunteer of, an individual described in Subsection (4)(b)(i).(5)"Dating violence" means the same as that term is defined in Section 78B-7-102 and the federal Violence Against Women Act of 1994, as amended.(6)"Domestic violence" means the same as that term is defined in Section 77-36-1 and the federal Violence Against Women Act of 1994, as amended.(7)(a)"Government entity" means:(i)the state; or(ii)a county, city, town, school district, special district, special service district, or other political subdivision of the state.(b)"Government entity" includes an agency, bureau, office, department, division, board, commission, institution, laboratory, or other instrumentality of an entity described in Subsection (7)(a).(8)"Government official" means:(a)an elected or appointed officer of a government entity; or(b)an employee of a government entity.(9)"Mailed ballot report" means the following information for an election:(a)for each public registered voter:(i)the voter's voter identification number;(ii)the voter's full legal name;(iii)the voter's complete residential address, including the unit type and number;(iv)the voter's county of residence;(v)the voter's precinct and congressional district;(vi)the date the election officer created the ballot order;(vii)the date the ballot was processed; and(viii)the voter's party affiliation or status as unaffiliated; and(b)for each at-risk voter, the information described in Subsections (9)(a)(iv) through (viii), without disclosing the identity of the voter.(10)"Political party" means the same as that term is defined in Section 20A-1-102.(11)"Political purpose" means to lawfully engage in, bring about, prevent, advocate for or against, or otherwise influence a political activity or process, including:(a)candidacy for public office;(b)a ballot measure;(c)voting;(d)an election;(e)a political caucus or convention;(f)political party administration; or(g)circulating a political petition.(12)"Public office" means the offices of governor, lieutenant governor, attorney general, state auditor, state treasurer, state senator, state representative, state school board member, or an elective office of a local political subdivision.(13)"Public registered voter" means a registered voter who is not an at-risk voter.(14)"Standard voter data" means the following information from a voter registration record:(a)the voter's full legal name;(b)the voter's voter identification number and federal information processing series geographic code;(c)the voter's age range;(d)the voter's complete residential address, including the unit type and number;(e)the voter's county of residence;(f)the voter's mailing address, including the city;(g)the voter's precinct, congressional district, state House of Representatives district, state Senate district, state school board district, local school board district, county council district, and city council district;(h)the voter's party affiliation or status as unaffiliated;(i)the voter's status as active or inactive;(j)the last day on which the voter's voter registration record was updated; and(k)the voting history of the voter.(15)"Voted report" means, the following information for an election:(a)for a public registered voter:(i)the voter's voter identification number;(ii)the voter's full legal name;(iii)the voter's complete residential address, including the unit type and number;(iv)the voter's county of residence;(v)the voter's precinct and congressional district;(vi)the method by which the voter voted;(vii)the date the ballot was processed; and(viii)the voter's party affiliation or status as unaffiliated; and(b)for an at-risk voter, the information described in Subsections (15)(a)(iv) through (viii), without disclosing the identity of the voter.(16)"Voting history" means the following information in relation to a registered voter for an election held in the preceding eight years:(a)the voter's voter identification number;(b)the voter's full legal name;(c)the voter's status as active or inactive;(d)the voter's precinct; and(e)whether the voter voted in that election.

Section 25:
Section 25. Section 20A-2-602 is enacted to read:20A-2-602Effective upon governor's approval. Change of voter registration record disclosure status -- Notice -- Redesignation of status.(1)On or before April 6, 2026, the lieutenant governor shall mail to each registered voter whose voter registration record is designated as withheld:(a)an at-risk designation request form;(b)the following written notice:"Notice of Voter Registration Record Status ChangeYou are receiving this notice because your voter registration record is currently classified as withheld and is not subject to public disclosure. Your voter registration will no longer be classified as withheld, and will be subject to public disclosure unless, before May 6, 2026, you submit the enclosed at-risk designation request form, and the required proof that you qualify as an at-risk voter, to your county clerk. If you do not take this action before May 6, 2026, or if you do not qualify as an at-risk voter, you will be designated as a public registered voter.As a public registered voter, the following information from your voter registration record is subject to public disclosure: full legal name; voter identification number and federal information processing series geographic code; age range; complete residential address, including the unit type and number; county of residence; mailing address, including the city; voting precinct, congressional district, state House of Representatives district, state Senate district, state school board district, local school board district, county council district, and city council district; party affiliation or status as unaffiliated; status as an active or inactive voter; the last day on which your registration record was updated; and your voting history.You may apply for designation as an at-risk voter in accordance with Utah Code Section 20A-2-606 at any time, but if the application is not received by your county clerk before May 6, 2026, your information, described above will, beginning on May 25, 2026, be subject to public disclosure, unless and until you request and receive designation as an at-risk voter.A person who uses or discloses information from a voter registration record in a manner that is prohibited by law, including information in a voter registration that is subject to public disclosure, is subject to criminal prosecution."; and(c)immediately after the notice described in Subsection (1)(b), a brief, concise statement of:(i)the qualifications to become an at-risk voter; and(ii)how to apply for designation as an at-risk voter.(2)On or before April 8, 2026, the lieutenant governor shall mail to each registered voter whose voter registration record is designated as private:(a)the following written notice:"Notice of Voter Registration Record Status ChangeYou are receiving this notice because your voter registration record is currently classified as private and is not subject to public disclosure. Your voter registration will no longer be classified as private, and will be subject to public disclosure unless, before May 6, 2026, you submit the enclosed at-risk designation request form, and the required proof that you qualify as an at-risk voter, to your county clerk. If you do not take this action before May 6, 2026, or if you do not qualify as an at-risk voter, you will be designated as a public registered voter.As a public registered voter, the following information from your voter registration record is subject to public disclosure: full legal name; voter identification number and federal information processing series geographic code; age range; complete residential address, including the unit type and number; county of residence; mailing address, including the city; voting precinct, congressional district, state House of Representatives district, state Senate district, state school board district, local school board district, county council district, and city council district; party affiliation or status as unaffiliated; status as an active or inactive voter; the last day on which your registration record was updated; and your voting history.You may apply for designation as an at-risk voter in accordance with Utah Code Section 20A-2-606 at any time, but if the application is not received by your county clerk before May 6, 2026, your information, described above will, beginning on May 25, 2026, be subject to public disclosure, unless and until you request and receive designation as an at-risk voter.A person who uses or discloses information from a voter registration record in a manner that is prohibited by law, including information in a voter registration that is subject to public disclosure, is subject to criminal prosecution."; and(b)immediately after the notice described in Subsection (2)(a), a brief, concise statement of:(i)the qualifications to become an at-risk voter;(ii)how to apply for designation as an at-risk voter; and(iii)how to obtain an at-risk voter designation request form.(3)A county clerk who receives a completed at-risk designation request form on or before May 6, 2026, shall, on or before May 21, 2026:(a)process the form; and(b)(i)if, based on the information provided in the form and the supporting documents provided with the form, the county clerk determines that the voter has established that the voter qualifies as an at-risk voter, designate the voter as an at-risk voter; or(ii)if, based on the information provided in the form and the supporting documents provided with the form, the county clerk does not make the determination described in Subsection (3)(b)(i), the county clerk shall, as soon as reasonably possible, notify the voter, by mail or other means:(A)that the county clerk was not able to make the determination described in Subsection (3)(b)(i);(B)of the reason that the county clerk was not able to make the determination described in Subsection (3)(b)(i); and(C)of what, if anything, the voter can do to resolve the reason the county clerk was not able to make the determination described in Subsection (3)(b)(i).(4)On or before May 24, 2026, the lieutenant governor or a county clerk shall:(a)designate a current registered voter as an at-risk voter if:(i)before May 12, 2020, the voter's voter registration record was protected from disclosure due to the election officer determining that the voter was facing a threat or risk of harm;(ii)on or after May 12, 2020, the voter was designated as a withheld voter; or(iii)on or before May 24, 2026, the voter was designated as an at-risk voter under Subsection 20A-2-606; and(b)designate a current registered voter who is not designated as an at-risk voter under Subsection (4)(a) as a public registered voter.(5)After the lieutenant governor or a county clerk finishes taking the action described in Subsection (4):(a)a voter designated as an at-risk voter shall maintain the designation, unless and until:(i)the voter is removed from the list of registered voters in accordance with the requirements of this chapter;(ii)the voter requests removal of the designation; or(iii)the designation is removed in accordance with Subsection 20A-2-606(6); and(b)a voter designated as a public registered voter shall maintain the designation, unless and until the voter is designated as an at-risk voter in accordance with Section 20A-2-606.(6)Beginning on January 1, 2027, the lieutenant governor shall ensure that the Statewide Electronic Voter Information Website provides a process where:(a)an individual may enter a voter identification number;(b)the website will respond to the entry described in Subsection (6)(a) with:(i)the current political party affiliation of the voter to which the voter identification relates; and(ii)the last date on which the voter's voter registration was updated; and(c)the website will not provide any information, other than the information described in Subsection (6)(b), in response to the entry described in Subsection (6)(a).(7)As soon as possible, but no later than January 1, 2027, the lieutenant governor shall post the following information on the lieutenant governor's website, and update the information on a monthly basis:(a)for the entire state:(i)the total number of at-risk voters in the state; and(ii)the total number of at-risk voters in the state who are affiliated with a political party; and(b)for each state House of Representatives district and each state Senate district:(i)the total number of at-risk voters in the district; and(ii)the total number of at-risk voters in the district who are affiliated with a political party.

Section 26:
Section 26. Section 20A-2-603 is enacted to read:20A-2-603Effective 04/06/26. General request for voter registration records.(1)Except as otherwise provided in this section, this part, or another express provision of law, upon receiving a request under this section from a person for voter registration records, the lieutenant governor or a county clerk:(a)shall disclose to the person the standard voter data from a public registered voter's voter registration record; and(b)may not disclose to the person:(i)information from a public registered voter's voter registration record that is not standard voter data; or(ii)any information from an at-risk voter's voter registration record.(2)A person that receives information under Subsection (1)(a):(a)shall ensure, using industry standard security measures, that the information may not be accessed by another person, unless the other person is an authorized agent of the person that receives the information under Subsection (1)(a);(b)may only use the information in a manner the person is permitted to use the information under Subsection 20A-2-607(3);(c)may not:(i)use or share the information for a purpose other than a purpose described in Subsection (2)(b); or(ii)grant access to the information to a person other than an authorized agent of the person that receives the information under Subsection (1)(a);(d)notwithstanding Subsection (2)(b), may not grant access to the information or share the information with another person, if the person that receives the information under this section believes that the other person:(i)will use or share the information in a manner other than a manner described in Subsection (2)(b); or(ii)will not comply with Subsection (2)(a), (b), or (c); and(e)may limit access by an authorized agent of the person to only the portion of the information needed for the authorized agent to fulfill a purpose for which the authorized agent is:(i)permitted by law to use the information; and(ii)authorized by the person who receives the information under Subsection (1)(a).(3)Before providing the information described in Subsection (1)(a) to a person under this section:(a)if an individual is requesting the information on behalf of another person, the lieutenant governor or county clerk shall verify that the individual requesting the information on behalf of the other person is an authorized agent of the other person; and(b)the individual requesting the information under Subsection (3)(a) shall sign a request form that includes:(i)the name, address, and telephone number of the person that is seeking the information;(ii)the individual's name, address, and telephone number;(iii)a statement that the individual is requesting the information:(A)on the individual's own behalf; or(B)as an authorized agent of the other person described in Subsection (3)(a) and has presented to the lieutenant governor or the county clerk valid verification that the individual is an authorized agent of the other person;(iv)a statement that the individual and, if applicable, the other person described in Subsection (3)(a):(A)will comply with the requirements described in Subsection (2); and(B)will not provide or use the information obtained from the list of registered voters in a manner that is prohibited by law;(v)a statement that obtaining the information under false pretenses, or providing or using the information in a manner that is prohibited by law, is punishable as a class A misdemeanor and by a civil fine; and(vi)notice that if a person makes a false statement in the request form, the person is punishable by law under Section 76-8-504.(c)The lieutenant governor or a county clerk may not disclose the information described in Subsection (1)(a) to a person requesting the information under this section if the lieutenant governor or county clerk has probable cause to believe that the person:(i)is not the person whom the person claims to be;(ii)is not an agent of the person of whom the person claims to be an agent; or(iii)will use or share the information in a manner prohibited by law.

Section 27:
Section 27. Section 20A-2-604 is enacted to read:20A-2-604Effective 04/06/26. Request for voter registration records by political party -- Confirmation of political party affiliation.(1)Except as otherwise provided in this section or another express provision of law, upon receiving a request from a political party for voter registration records, the lieutenant governor or a county clerk:(a)for each public registered voter who is not affiliated with the political party:(i)shall provide to the political party the voter's standard voter data; and(ii)may not provide to the political party any information from the public registered voter's voter registration record that is not standard voter data;(b)for each public registered voter who is affiliated with the political party:(i)shall provide to the political party the voter's standard voter data;(ii)beginning January 1, 2027, shall provide the public registered voter's phone number, only if the voter consents on the voter's voter registration form to the election officer disclosing the voter's phone number to the political party;(iii)beginning January 1, 2027, shall provide the public registered voter's email address, only if the voter consents on the voter's voter registration form to the election officer disclosing the voter's email address to the political party; and(iv)may not provide to the political party any information relating to the voter other than the information provided in accordance with Subsections (1)(b)(i) through (iii); and(c)may not provide to the political party any information from an at-risk voter's voter registration record.(2)If an at-risk voter consents, on the voter's voter registration form, to provide the political party with which the voter chooses to affiliate with the voter's phone number or email address, the county clerk or the lieutenant governor:(a)may not provide the phone number or email address to the political party; and(b)shall notify the at-risk voter that the voter must contact the political party directly to provide the voter's phone number or email address to the political party.(3)A political party, or an agent of a political party, that receives information under this section:(a)shall ensure, using industry standard security measures, that the information may not be accessed by a person other than the political party or an authorized agent of the political party;(b)may only use the information:(i)to communicate with an individual who is affiliated with the political party in relation to the business of the political party or for a political purpose;(ii)to verify that the voter is a member of the political party;(iii)to conduct demographic or other analysis for a political purpose; or(iv)for a purpose described in Subsection 20A-2-607(3);(c)may not:(i)use or share the information for a purpose other than a purpose described in Subsection (3)(b); or(ii)grant access to the information to a person other than an authorized agent of the political party;(d)notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a) or (b), may not grant access to the information or share the information with a person whom the political party believes:(i)will use or share the information in a manner other than a manner described in Subsection (3)(b); or(ii)will not comply with Subsection (3)(a), (b), or (c); and(e)may limit access by an authorized agent to only the portion of the information needed for the authorized agent to fulfill a purpose for which the authorized agent is:(i)permitted by law to use the information; and(ii)authorized by the state political party to use the information.(4)Before providing the information described in this section to a political party:(a)the lieutenant governor or county clerk shall verify that the individual requesting the information on behalf of the political party is an authorized agent of the political party; and(b)the individual requesting the information under Subsection (4)(a) shall sign a request form that includes:(i)the name, address, and telephone number of the political party that is seeking the information;(ii)the individual's name, address, and telephone number;(iii)a statement that the individual is an authorized agent of the political party and has presented to the lieutenant governor or the county clerk valid verification that the individual is an authorized agent of the political party;(iv)a statement that the political party and the individual will comply with the requirements described in Subsection (3);(v)a statement that the political party, or an agent of the political party, will not provide or use the information obtained from the list of registered voters in a manner that is prohibited by law;(vi)a statement that obtaining the information under false pretenses, or providing or using the information in a manner that is prohibited by law, is punishable as a class A misdemeanor and by a civil fine; and(vii)notice that if a person makes a false statement in the request form, the person is punishable by law under Section 76-8-504.(5)The lieutenant governor or a county clerk may not disclose the information described in Subsection (1)(a) or (b) to a person requesting the information under this section if the lieutenant governor or county clerk has probable cause to believe that the person:(a)is not a political party or an agent of the political party; or(b)will use or share the information in a manner prohibited by law.

Section 28:
Section 28. Section 20A-2-605 is enacted to read:20A-2-605Effective 04/06/26. Request for voter registration records by a government official.(1)Except as otherwise provided in this section or another express provision of law, upon request by a government official acting in the government official's capacity as a government official, the lieutenant governor or a county clerk:(a)shall disclose to the government official only the information in a voter registration record necessary to permit the government official to fulfill an official duty imposed by law on the government official; and(b)may not disclose to the government official the information in a voter registration record that is not necessary to permit the government official to fulfill an official duty imposed by law on the government official.(2)A government official who receives information under Subsection (1)(a):(a)shall ensure, using industry standard security measures, that the information may not be accessed by a person other than the government official or the government entity that the government official represents;(b)may only use the information to the extent necessary to fulfill a duty of the government official; and(c)may not disclose the information to a person other than a person needing the information to fulfill a duty of the government official or the government entity that the government official represents.(3)Before providing the information described in Subsection (1)(a) to a government official:(a)the lieutenant governor or county clerk shall verify that:(i)the person requesting the information is a government official; and(ii)it is necessary to provide the information requested to permit the government official to fulfill an official duty imposed by law on the government official; and(b)the government official requesting the information shall sign a request form that includes:(i)the name, address, and telephone number of the government official;(ii)the government official's position or title;(iii)a description of the information requested;(iv)a description of the official duty imposed by law on the government official that requires the requested information;(v)a statement that the government official will ensure, using industry standard security measures, that the information may not be accessed by a person other than the government official or the government entity that the government official represents;(vi)a statement that the government official will only use the information to the extent necessary to fulfill an official duty imposed by law on the government official;(vii)an assertion that the government official will not provide or use the information obtained from the voter registration records in a manner that is prohibited by law;(viii)a statement that obtaining the information under false pretenses, or providing or using the information from the voter registration records in a manner that is prohibited by law, is punishable as a class A misdemeanor and a civil fine; and(ix)notice that if the person signing the request form makes a false statement in the request form, the person is punishable by law under Section 76-8-504.(4)The lieutenant governor or a county clerk may not disclose the information under this section if the lieutenant governor or county clerk reasonably believes that the person:(a)is not a government official;(b)does not need the information requested to fulfill an official duty imposed by law on the government official; or(c)will provide or use the information in a manner prohibited by law.

Section 29:
Section 29. Section 20A-2-606 is enacted to read:20A-2-606Effective 04/06/26. At-risk registered voter -- Application -- Designation -- Change of status.(1)Except to the extent expressly authorized in this part or otherwise expressly provided by law, the lieutenant governor or a county clerk may not disclose an at-risk voter's voter registration record, or any information from an at-risk voter's voter registration record.(2)(a)The lieutenant governor shall design and distribute an at-risk designation request form to each election officer and to each agency that provides a voter registration form.(b)The director of elections within the Office of the Lieutenant Governor may make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, establishing requirements for providing the proof described in Subsections (4)(a)(ii) and (b)(ii).(3)The following may not encourage an individual to submit, or discourage an individual from submitting, an at-risk designation request form:(a)an election officer;(b)an agency described in Subsection (2)(a); or(c)an employee of a person described in Subsection (3)(a) or (b).(4)A voter may apply for designation as an at-risk voter by submitting, either with the voter's voter registration form, or separately to the voter's county clerk:(a)(i)an at-risk designation request form indicating that the voter is, or resides with, an individual who is a victim of, or who is threatened with, domestic violence or dating violence; and(ii)in accordance with any rules made under Subsection (2)(b), proof of the indication described in Subsection (4)(a)(i) in the form of a sworn affidavit where the voter swears to the following statement: "I am applying for designation as an at-risk voter because I am, or I reside with, an individual who is a victim of, or who is threatened with, domestic violence or dating violence."; or(b)(i)an at-risk designation request form indicating that the voter, or an individual who resides with the voter, is a law enforcement officer, a public figure, a member of the armed forces, or protected by a protective order or protection order; and(ii)in accordance with any rules made under Subsection (2)(b), proof of the indication described in Subsection (4)(b)(i).(5)A county clerk shall designate a voter as an at-risk voter if the voter complies with Subsection (4).(6)A county clerk shall, beginning in 2030, and every five years after 2030, before July 15:(a)mail to each voter who, for a period of one year or longer, has been designated as an at-risk voter:(i)notice that the voter is designated as an at-risk voter and the grounds for the designation;(ii)a list of the grounds for designating a voter as an at-risk voter;(iii)an inquiry regarding whether the voter still qualifies as an at-risk voter; and(iv)a self-addressed envelope, with postage prepaid, for the voter to mail the voter's response to the inquiry described in Subsection (6)(a)(iii); and(b)remove the designation of a voter as an at-risk voter if the voter responds that the voter no longer qualifies as an at-risk voter.

Section 30:
Section 30. Section 20A-2-607 is enacted to read:20A-2-607Effective upon governor's approval. Applicability and enforcement -- Transition.(1)This part does not govern or restrict the release of a voter registration record:(a)to an election officer or an employee of an election officer;(b)for a government purpose relating to maintaining the voter registration list or the administration of an election;(c)to the extent required by law, to the federal government to comply with, or verify compliance with, the requirements of federal election law;(d)in accordance with an order of a court with jurisdiction; or(e)to a federal, state, or local law enforcement agency for a legitimate law enforcement purpose related to election law.(2)Beginning on March 9, 2026, and ending on May 25, 2026, a person that requests a copy of the voter registration list:(a)will receive the portion of the list, as the list existed on March 8, 2026, that the person was eligible to receive on March 8, 2026; and(b)will not receive an updated version of the list, or of any information in an updated version of the list, until May 25, 2026.(3)A person may only obtain or use information from the list of registered voters for:(a)a political purpose;(b)another purpose for which the person is, under this part, expressly permitted to obtain or use the information; or(c)another purpose for which the person is permitted to obtain or use the information:(i)under a provision of state or federal law; or(ii)by order of a court with jurisdiction.(4)It is unlawful for a person to:(a)obtain information from the list of registered voters under false pretenses;(b)obtain or use information from the list of registered voters for a purpose other than:(i)a political purpose;(ii)another purpose for which the person is, under this part, expressly permitted to obtain or use the information; or(iii)another purpose for which the person is permitted to obtain or use the information:(A)under a provision of state or federal law; or(B)by order of a court with jurisdiction;(c)knowingly post on the internet or otherwise disclose to the public, for a fee or free of charge, the list of registered voters or information obtained from the list of registered voters; or(d)knowingly disclose information from the list of registered voters in a manner that is not permitted by law.(5)A violation of Subsection (4) is a class A misdemeanor.

Section 31:
Section 31. Section 20A-2-608, which is renumbered from Section 20A-5-410 is renumbered and amended to read:20A-5-41020A-2-608Effective 04/06/26. Election officer to keep voting history information and status -- Restrictions.(1)As used in this section, "voting history record" means the following information relating to a registered voter:(a)the information in the voter's voter registration record, other than the information classified as private under Subsection 63G-2-302(1)(j);(b)the voter's privacy status;(c)the voter's status as active or inactive;(d)the voter's voter identification number;(e)the voter's federal information processing system code;(f)the voter's precinct;(g)each political district in which the voter is a resident;(h)a list of elections in which the voter voted;(i)whether the voter voted in person on election day;(j)whether the voter voted in person before election day;(k)whether the voter returned a mailed ballot;(l)whether the voter's ballot was mailed to an alternate address; and(m)the date on which the voter voted or on which the voter returned a mailed ballot.(2)(a)Each election officer shall maintain, in the election officer's office, a voting history record of those voters registered to vote in the election officer's jurisdiction.(b)The voting history record is a public record under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, except:(i)as it relates to a voter whose voter registration record is classified as private under Subsection 63G-2-302(1)(k) or (l); or(ii)a record or information described in Subsection 63G-2-302(1)(n).(1)A county clerk shall maintain:(a)for each registered voter:(i)the standard voter information for that voter; and(ii)whether the voter is a public registered voter or an at-risk voter; and(b)only during the time period beginning on the day on which the bulk of ballots are mailed for an election and ending at the close of operating hours on the day before the election, a voted report and a mailed ballot report for the election.(2)(a)Except as provided under Subsection (2)(b), the county clerk shall retain a copy of each voter registration form in a permanent countywide alphabetical file, which may be electronic or some other recognized system.(b)The county clerk may transfer a superseded voter registration form to the Division of Archives and Records Service created under Section 63A-12-101.(c)A county clerk shall retain a list of currently registered voters.(d)The lieutenant governor shall maintain a list of registered voters in electronic form.(e)If there are any discrepancies between the lists described in Subsections (2)(c) and (d), the county clerk's list is the official list.(3)Subsection (1) or (2) does not authorize the disclosure of the information described in Subsection (1) or (2) beyond the extent expressly provided in this part.(3)(a)When an election officer reports voting history for an election, the election officer shall, for each voter whose voter registration is classified as private under Subsection 20A-2-104(4)(h), report the following, for that election only, without disclosing the identity of the voter:(i)for voting by mail, the information described in Subsection (4)(a);(ii)for early voting, the date the individual voted; and(iii)for voting on election day, the date the individual voted.(b)In relation to the information of a voter whose voter registration is classified as private under Subsection 20A-2-104(4)(h), a report described in Subsection (3)(a) may not disclose, by itself or in conjunction with any other public information, the identity or any other personal identifying information of the voter.(4)Subject to Subsection (5), the election officer shall ensure that the voting history record kept by the election officer for each voting precinct contains:(a)for voting by mail:(i)the date that the manual ballot was mailed to the voter; and(ii)the date that the voted manual ballot was received by the election officer;(b)for early voting:(i)the name and address of each individual who participated in early voting; and(ii)the date the individual voted; and(c)for voting on election day, the name and address of each individual who voted on election day.(5)Subsection (4) does not authorize the disclosure of the information described in Subsection (4) beyond the extent expressly provided in Subsections (2) and (3).(4)A person may, on a subscription basis, obtain the voted report and the mailed ballot report during the time period described in Subsection (1)(b).(6)(5)(a)Notwithstanding the time limits for response to a request for records under Section 63G-2-204 or the time limits for a request for records established in any ordinance, the election officer shall ensure that the information required to be disclosed under this sectionpart is recorded and made available to the public, upon request and subject to the provisions of this part, no later than one business day after the day on which the election officer receives the information.(b)Notwithstanding the fee requirements of Section 63G-2-203 or the fee requirements established in any ordinance, the election officer shall make copies of the voting history record available to the public, in accordance with this section, for the actual cost of production or copyingprovide the information disclosed under this section, Section  20A-6-603, or Section 20A-6-604, in accordance with the fees established under Subsection 63G-2-203(10).

Section 32:
Section 32. Section 20A-3a-401 is amended to read:20A-3a-401Effective 04/06/26. Custody of voted ballots mailed or deposited in a ballot drop box -- Disposition -- Notice -- Disclosures relating to unresolved ballots.(1)This section governs ballots returned by mail, via a ballot drop box, or by other legal means.(2)Poll workers shall process return envelopes containing manual ballots that are in the custody of the poll workers in accordance with this section.(3)Poll workers shall examine a return envelope to make the determinations described in Subsection (4).(4)The poll workers shall take the action described in Subsection (5)(a) if the poll workers determine:(a)for an election held before January 1, 2029:(i)that the return envelope contains the last four digits of the voter's Utah driver license number, Utah state identification card number, or social security number; or(ii)if the return envelope does not contain the digits described in Subsection (4)(a)(i), that:(A)in accordance with the rules made under Subsection (13), the signature on the affidavit of the return envelope is reasonably consistent with the individual's signature in the voter registration records; or(B)for an individual who checks the box described in Subsection (7)(d)(v), the signature is verified by alternative means;(b)for an election held on or after January 1, 2029:(i)that the return envelope contains the last four digits of the voter's Utah driver license number, Utah state identification card number, or social security number;(ii)if the return envelope does not contain the digits described in Subsection (4)(b)(i), that the voter included in the return envelope a copy of the identification described in Subsection 20A-3a-204(2)(c)(ii); or(iii)for a voter described in Subsection 20A-3a-301(7), that the voter complied with Subsection 20A-3a-301(7);(c)that the affidavit is sufficient;(d)that the voter is registered to vote in the correct precinct;(e)that the voter's right to vote the ballot has not been challenged;(f)that the voter has not already voted in the election; and(g)for a voter who has not yet provided valid voter identification with the voter's voter registration, whether the voter has provided valid voter identification with the return envelope.(5)(a)If the poll workers make all of the findings described in Subsection (4), the poll workers shall:(i)remove the manual ballot from the return envelope in a manner that does not destroy the affidavit on the return envelope;(ii)ensure that the ballot is not examined in connection with the return envelope; and(iii)place the ballot with the other ballots to be counted.(b)If the poll workers do not make all of the findings described in Subsection (4), the poll workers shall:(i)disallow the vote;(ii)except as provided in Subsection (6), without opening the return envelope, record the ballot as "rejected" and state the reason for the rejection; and(iii)except as provided in Subsection (6), place the return envelope, unopened, with the other rejected return envelopes.(6)A poll worker may open a return envelope, if necessary, to determine compliance with Subsection (4)(b)(ii), (4)(b)(iii), or (4)(g).(7)(a)If the poll workers reject an individual's ballot because the poll workers determine that the return envelope does not comply with Subsection (4), the election officer shall:(i)contact the individual in accordance with Subsection (8); and(ii)inform the individual:(A)that the identification information provided on the return envelope is in question;(B)how the individual may resolve the issue; and(C)that, in order for the ballot to be counted, the individual is required to deliver to the election officer a correctly completed affidavit, provided by the county clerk, that meets the requirements described in Subsection (7)(d).(b)If, under Subsection (4)(a)(ii)(A), the poll workers reject an individual's ballot because the poll workers determine, in accordance with rules made under Subsection (13), that the signature on the return envelope is not reasonably consistent with the individual's signature in the voter registration records, the election officer shall:(i)contact the individual in accordance with Subsection (8); and(ii)inform the individual:(A)that the individual's signature is in question;(B)how the individual may resolve the issue; and(C)that, in order for the ballot to be counted, the individual is required to deliver to the election officer a correctly completed affidavit, provided by the county clerk, that meets the requirements described in Subsection (7)(d).(c)The election officer shall ensure that the notice described in Subsection (7)(a) or (b) includes:(i)when communicating the notice by mail, a printed copy of the affidavit described in Subsection (7)(d) and a courtesy reply envelope;(ii)when communicating the notice electronically, a link to a copy of the affidavit described in Subsection (7)(d) or information on how to obtain a copy of the affidavit; or(iii)when communicating the notice by phone, either during a direct conversation with the voter or in a voicemail, arrangements for the voter to receive a copy of the affidavit described in Subsection (7)(d), either in person from the clerk's office, by mail, or electronically.(d)An affidavit described in Subsection (7)(a)(ii)(C) or (7)(b)(ii)(C) shall include:(i)an attestation that the individual voted the ballot;(ii)a space for the individual to enter the individual's name, date of birth, and driver license number or the last four digits of the individual's social security number;(iii)a space for the individual to sign the affidavit;(iv)a statement that, by signing the affidavit, the individual authorizes the lieutenant governor's and county clerk's use of the information in the affidavit and the individual's signature on the affidavit for voter identification purposes; and(v)a check box accompanied by language in substantially the following form: "I am a voter with a qualifying disability under the Americans with Disabilities Act that impacts my ability to sign my name consistently. I can provide appropriate documentation upon request. To discuss accommodations, I can be contacted at __________________".(e)In order for an individual described in Subsection (7)(a) or (b) to have the individual's ballot counted, the individual shall deliver the affidavit described in Subsection (7)(d) to the election officer.(f)An election officer who receives a signed affidavit under Subsection (7)(e) shall immediately:(i)scan the signature on the affidavit electronically and keep the signature on file in the statewide voter registration database developed under Section 20A-2-502;(ii)if the election officer receives the affidavit no later than noon on the last business day before the day on which the canvass begins, count the individual's ballot; and(iii)if the check box described in Subsection (7)(d)(v) is checked, comply with the rules described in Subsection (13)(c).(8)(a)The election officer shall, within two business days after the day on which an individual's ballot is rejected, notify the individual of the rejection and the reason for the rejection, by phone, mail, email, or, if consent is obtained, text message, unless:(i)the ballot is cured within one business day after the day on which the ballot is rejected; or(ii)the ballot is rejected because the ballot is received late or for another reason that cannot be cured.(b)If an individual's ballot is rejected for a reason described in Subsection (8)(a)(ii), the election officer shall notify the individual of the rejection and the reason for the rejection by phone, mail, email, or, if consent is obtained, text message, within the later of:(i)30 calendar days after the day of the rejection; or(ii)30 calendar days after the day of the election.(c)The election officer may, when notifying an individual by phone under this Subsection (8), use auto-dial technology.(9)An election officer may not count the ballot of an individual whom the election officer contacts under Subsection (7) or (8) unless, no later than noon on the last business day before the day on which the canvass begins, the election officer:(a)receives a signed affidavit from the individual under Subsection (7); or(b)(i)contacts the individual;(ii)if the election officer has reason to believe that an individual, other than the voter to whom the ballot was sent, signed the ballot affidavit, informs the individual that it is unlawful to sign a ballot affidavit for another person, even if the person gives permission;(iii)verifies the identity of the individual by:(A)requiring the individual to provide at least two types of personal identifying information for the individual; and(B)comparing the information provided under Subsection (9)(b)(iii)(A) to records relating to the individual that are in the possession or control of an election officer; and(iv)documents the verification described in Subsection (9)(b)(iii), by recording:(A)the name and voter identification number of the individual contacted;(B)the name of the individual who conducts the verification;(C)the date and manner of the communication;(D)the type of personal identifying information provided by the individual;(E)a description of the records against which the personal identifying information provided by the individual is compared and verified; and(F)other information required by the lieutenant governor.(10)(a)The election officer shall retain and preserve:(i)the return envelopes in accordance with Subsection 20A-4-202(2); and(ii)the documents described in Subsection (9)(b)(iv) in accordance with Subsection 20A-4-202(3).(b)If the election officer complies with Subsection (10)(a)(ii) by including the documentation in the voter's voter registration record, the election officer shall make, retain, and preserve a record of the name and voter identification number of each voter contacted under Subsection (9)(b).(11)(a)The election officer shall record the following in the database used in the verification process:(i)any initial rejection of a ballot under Subsection (5)(b), within one business day after the day on which the election officer rejects the ballot; and(ii)any resolution of a rejection of a ballot under Subsection (9), within one business day after the day on which the ballot rejection is resolved.(b)An election officer shall include, in the canvass report, a final report of the disposition of all rejected and resolved ballots, including, for ballots rejected, the following:(i)the number of ballots rejected because the voter did not sign the voter's ballot; and(ii)the number of ballots rejected because the voter's signatures on the ballot, and in records on file, do not correspond.(12)Willful failure to comply with this section constitutes willful neglect of duty under Section 20A-5-701.(13)The director of elections within the Office of the Lieutenant Governor shall make rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to establish:(a)criteria and processes for use by poll workers in determining if a signature corresponds with the signature on file for the voter under Subsection (4)(a)(ii)(A);(b)training and certification requirements for election officers and employees of election officers regarding the criteria and processes described in Subsection (13)(a); and(c)in compliance with Title II of the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. Secs. 12131 through 12165, an alternative means of verifying the identity of an individual who checks the box described in Subsection (7)(d)(v).(14)(a)Upon request, and subject to Subsections (14)(b) and (c), an election officer may disclose the name and address of a voter whose ballot has been rejected and not yet resolved with:(i)a candidate in the election;(ii)an individual who represents the candidate's campaign;(iii)the sponsors of an initiative or referendum appearing on the ballot; or(iv)for a ballot proposition appearing on the ballot, an individual who represents a political issues committee, as defined in Section 20A-11-101, if the political issues committee supports or opposes the ballot proposition.(b)If an election officer discloses the information described in Subsection (14)(a), the election officer shall:(i)make the disclosure within two business days after the day on which the request is made;(ii)respond to each request in the order the requests were made; and(iii)make each disclosure in a manner, and within a period of time, that does not reflect favoritism to one requestor over another.(c)A disclosure described in this Subsection (14) may not include the name or address of a protected individual, as defined in Subsection 20A-2-104(1)any information relating to an at-risk voter, as defined in Section 20A-2-601.

Section 33:
Section 33. Section 20A-6-105 is amended to read:20A-6-105Effective 04/06/26. Provisional ballot envelopes.(1)Each election officer shall ensure that provisional ballot envelopes are printed in substantially the following form:(a)the envelope shall include the following statement:            "AFFIRMATIONAre you a citizen of the United States of America?  Yes  NoWill you be 18 years old on or before election day? Yes  NoIf you checked "no" in response to either of the two above questions, do not complete this form.Name of Voter _________________________________________________________First MiddleLastDriver License or Identification Card Number _________________________________State of Issuance of Driver License or Identification Card Number _________________Date of Birth ___________________________________________________________Street Address of Principal Place of Residence______________________________________________________________________CityCountyStateZip CodeTelephone Number (optional) ______________________________________________Email Address (optional)__________________________________________________";(b)beginning on January 1, 2027, immediately following the portion of the envelope described in Subsection (1)(a), the envelope shall include the following:"Do you consent to the election officer providing the following information to the political party with which you affiliate? (optional): The email address you provided above? Yes No The phone number you provided above? Yes No";(c)following the statement required under Subsections (1)(a) and (b), the envelope shall include the following:"Last four digits of Social Security Number ____________________________Last former address at which I was registered to vote (if known)______________________________________________________________________CityCountyStateZip CodeVoting Precinct (if known) _________________________________________________I, (please print your full name)__________________________do solemnly swear or affirm:That I am eligible to vote in this election; that I have not voted in this election in any other precinct; that I am eligible to vote in this precinct; and that I request that I be permitted to vote in this precinct; andSubject to penalty of law for false statements, that the information contained in this form is true, and that I am a citizen of the United States and a resident of Utah, residing at the above address; and that I am at least 18 years old and have resided in Utah for the 30 calendar days immediately before this election.Signed ______________________________________________________________________Dated ______________________________________________________________________In accordance with Section 20A-3a-506, wilfully providing false information above is a class B misdemeanor under Utah law and is punishable by imprisonment and by fine.PRIVACY INFORMATIONVoter registration records contain some information that is available to the public, such as your name, address, and age range. Your date of birth, driver license number, state identification card number, and social security number are available only to an authorized government entity. Your email address and phone number are also only available to an authorized government entity, unless you have consented, above, to disclose them to the political party with which you choose to affiliate.REQUEST FOR ADDITIONAL PRIVACY PROTECTIONIn addition to the protections provided above, you may request that your voter registration record be withheld from public disclosure if you are, or reside with: an individual who is a victim of, or is threatened with, domestic violence or dating violence; a law enforcement officer; a member of the armed forces; a public figure; or an individual who is protected by a court order.To make this request for additional privacy protection, you must prove that you qualify by submitting an at-risk designation request form, and any required proof, to your county clerk. You may obtain the form, and information on the proof required, from your county clerk or at the following website [insert the website address specified by the lieutenant governor].Voter registration records contain some information that is available to the public, such as your name and address, some information that is available only to government entities, and some information that is available only to certain third parties in accordance with the requirements of law.Your driver license number, identification card number, social security number, email address, full date of birth, and phone number are available only to government entities. Your year of birth is available to political parties, candidates for public office, certain third parties, and their contractors, employees, and volunteers, in accordance with the requirements of law.You may request that all information on your voter registration records be withheld from all persons other than government entities, political parties, candidates for public office, and their contractors, employees, and volunteers, by indicating here:_____ Yes, I request that all information on my voter registration records be withheld from all persons other than government entities, political parties, candidates for public office, and their contractors, employees, and volunteers.REQUEST FOR ADDITIONAL PRIVACY PROTECTIONIn addition to the protections provided above, you may request that identifying information on your voter registration records be withheld from all political parties, candidates for public office, and their contractors, employees, and volunteers, by submitting a withholding request form, and any required verification, as described in the following paragraphs.A person may request that identifying information on the person's voter registration records be withheld from all political parties, candidates for public office, and their contractors, employees, and volunteers, by submitting a withholding request form with this registration record, or to the lieutenant governor or a county clerk, if the person is or is likely to be, or resides with a person who is or is likely to be, a victim of domestic violence or dating violence.A person may request that identifying information on the person's voter registration records be withheld from all political parties, candidates for public office, and their contractors, employees, and volunteers, by submitting a withholding request form and any required verification with this registration form, or to the lieutenant governor or a county clerk, if the person is, or resides with a person who is, a law enforcement officer, a member of the armed forces, a public figure, or protected by a protective order or a protection order.CITIZENSHIP AFFIDAVITName:Name at birth, if different:Place of birth:Date of birth:Date and place of naturalization (if applicable):I hereby swear and affirm, under penalties for voting fraud set forth below, that I am a citizen and that to the best of my knowledge and belief the information above is true and correct.____________________________Signature of ApplicantIn accordance with Section 20A-2-401, the penalty for willfully causing, procuring, or allowing yourself to be registered to vote if you know you are not entitled to register to vote is up to one year in jail and a fine of up to $2,500."; and(b)(d)the following statement shall appear after the statement described in Subsection (1)(a)(1)(c):                        "BALLOT NOTIFICATIONSDo you consent to receive communications about the status of your ballot and other official communications, by text, at the phone number you provided above?             Yes          No        "; and(c)no later than November 5, 2025, after the statement described in Subsection (1)(b), the following:"Indicate below how you want to vote in upcoming elections:_____ Mail a ballot to me._____ Do not mail a ballot to me. I will vote in person."(2)The provisional ballot envelope shall include:(a)a unique number;(b)a detachable part that includes the unique number;(c)a telephone number, internet address, or other indicator of a means, in accordance with Section 20A-6-105.5, where the voter can find out if the provisional ballot was counted; and(d)an insert containing written instructions on how a voter may sign up to receive ballot status notifications via the ballot tracking system described in Section 20A-3a-401.5.

Section 34:
Section 34. Section 20A-7-103 is amended to read:20A-7-103Effective upon governor's approvalContingently Superseded 01/01/27. Constitutional amendments and other questions submitted by the Legislature -- Publication -- Ballot title -- Procedures for submission to popular vote.(1)The procedures contained in this section govern when the Legislature submits a proposed constitutional amendment or other question to the voters.(2)The lieutenant governor shall, not more than 60 calendar days or less than 14 calendar days before the date of the election, publish the full text of the amendment, question, or statute for the state, as a class A notice under Section 63G-30-102, through the date of the election.(3)(a)The presiding officerslegislative general counsel shall:(a)(i)entitle each proposed constitutional amendment "Constitutional Amendment __" and assign a letter to the constitutional amendment in accordance with the requirements of Section 20A-6-107;(b)(ii)entitle each proposed question "Proposition Number __" with the number assigned to the proposition under Section 20A-6-107 placed in the blank;(c)(iii)draft and designate a ballot title for each proposed amendment or question submitted by the Legislature that:(i)(A)summarizes the subject matter of the amendment or question; and(ii)(B)for a proposed constitutional amendment, summarizes any legislation that is enacted and will become effective upon the voters' adoption of the proposed constitutional amendment; and(d)(iv)deliver each letter or number and ballot title to the lieutenant governor.(b)Consistent with Section 36-12-12, the legislative general counsel performs the duties in this section as counsel for the presiding officers.(4)The lieutenant governor shall certify the letter or number and ballot title of each amendment or question to the county clerk of each county no later than 65 calendar days before the date of the election.(5)The county clerk of each county shall:(a)ensure that the letter or number and the ballot title of each amendment and question prepared in accordance with this section are included in the sample ballots and official ballots; and(b)publish the sample ballots and official ballots as provided by law.

Section 35:
Section 35. Section 20A-7-103 is amended to read:20A-7-103Contingently Effective 01/01/27. Constitutional amendments and other questions submitted by the Legislature -- Publication -- Ballot title -- Procedures for submission to popular vote.(1)The procedures contained in this section govern when the Legislature submits a proposed constitutional amendment or other question to the voters.(2)The lieutenant governor shall:(a)for a proposed constitutional amendment, in accordance with Utah Constitution, Article XXIII, Section 1, publish the entire text of the proposed constitutional amendment for 60 calendar days immediately preceding the next general election, as a class A notice under Section 63G-30-102; or(b)for a question other than a proposed constitutional amendment, publish the question for 60 calendar days immediately preceding the next general election, as a class A notice under Section 63G-30-102.(3)(a)The presiding officerslegislative general counsel shall:(a)(i)entitle each proposed constitutional amendment "Constitutional Amendment __" and assign a letter to the constitutional amendment in accordance with the requirements of Section 20A-6-107;(b)(ii)entitle each proposed question "Proposition Number __" with the number assigned to the proposition under Section 20A-6-107 placed in the blank;(c)(iii)draft and designate a ballot title for each proposed amendment or question submitted by the Legislature that:(i)(A)summarizes the subject matter of the amendment or question; and(ii)(B)for a proposed constitutional amendment, summarizes any legislation that is enacted and will become effective upon the voters' adoption of the proposed constitutional amendment; and(d)(iv)deliver each letter or number and ballot title to the lieutenant governor.(b)Consistent with Section 36-12-12, the legislative general counsel performs the duties in this section as counsel for the presiding officers.(4)The lieutenant governor shall certify the letter or number and ballot title of each amendment or question to the county clerk of each county no later than 65 calendar days before the date of the election.(5)The county clerk of each county shall:(a)ensure that the letter or number and the ballot title of each amendment and question prepared in accordance with this section are included in the sample ballots and official ballots; and(b)publish the sample ballots and official ballots as provided by law.

Section 36:
Section 36. Section 20A-7-105 is amended to read:20A-7-105Effective 05/25/26. Manual petition processes -- Obtaining signatures -- Verification -- Submitting the petition -- Certification of signatures -- Transfer to lieutenant governor -- Removal of signature.(1)This section applies only to the manual initiative process and the manual referendum process.(2)As used in this section:(a)"Local petition" means:(i)a manual local initiative petition described in Part 5, Local Initiatives - Procedures; or(ii)a manual local referendum petition described in Part 6, Local Referenda - Procedures.(b)"Packet" means an initiative packet or referendum packet.(c)"Petition" means a local petition or statewide petition.(d)"Statewide petition" means:(i)a manual statewide initiative petition described in Part 2, Statewide Initiatives; or(ii)a manual statewide referendum petition described in Part 3, Statewide Referenda.(3)(a)A Utah voter may sign a statewide petition if the voter is a legal voter.(b)A Utah voter may sign a local petition if the voter:(i)is a legal voter; and(ii)resides in the local jurisdiction.(4)(a)The sponsors shall ensure that the individual in whose presence each signature sheet was signed:(i)is at least 18 years old;(ii)verifies each signature sheet by completing the verification printed on the last page of each packet; and(iii)is informed that each signer is required to read and understand:(A)for an initiative petition, the law proposed by the initiative; or(B)for a referendum petition, the law that the referendum seeks to overturn.(b)An individual may not sign the verification printed on the last page of a packet if the individual signed a signature sheet in the packet.(5)(a)The sponsors, or an agent of the sponsors, shall submit a signed and verified packet to the county clerk of the county in which the packet was circulated before 5 p.m. no later than the earlier of:(i)for a statewide initiative:(A)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the first individual signs the initiative packet;(B)the last business day that is no more than 316 calendar days after the day on which the application for the initiative petition is filed; or(C)the February 15 immediately before the next regular general election immediately after the application is filed under Section 20A-7-202;(ii)for a statewide referendum:(A)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the first individual signs the referendum packet; or(B)the first business day that is at least 40 calendar  days after the day on which the legislative session at which the law passed ends;(iii)for a local initiative:(A)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the first individual signs the initiative packet;(B)the last business day that is no more than 316 calendar days after the day on which the application is filed;(C)the April 15 immediately before the next regular general election immediately after the application is filed under Section 20A-7-502, if the local initiative is a county initiative; or(D)the April 15 immediately before the next municipal general election immediately after the application is filed under Section 20A-7-502, if the local initiative is a municipal initiative; or(iv)for a local referendum:(A)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the first individual signs the referendum packet; or(B)the first business day that is at least 45 calendar days after the day on which the sponsors receive the items described in Subsection 20A-7-604(3) from the local clerk.(b)A person may not submit a packet after the applicable deadline described in Subsection (5)(a).(c)Before delivering an initiative packet to the county clerk under this Subsection (5), the sponsors shall send an email to each individual who provides a legible, valid email address on the signature sheet that includes the following:(i)the subject of the email shall include the following statement, "Notice Regarding Your Petition Signature"; and(ii)the body of the email shall include the following statement in 12-point type:"You signed a petition for the following initiative:[insert title of initiative]To access a copy of the initiative petition, the initiative, the fiscal impact statement, and information on the deadline for removing your signature from the petition, please visit the following link: [insert a uniform resource locator that takes the individual directly to the page on the lieutenant governor's or county clerk's website that includes the information referred to in the email]."(d)For a statewide initiative, the sponsors shall, no later than 5 p.m. on the day on which the sponsors submit the last initiative packet to the county clerk, submit to the lieutenant governor:(i)a list containing:(A)the name and email address of each individual the sponsors sent, or caused to be sent, the email described in Subsection (5)(c); and(B)the date the email was sent;(ii)a copy of the email described in Subsection (5)(c); and(iii)the following written verification, completed and signed by each of the sponsors:"Verification of initiative sponsor State of Utah, County of __________I, __________, of __________, hereby state, under penalty of perjury, that:I am a sponsor of the initiative petition entitled ____________________; andI sent, or caused to be sent, to each individual who provided a legible, valid email address on a signature sheet submitted to the county clerk in relation to the initiative petition, the email described in Utah Code Subsection 20A-7-105(5)(c).______________________________________________________________ __(Name) (Residence Address)(Date).".(e)For a local initiative, the sponsors shall, no later than 5 p.m. on the day on which the sponsors submit the last initiative packet to the local clerk, submit to the local clerk the items described in Subsection (5)(d).(f)Signatures gathered for an initiative petition are not valid if the sponsors do not comply with Subsection (5)(c), (d), or (e).(6)(a)Within 21 calendar days after the day on which the county clerk receives the packet, the county clerk shall:(i)use the procedures described in Section 20A-1-1002, or 20A-7-106 if applicable, to determine whether each signer is a legal voter and, as applicable, the jurisdiction where the signer is registered to vote;(ii)for a statewide initiative or a statewide referendum:(A)certify on the petition whether each name is that of a legal voter;(B)post the name, voter identification number, and the date of signature of each legal voter certified under Subsection (6)(a)(ii)(A) on the lieutenant governor's website, in a conspicuous location designated by the lieutenant governor; and(C)deliver the verified packet to the lieutenant governor;(iii)for a local initiative or a local referendum:(A)certify on the petition whether each name is that of a legal voter who is registered in the jurisdiction to which the initiative or referendum relates;(B)post the name, voter identification number, and the date of signature of each legal voter certified under Subsection (6)(a)(iii)(A) on the lieutenant governor's website, in a conspicuous location designated by the lieutenant governor; and(C)deliver the verified packet to the local clerk.(b)For a local initiative or local referendum, the local clerk shall post a link in a conspicuous location on the local government's website to the posting described in Subsection (6)(a)(iii)(B):(i)for a local initiative, during the period of time described in Subsection 20A-7-507(3)(a); or(ii)for a local referendum, during the period of time described in Subsection 20A-7-607(2)(a)(i).(7)The county clerk may not certify a signature under Subsection (6):(a)on a packet that is not verified in accordance with Subsection (4); or(b)that does not have a date of signature next to the signature.(8)(a)A voter who signs a statewide initiative petition may have the voter's signature removed from the petition by, in accordance with Section 20A-1-1003, submitting to the county clerk a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed no later than 5 p.m. the earlier of:(i)for an initiative packet received by the county clerk before December 1:(A)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the voter signs the signature removal statement; or(B)the first business day that is at least 90 calendar days after the day on which the lieutenant governor posts the voter's name under Subsection 20A-7-207(2); or(ii)for an initiative packet received by the county clerk on or after December 1:(A)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the voter signs the signature removal statement; or(B)the first business day that is at least 45 calendar days after the day on which the lieutenant governor posts the voter's name under Subsection 20A-7-207(2).(b)A voter who signs a statewide referendum petition may have the voter's signature removed from the petition by, in accordance with Section 20A-1-1003, submitting to the county clerk a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed no later than 5 p.m. the earlier of:(i)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the voter signs the statement requesting removal; or(ii)the first business day that is at least 45 calendar days after the day on which the lieutenant governor posts the voter's name under Subsection 20A-7-307(2).(c)A voter who signs a local initiative petition may have the voter's signature removed from the petition by, in accordance with Section 20A-1-1003, submitting to the county clerk a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed no later than 5 p.m. the earlier of:(i)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the voter signs the signature removal statement;(ii)the first business day that is at least 90 calendar days after the day on which the local clerk posts the voter's name under Subsection 20A-7-507(2);(iii)the last business day that is no more than 316 calendar days after the day on which the application is filed; or(iv)(A)for a county initiative, April 15 immediately before the next regular general election immediately after the application is filed under Section 20A-7-502; or(B)for a municipal initiative, April 15 immediately before the next municipal general election immediately after the application is filed under Section 20A-7-502.(d)A voter who signs a local referendum petition may have the voter's signature removed from the petition by, in accordance with Section 20A-1-1003, submitting to the county clerk a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed no later than 5 p.m. the earlier of:(i)the first business day that is at least 30 calendar days after the day on which the voter signs the statement requesting removal; or(ii)the first business day that is at least 45 calendar days after the day on which the local clerk posts the voter's name under Subsection 20A-7-607(2)(a).(e)In order for the signature to be removed, the county clerk must receive the statement described in this Subsection (8) before 5 p.m. no later than the applicable deadline described in this Subsection (8).(f)A county clerk shall analyze a signature, for purposes of removing a signature from a petition, in accordance with Subsection 20A-1-1003(3).(9)(a)If the county clerk timely receives a statement requesting signature removal under Subsection (8) and determines that the signature should be removed from the petition under Subsection 20A-1-1003(3), the county clerk shall:(i)ensure that the voter's name, voter identification number, and date of signature are not included in the posting described in Subsection (6)(a)(ii)(B) or (iii)(B); and(ii)remove the voter's signature from the signature packets and signature packet totals.(b)The county clerk shall comply with Subsection (9)(a) before the later of:(i)the deadline described in Subsection (6)(a); or(ii)two business days after the day on which the county clerk receives a statement requesting signature removal under Subsection (8).(10)A person may not retrieve a packet from a county clerk, or make any alterations or corrections to a packet, after the packet is submitted to the county clerk.

Section 37:
Section 37. Section 20A-7-203 is amended to read:20A-7-203Effective 05/25/26. Manual initiative process -- Form of initiative petition and signature sheets.(1)This section applies only to the manual initiative process.(2)(a)Each proposed initiative petition shall be printed in substantially the following form:"INITIATIVE PETITION To the Honorable ____, Lieutenant Governor:We, the undersigned citizens of Utah, respectfully demand that the following proposed law be submitted to the legal voters/Legislature of Utah for their/its approval or rejection at the regular general election/session to be held/ beginning on _________(month\day\year);Each signer says:I have personally signed this initiative petition or, if I am an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this initiative petition by directing the signature gatherer to enter the initials "AV" as my signature;The date next to my signature correctly reflects the date that I actually signed the initiative petition;I have personally read the entire statement included with this packet;I am registered to vote in Utah; andMy residence and post office address are written correctly after my name.WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record.NOTICE TO SIGNERS:Public hearings to discuss this initiative were held at: (list dates and locations of public hearings.)".(b)If the initiative proposes a tax increase, the following statement shall appear, in at least 14-point, bold type, immediately following the information described in Subsection (2)(a):"This initiative seeks to increase the current (insert name of tax) rate by (insert the tax percentage difference) percent, resulting in a(n) (insert the tax percentage increase) percent increase in the current tax rate.".(c)The sponsors of an initiative or an agent of the sponsors shall attach a copy of the proposed law to each initiative petition.(3)Each initiative signature sheet shall:(a)be printed on sheets of paper 8-1/28.5 inches long and 11 inches wide;(b)be ruled with a horizontal line three-fourths inch.75 inches from the top, with the space above that line blank for the purpose of binding;(c)include the title of the initiative printed below the horizontal line, in at least 14-point, bold type;(d)include a table immediately below the title of the initiative, and beginning .5 inch from the left side of the paper, as follows:(i)the first column shall be .5 inch wide and include three rows;(ii)the first row of the first column shall be .85 inch tall and contain the words "For Office Use Only" in 10-point type;(iii)the second row of the first column shall be .35 inch tall;(iv)the third row of the first column shall be .5 inch tall;(v)the second column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(vi)the first row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Registered Voter's Printed Name (must be legible to be counted)" in 10-point type;(vii)the second row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(viii)the third row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Street Address, City, Zip Code" in 10-point type;(ix)the fourth row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(x)the third column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(xi)the first row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Signature of Registered Voter" in 10-point type;(xii)the second row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xiii)the third row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Email Address (optional, to receive additional information)" in 10-point type;(xiv)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xv)the fourth column shall be one inch wide;(xvi)the first row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Date Signed" in 10-point type;(xvii)the second row of the fourth column shall be .5 inch tall;(xviii)the third row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Birth Date or Age (optional)" in 10-point type;(xix)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall; and(xx)the fifth row of the entire table shall be the width of the entire table, .4 inch tall, and contain the following statement, "By signing this initiative petition, you are stating that you have read and understand the law proposed by this initiative petition." in 12-point type;(e)the table described in Subsection (3)(d) shall be repeated, leaving sufficient room at the bottom of the sheet for the information described in Subsection (3)(f); and(f)at the bottom of the sheet, include in the following order:(i)the words "Fiscal Impact of" followed by the title of the initiative, in at least 12-point, bold type;(ii)except as provided in Subsection (5), the initial fiscal impact statement issued by the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-202.5(2)(a), including any update in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-204.1(5), in not less than 12-point type;(iii)if the initiative proposes a tax increase, the following statement in 12-point, bold type:"This initiative seeks to increase the current (insert name of tax) rate by (insert the tax percentage difference) percent, resulting in a(n) (insert the tax percentage increase) percent increase in the current tax rate."; and(iv)the word "Warning," in 12-point, bold type, followed by the following statement in not less than eight-point type:"It is a class A misdemeanor for an individual to sign an initiative petition with a name other than the individual's own name, or to knowingly sign the individual's name more than once for the same initiative petition, or to sign an initiative petition when the individual knows that the individual is not a registered voter.Birth date or age information is not required, but it may be used to verify your identity with voter registration records.  If you choose not to provide it, your signature may not be verified as a valid signature if you change your address before petition signatures are verified or if the information you provide does not match your voter registration records."(4)The final page of each initiative packet shall contain the following printed or typed statement:Verification of signature collectorState of Utah, County of ____I, _______________, of ____, hereby state, under penalty of perjury, that:I am at least 18 years old;All the names that appear in this initiative packet were signed by individuals who professed to be the individuals whose names appear in it, and each of the individuals signed the individual's name on it in my presence or, in the case of an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this initiative petition on the individual's behalf, at the direction of the individual and in the individual's presence, by entering the initials "AV" as the individual's signature;        I certify that, for each individual whose signature is represented in this initiative packet by the initials "AV":              I obtained the individual's voluntary direction or consent to sign the initiative petition on the individual's behalf;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual lacked the mental capacity to give direction or consent;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual did not understand the purpose or nature of my signing the initiative petition on the individual's behalf;              I did not intentionally or knowingly deceive the individual into directing me to, or consenting for me to, sign the initiative petition on the individual's behalf; and              I did not intentionally or knowingly enter false information on the signature sheet;I did not knowingly make a misrepresentation of fact concerning the law proposed by the initiative;I believe that each individual's name, post office address, and residence is written correctly, that each signer has read the law proposed by the initiative, and that each signer is registered to vote in Utah;The correct date of signature appears next to each individual's name; andI have not paid or given anything of value to any individual who signed this initiative packet to encourage that individual to sign it.______________________________________________________________________(Name)                 (Residence Address)                                         (Date)(5)If the initial fiscal impact statement described in Subsection (3)(f)(ii), as updated in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-204.1(5), exceeds 200 words, the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall prepare a shorter summary statement, for the purpose of inclusion on an initiative signature sheet, that does not exceed 200 words.(6)If the forms described in this section are substantially followed, the initiative petitions are sufficient, notwithstanding clerical and merely technical errors.

Section 38:
Section 38. Section 20A-7-215 is amended to read:20A-7-215Effective 05/25/26. Electronic initiative process -- Form of initiative petition -- Circulation requirements -- Signature collection.(1)This section applies only to the electronic initiative process.(2)(a)The first screen presented on the approved device shall include the following statement:"This INITIATIVE PETITION is addressed to the Honorable ____, Lieutenant Governor:The citizens of Utah who sign this petition respectfully demand that the following proposed law be submitted to the legal voters/Legislature of Utah for their/its approval or rejection at the regular general election/session to be held/beginning on _________(month\day\year)."(b)An individual may not advance to the second screen until the individual clicks a link at the bottom of the first screen stating, "By clicking here, I attest that I have read and understand the information presented on this screen."(3)(a)The second screen presented on the approved device shall include the following statement:"Public hearings to discuss this initiative were held at: (list dates and locations of public hearings.)".(b)An individual may not advance to the third screen until the individual clicks a link at the bottom of the second screen stating, "By clicking here, I attest that I have read and understand the information presented on this screen."(4)(a)The third screen presented on the approved device shall include the title of proposed law, described in Subsection 20A-7-202(2)(e)(i), followed by the entire text of the proposed law.(b)An individual may not advance to the fourth screen until the individual clicks a link at the bottom of the third screen stating, "By clicking here, I attest that I have read and understand the entire text of the proposed law."(5)Subsequent screens shall be presented on the device in the following order, with the individual viewing the device being required, before advancing to the next screen, to click a link at the bottom of the screen with the following statement: "By clicking here, I attest that I have read and understand the information presented on this screen.":(a)a description of all proposed sources of funding for the costs associated with the proposed law, including the proposed percentage of total funding from each source;(b)(i)if the initiative proposes a tax increase, the following statement, "This initiative seeks to increase the current (insert name of tax) rate by (insert the tax percentage difference) percent, resulting in a(n) (insert the tax percentage increase) percent increase in the current tax rate."; or(ii)if the initiative does not propose a tax increase, the following statement, "This initiative does not propose a tax increase.";(c)the initial fiscal impact statement issued by the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-202.5(2)(a), including any update in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-204.1(5)(b);(d)a statement indicating whether persons gathering signatures for the initiative petition may be paid for gathering signatures; and(e)the following statement, followed by links where the individual may click "yes" or "no":"I have personally read the entirety of each statement presented on this device;I am personally signing this initiative petition;I am registered to vote in Utah; andAll information I enter on this device, including my residence and post office address, is accurate.It is a class A misdemeanor for an individual to sign an initiative petition with a name other than the individual's own name, or to knowingly sign the individual's name more than once for the same initiative petition, or to sign an initiative petition when the individual knows that the individual is not a registered voter.WARNINGEven if your voter registration record is classified as private, your name, voter identification number, and date of signature in relation to signing this initiative petition will be made public.WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record.Do you wish to continue and sign this initiative petition?"(6)(a)If the individual clicks "no" in response to the question described in Subsection (5)(e), the next screen shall include the following statement, "Thank you for your time. Please return this device to the signature-gatherer."(b)If the individual clicks "yes" in response to the question described in Subsection (5)(e), the website, or the application that accesses the website, shall take the signature-gatherer and the individual signing the initiative petition through the signature process described in Section 20A-21-201.

Section 39:
Section 39. Section 20A-7-217 is amended to read:20A-7-217Effective 05/25/26. Electronic initiative process -- Collecting signatures -- Email notification -- Removal of signatures.(1)This section applies only to the electronic initiative process.(2)A signature-gatherer may not collect a signature after 5 p.m., the earlier of:(a)the last business day that is no more than 316 calendar days after the day on which the initiative application  is filed; or(b)the February 15 immediately before the next regular general election immediately after the initiative application is filed under Section 20A-7-202.(3)The lieutenant governor shall send to each individual who provides a valid email address during the signature-gathering process an email that includes the following:(a)the subject of the email shall include the following statement, "Notice Regarding Your Petition Signature"; and(b)the body of the email shall include the following statement in 12-point type:"You signed a petition for the following initiative:[insert title of initiative]To access a copy of the initiative petition, the text of the law proposed by the initiative, the fiscal impact statement, and information on the deadline for removing your signature from the initiative petition, please visit the following link: [insert a uniform resource locator that takes the individual directly to the page on the lieutenant governor's website that includes the information referred to in the email]."(4)Except as provided in Subsection (5), the county clerk shall, within two business days after the day on which the signature of an individual who signs an initiative petition is certified under Section 20A-21-201, post the name, voter identification number, and the date of signature of the individual on the lieutenant governor's website, in a conspicuous location designated by the lieutenant governor.(5)(a)If the county clerk timely receives a statement requesting signature removal under Subsection 20A-7-216(4), the county clerk shall:(i)ensure that the voter's name, voter identification number, and date of signature are not included in the posting described in Subsection (4); and(ii)remove the voter's signature from the initiative petition and the initiative petition signature totals.(b)The county clerk shall comply with Subsection (5)(a) before the later of:(i)the deadline described in Subsection (4); or(ii)two business days after the day on which the county clerk receives a statement requesting signature removal under Subsection 20A-7-216(4).

Section 40:
Section 40. Section 20A-7-303 is amended to read:20A-7-303Effective 05/25/26. Manual referendum process -- Form of referendum petition and signature sheets.(1)This section applies only to the manual referendum process.(2)(a)Each proposed referendum petition shall be printed in substantially the following form:"REFERENDUM PETITION To the Honorable ____, Lieutenant Governor:We, the undersigned citizens of Utah, respectfully order that Senate (or House) Bill No.  ____, entitled (title of act, and, if the petition is against less than the whole act, set forth here the part or parts on which the referendum is sought), passed by the Legislature of the state of Utah during the ____ Session, be referred to the people of Utah for their approval or rejection at a regular general election or a statewide special election;Each signer says:I have personally signed this referendum petition or, if I am an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this referendum petition by directing the signature gatherer to enter the initials "AV" as my signature;The date next to my signature correctly reflects the date that I actually signed the referendum petition;I have personally read the entire statement included with this referendum packet;I am registered to vote in Utah; andMy residence and post office address are written correctly after my name.".WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record."(b)The sponsors of a referendum or an agent of the sponsors shall attach a copy of the law that is the subject of the referendum to each referendum petition.(3)Each referendum signature sheet shall:(a)be printed on sheets of paper 8-1/28.5 inches long and 11 inches wide;(b)be ruled with a horizontal line three-fourths inch.75 inches from the top, with the space above that line blank for the purpose of binding;(c)include the title of the referendum printed below the horizontal line, in at least 14-point, bold type;(d)include a table immediately below the title of the referendum, and beginning .5 inch from the left side of the paper, as follows:(i)the first column shall be .5 inch wide and include three rows;(ii)the first row of the first column shall be .85 inch tall and contain the words "For Office Use Only" in 10-point type;(iii)the second row of the first column shall be .35 inch tall;(iv)the third row of the first column shall be .5 inch tall;(v)the second column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(vi)the first row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Registered Voter's Printed Name (must be legible to be counted)" in 10-point type;(vii)the second row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(viii)the third row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Street Address, City, Zip Code" in 10-point type;(ix)the fourth row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(x)the third column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(xi)the first row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Signature of Registered Voter" in 10-point type;(xii)the second row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xiii)the third row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Email Address (optional, to receive additional information)" in 10-point type;(xiv)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xv)the fourth column shall be one inch wide;(xvi)the first row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Date Signed" in 10-point type;(xvii)the second row of the fourth column shall be .5 inch tall;(xviii)the third row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Birth Date or Age (optional)" in 10-point type;(xix)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall; and(xx)the fifth row of the entire table shall be the width of the entire table, .4 inch tall, and contain the following words "By signing this referendum petition, you are stating that you have read and understand the law that this referendum petition seeks to overturn." in 12-point type;(e)the table described in Subsection (3)(d) shall be repeated, leaving sufficient room at the bottom of the sheet for the information described in Subsection (3)(f); and(f)at the bottom of the sheet, include the word "Warning," in 12-point, bold type, followed by the following statement in not less than eight-point type:"It is a class A misdemeanor for an individual to sign a referendum petition with a name other than the individual's own name, or to knowingly sign the individual's name more than once for the same referendum petition, or to sign a referendum petition when the individual knows that the individual is not a registered voter.Birth date or age information is not required, but it may be used to verify your identity with voter registration records. If you choose not to provide it, your signature may not be verified as a valid signature if you change your address before petition signatures are verified or if the information you provide does not match your voter registration records."(4)The final page of each referendum packet shall contain the following printed or typed statement:Verification of signature collectorState of Utah, County of ____I, _______________, of ____, hereby state, under penalty of perjury, that:I am at least 18 years old;All the names that appear in this referendum packet were signed by individuals who professed to be the individuals whose names appear in it, and each of the individuals signed the individual's name on it in my presence or, in the case of an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this referendum petition on the individual's behalf, at the direction of the individual and in the individual's presence, by entering the initials "AV" as the individual's signature;        I certify that, for each individual whose signature is represented in this referendum packet by the initials "AV":              I obtained the individual's voluntary direction or consent to sign the referendum petition on the individual's behalf;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual lacked the mental capacity to give direction or consent;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual did not understand the purpose or nature of my signing the referendum petition on the individual's behalf;              I did not intentionally or knowingly deceive the individual into directing me to, or consenting for me to, sign the referendum petition on the individual's behalf; and              I did not intentionally or knowingly enter false information on the signature sheet;I did not knowingly make a misrepresentation of fact concerning the law this petition seeks to overturn;I believe that each individual's name, post office address, and residence is written correctly, that each signer has read the law that the referendum seeks to overturn, and that each signer is registered to vote in Utah;The correct date of signature appears next to each individual's name; andI have not paid or given anything of value to any individual who signed this referendum packet to encourage that individual to sign it.________________________________________________________________________(Name)                       (Residence Address)                                  (Date).(5)If the forms described in this section are substantially followed, the referendum petitions are sufficient, notwithstanding clerical and merely technical errors.

Section 41:
Section 41. Section 20A-7-313 is amended to read:20A-7-313Effective 05/25/26. Electronic referendum process -- Form of referendum petition -- Circulation requirements -- Signature collection.(1)This section applies only to the electronic referendum process.(2)(a)The first screen presented on the approved device shall include the following statement:"This REFERENDUM PETITION is addressed to the Honorable ____, Lieutenant Governor:The citizens of Utah who sign this petition respectfully order that Senate (or House) Bill No.____, entitled (title of act, and, if the petition is against less than the whole act, set forth here the part or parts on which the referendum is sought), passed by the Legislature of the state of Utah during the ____ Session, be referred to the people of Utah for their approval or rejection at a regular general election or a statewide special election."(b)An individual may not advance to the second screen until the individual clicks a link at the bottom of the first screen stating, "By clicking here, I attest that I have read and understand the information presented on this screen."(3)(a)The second screen presented on the approved device shall include the entire text of the law that is the subject of the referendum petition.(b)An individual may not advance to the third screen until the individual clicks a link at the bottom of the second screen stating, "By clicking here, I attest that I have read and understand the entire text of the law that is the subject of the referendum petition."(4)(a)The third screen presented on the approved device shall include a statement indicating whether persons gathering signatures for the referendum petition may be paid for gathering signatures.(b)An individual may not advance to the fourth screen until the individual clicks a link at the bottom of the first screen stating, "By clicking here, I attest that I have read and understand the information presented on this screen."(5)The fourth screen presented on the approved device shall include the following statement, followed by links where the individual may click "yes" or "no":"I have personally read the entirety of each statement presented on this device;I am personally signing this referendum petition;I am registered to vote in Utah; andAll information I enter on this device, including my residence and post office address, is accurate.It is a class A misdemeanor for an individual to sign a referendum petition with a name other than the individual's own name, or to knowingly sign the individual's name more than once for the same referendum petition, or to sign a referendum petition when the individual knows that the individual is not a registered voter.WARNINGEven if your voter registration record is classified as private, your name, voter identification number, and date of signature in relation to signing this referendum petition will be made public.WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record.Do you wish to continue and sign this referendum petition?"(6)(a)If the individual clicks "no" in response to the question described in Subsection (5), the next screen shall include the following statement, "Thank you for your time. Please return this device to the signature-gatherer."(b)If the individual clicks "yes" in response to the question described in Subsection (5), the website, or the application that accesses the website, shall take the signature-gatherer and the individual signing the referendum petition through the signature process described in Section 20A-21-201.

Section 42:
Section 42. Section 20A-7-315 is amended to read:20A-7-315Effective 05/25/26. Electronic referendum process -- Collecting signatures -- Removal of signatures.(1)This section applies only to the electronic referendum process.(2)A signature-gatherer may not collect a signature after 5 p.m., 40 calendar days after the day on which the legislative session at which the law passed ends.(3)The lieutenant governor shall send to each individual who provides a valid email address during the signature-gathering process an email that includes the following:(a)the subject of the email shall include the following statement, "Notice Regarding Your Petition Signature"; and(b)the body of the email shall include the following statement in 12-point type:"You signed a petition for the following referendum:[insert title of referendum]To access a copy of the referendum petition, the law that is the subject of the referendum petition, and information on the deadline for removing your signature from the referendum petition, please visit the following link: [insert a uniform resource locator that takes the individual directly to the page on the lieutenant governor's website that includes the information referred to in the email]."(4)Except as provided in Subsection (5), the county clerk shall, within two business days after the day on which the signature of an individual who signs a referendum petition is certified under Section 20A-21-201, post the name, voter identification number, and the date of signature of the individual on the lieutenant governor's website, in a conspicuous location designated by the lieutenant governor.(5)(a)If the county clerk timely receives a statement requesting signature removal under Subsection 20A-7-314(4), the county clerk shall:(i)ensure that the voter's name, voter identification number, and date of signature are not included in the posting described in Subsection (4); and(ii)remove the voter's signature from the referendum petition and the signature totals.(b)The county clerk shall comply with Subsection (5)(a) before the later of:(i)the deadline described in Subsection (4); or(ii)two business days after the day on which the county clerk receives a statement requesting signature removal under Subsection 20A-7-314(4).

Section 43:
Section 43. Section 20A-7-503 is amended to read:20A-7-503Effective 05/25/26. Manual initiative process -- Form of initiative petition and signature sheet.(1)This section applies only to the manual initiative process.(2)(a)Each proposed initiative petition shall be printed in substantially the following form:"INITIATIVE PETITION To the Honorable ____, County Clerk/City Recorder/Town Clerk:We, the undersigned citizens of Utah, respectfully demand that the following proposed law be submitted to: the legislative body for its approval or rejection at its next meeting; and the legal voters of the county/city/town, if the legislative body rejects the proposed law or takes no action on it.Each signer says:I have personally signed this initiative petition or, if I am an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this initiative petition by directing the signature gatherer to enter the initials "AV" as my signature;The date next to my signature correctly reflects the date that I actually signed the petition;I have personally read the entire statement included with this packet;I am registered to vote in Utah; andMy residence and post office address are written correctly after my name."WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record."(b)If the initiative proposes a tax increase, the following statement shall appear, in at least 14-point, bold type, immediately following the information described in Subsection (2)(a):"This initiative seeks to increase the current (insert name of tax) rate by (insert the tax percentage difference) percent, resulting in a(n) (insert the tax percentage increase) percent increase in the current tax rate."(c)The sponsors of an initiative or an agent of the sponsors shall attach a copy of the proposed law to each initiative petition.(3)Each initiative signature sheet shall:(a)be printed on sheets of paper 8-1/28.5 inches long and 11 inches wide;(b)be ruled with a horizontal line three-fourths inch.75 inches from the top, with the space above that line blank for the purpose of binding;(c)include the title of the initiative printed below the horizontal line, in at least 14-point, bold type;(d)include a table immediately below the title of the initiative, and beginning .5 inch from the left side of the paper, as follows:(i)the first column shall be .5 inch wide and include three rows;(ii)the first row of the first column shall be .85 inch tall and contain the words "For Office Use Only" in 10-point type;(iii)the second row of the first column shall be .35 inch tall;(iv)the third row of the first column shall be .5 inch tall;(v)the second column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(vi)the first row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Registered Voter's Printed Name (must be legible to be counted)" in 10-point type;(vii)the second row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(viii)the third row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Street Address, City, Zip Code" in 10-point type;(ix)the fourth row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(x)the third column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(xi)the first row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Signature of Registered Voter" in 10-point type;(xii)the second row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xiii)the third row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Email Address (optional, to receive additional information)" in 10-point type;(xiv)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xv)the fourth column shall be one inch wide;(xvi)the first row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Date Signed" in 10-point type;(xvii)the second row of the fourth column shall be .5 inch tall;(xviii)the third row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Birth Date or Age (optional)" in 10-point type;(xix)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall; and(xx)the fifth row of the entire table shall be the width of the entire table, .4 inch tall, and contain the following words "By signing this initiative petition, you are stating that you have read and understand the law proposed by this initiative petition." in 12-point type;(e)the table described in Subsection (3)(d) shall be repeated, leaving sufficient room at the bottom of the sheet for the information described in Subsection (3)(f); and(f)at the bottom of the sheet, include in the following order:(i)the words "Fiscal and legal impact of" followed by the title of the initiative, in at least 12-point, bold type;(ii)the summary statement in the initial fiscal impact and legal statement issued by the budget officer in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-502.5(2)(b) and the cost estimate for printing and distributing information related to the initiative petition in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-502.5(3), in not less than 12-point, bold type;(iii)if the initiative proposes a tax increase, the following statement in 12-point, bold type:"This initiative seeks to increase the current (insert name of tax) rate by (insert the tax percentage difference) percent, resulting in a(n) (insert the tax percentage increase) percent increase in the current tax rate."; and(iv)the word "Warning," in 12-point, bold type, followed by the following statement in not less than eight-point type:"It is a class A misdemeanor for an individual to sign an initiative petition with a name other than the individual's own name, or to knowingly sign the individual's name more than once for the same initiative petition, or to sign an initiative petition when the individual knows that the individual is not a registered voter.Birth date or age information is not required, but it may be used to verify your identity with voter registration records.  If you choose not to provide it, your signature may not be verified as a valid signature if you change your address before petition signatures are verified or if the information you provide does not match your voter registration records."(4)The final page of each initiative packet shall contain the following printed or typed statement:"Verification of signature collectorState of Utah, County of ____I, _______________, of ____, hereby state, under penalty of perjury, that:I am at least 18 years old;All the names that appear in this packet were signed by individuals who professed to be the individuals whose names appear in it, and each of the individuals signed the individual's name on it in my presence or, in the case of an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this initiative petition on the individual's behalf, at the direction of the individual and in the individual's presence, by entering the initials "AV" as the individual's signature;        I certify that, for each individual whose signature is represented in this initiative packet by the initials "AV":              I obtained the individual's voluntary direction or consent to sign the initiative petition on the individual's behalf;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual lacked the mental capacity to give direction or consent;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual did not understand the purpose or nature of my signing the initiative petition on the individual's behalf;              I did not intentionally or knowingly deceive the individual into directing me to, or consenting for me to, sign the initiative petition on the individual's behalf; and              I did not intentionally or knowingly enter false information on the signature sheet;I did not knowingly make a misrepresentation of fact concerning the law proposed by the initiative; andI believe that each individual's name, post office address, and residence is written correctly, that each signer has read the law proposed by the initiative, and that each signer is registered to vote in Utah.______________________________________________________________________(Name) (Residence Address) (Date)The correct date of signature appears next to each individual's name.I have not paid or given anything of value to any individual who signed this petition to encourage that individual to sign it._____________________________________________________________________(Name) (Residence Address) (Date)".(5)If the forms described in this section are substantially followed, the initiative petitions are sufficient, notwithstanding clerical and merely technical errors.

Section 44:
Section 44. Section 20A-7-514 is amended to read:20A-7-514Effective 05/25/26. Electronic initiative process -- Form of initiative petition -- Circulation requirements -- Signature collection.(1)This section applies only to the electronic initiative process.(2)(a)The first screen presented on the approved device shall include the following statement:"This INITIATIVE PETITION is addressed to the Honorable ____, County Clerk/City Recorder/Town Clerk:The citizens of Utah who sign this petition respectfully demand that the following proposed law be submitted to: the legislative body for its approval or rejection at its next meeting; and the legal voters of the county/city/town, if the legislative body rejects the proposed law or takes no action on it."(b)An individual may not advance to the second screen until the individual clicks a link at the bottom of the first screen stating, "By clicking here, I attest that I have read and understand the information presented on this screen."(3)(a)The second screen presented on the approved device shall include the title of proposed law, described in Subsection 20A-7-502(2)(d)(i), followed by the entire text of the proposed law.(b)An individual may not advance to the third screen until the individual clicks a link at the bottom of the second screen stating, "By clicking here, I attest that I have read and understand the entire text of the proposed law."(4)Subsequent screens shall be presented on the device in the following order, with the individual viewing the device being required, before advancing to the next screen, to click a link at the bottom of the screen with the following statement, "By clicking here, I attest that I have read and understand the information presented on this screen.":(a)(i)if the initiative proposes a tax increase, the following statement, "This initiative seeks to increase the current (insert name of tax) rate by (insert the tax percentage difference) percent, resulting in a(n) (insert the tax percentage increase) percent increase in the current tax rate."; or(ii)if the initiative does not propose a tax increase, the following statement, "This initiative does not propose a tax increase.";(b)the summary statement from the initial fiscal impact and legal statement issued by the budget officer in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-502.5(2)(b) and the cost estimate for printing and distributing information related to the initiative petition in accordance with Subsection 20A-7-502.5(3);(c)a statement indicating whether persons gathering signatures for the initiative petition may be paid for gathering signatures; and(d)the following statement, followed by links where the individual may click "yes" or "no":"I have personally read the entirety of each statement presented on this device;I am personally signing this petition;I am registered to vote in Utah; andAll information I enter on this device, including my residence and post office address, is accurate.It is a class A misdemeanor for an individual to sign an initiative petition with a name other than the individual's own name, or to knowingly sign the individual's name more than once for the same initiative petition, or to sign an initiative petition when the individual knows that the individual is not a registered voter.WARNINGEven if your voter registration record is classified as private, your name, voter identification number, and date of signature in relation to signing this initiative petition will be made public.WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record.Do you wish to continue and sign this initiative petition?"(5)(a)If the individual clicks "no" in response to the question described in Subsection (4)(d), the next screen shall include the following statement, "Thank you for your time. Please return this device to the signature-gatherer."(b)If the individual clicks "yes" in response to the question described in Subsection (4)(d), the website, or the application that accesses the website, shall take the signature-gatherer and the individual signing the petition through the signature process described in Section 20A-21-201.

Section 45:
Section 45. Section 20A-7-516 is amended to read:20A-7-516Effective 05/25/26. Electronic initiative process -- Collecting signatures -- Email notification -- Removal of signatures.(1)This section applies only to the electronic initiative process.(2)A signature-gatherer may not collect a signature after 5 p.m., the earlier of:(a)316 calendar days after the day on which the initiative application is filed; or(b)(i)for a county initiative, April 15 immediately before the next regular general election immediately after the initiative application is filed under Section 20A-7-502; or(ii)for a municipal initiative, April 15 immediately before the next municipal general election immediately after the initiative application is filed under Section 20A-7-502.(3)The local clerk shall send to each individual who provides a valid email address during the signature-gathering process an email that includes the following:(a)the subject of the email shall include the following statement, "Notice Regarding Your Petition Signature"; and(b)the body of the email shall include the following statement in 12-point type:"You signed a petition for the following initiative:[insert title of initiative]To access a copy of the initiative petition, the text of the law proposed by the initiative, the initial fiscal impact and legal statement, and information on the deadline for removing your signature from the initiative petition, please visit the following link: [insert a uniform resource locator that takes the individual directly to the page on the lieutenant governor's website that includes the information referred to in the email]."(4)Except as provided in Subsection (5), the county clerk shall, within two business days after the day on which the signature of an individual who signs an initiative petition is certified under Section 20A-21-201, post the name, voter identification number, and the date of signature of the individual on the lieutenant governor's website, in a conspicuous location designated by the lieutenant governor.(5)(a)If the local clerk timely receives a statement requesting signature removal under Subsection 20A-7-515(4), the local clerk shall:(i)ensure that the voter's name, voter identification number, and date of signature are not included in the posting described in Subsection (4); and(ii)remove the voter's signature from the initiative petition and the initiative petition signature totals.(b)The local clerk shall comply with Subsection (5)(a) before the later of:(i)the deadline described in Subsection (4); or(ii)two business days after the day on which the county clerk receives a statement requesting signature removal under Subsection 20A-7-515(4).

Section 46:
Section 46. Section 20A-7-603 is amended to read:20A-7-603Effective 05/25/26. Manual referendum process -- Form of referendum petition and signature sheet.(1)This section applies only to the manual referendum process.(2)(a)Each proposed referendum petition shall be printed in substantially the following form:"REFERENDUM PETITION To the Honorable ____, County Clerk/City Recorder/Town Clerk:We, the undersigned citizens of Utah, respectfully order that (description of local law or portion of local law being challenged), passed by the ____ be referred to the voters for their approval or rejection at the regular/municipal general election to be held on __________(month\day\year);Each signer says:I have personally signed this referendum petition or, if I am an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this referendum petition by directing the signature gatherer to enter the initials "AV" as my signature;The date next to my signature correctly reflects the date that I actually signed the petition;I have personally read the entire statement included with this packet;I am registered to vote in Utah; andMy residence and post office address are written correctly after my name."WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record."(b)The sponsors of a referendum or an agent of the sponsors shall attach a copy of the law that is the subject of the referendum to each referendum petition.(3)Each referendum signature sheet shall:(a)be printed on sheets of paper 8-1/28.5 inches long and 11 inches wide;(b)be ruled with a horizontal line three-fourths inch.75 inches from the top, with the space above that line blank for the purpose of binding;(c)include the title of the referendum printed below the horizontal line, in at least 14-point type;(d)include a table immediately below the title of the referendum, and beginning .5 inch from the left side of the paper, as follows:(i)the first column shall be .5 inch wide and include three rows;(ii)the first row of the first column shall be .85 inch tall and contain the words "For Office Use Only" in 10-point type;(iii)the second row of the first column shall be .35 inch tall;(iv)the third row of the first column shall be .5 inch tall;(v)the second column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(vi)the first row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Registered Voter's Printed Name (must be legible to be counted)" in 10-point type;(vii)the second row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(viii)the third row of the second column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Street Address, City, Zip Code" in 10-point type;(ix)the fourth row of the second column shall be .5 inch tall;(x)the third column shall be 2.75 inches wide;(xi)the first row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Signature of Registered Voter" in 10-point type;(xii)the second row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xiii)the third row of the third column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Email Address (optional, to receive additional information)" in 10-point type;(xiv)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall;(xv)the fourth column shall be one inch wide;(xvi)the first row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Date Signed" in 10-point type;(xvii)the second row of the fourth column shall be .5 inch tall;(xviii)the third row of the fourth column shall be .35 inch tall and contain the words "Birth Date or Age (optional)" in 10-point type;(xix)the fourth row of the third column shall be .5 inch tall; and(xx)the fifth row of the entire table shall be the width of the entire table, .4 inch tall, and contain the following words, "By signing this referendum petition, you are stating that you have read and understand the law that this referendum petition seeks to overturn." in 12-point type;(e)the table described in Subsection (3)(d) shall be repeated, leaving sufficient room at the bottom of the sheet or the information described in Subsection (3)(f); and(f)at the bottom of the sheet, include the word "Warning," in 12-point, bold type, followed by the following statement in not less than eight-point type:"It is a class A misdemeanor for an individual to sign a referendum petition with a name other than the individual's own name, or to knowingly sign the individual's name more than once for the same referendum petition, or to sign a referendum petition when the individual knows that the individual is not a registered voter.Birth date or age information is not required, but it may be used to verify your identity with voter registration records. If you choose not to provide it, your signature may not be verified as a valid signature if you change your address before petition signatures are verified or if the information you provide does not match your voter registration records."(4)The final page of each referendum packet shall contain the following printed or typed statement:"Verification of signature collectorState of Utah, County of ____I, _______________, of ____, hereby state, under penalty of perjury, that:I am at least 18 years old;All the names that appear in this packet were signed by individuals who professed to be the individuals whose names appear in it, and each of the individuals signed the individual's name on it in my presence or, in the case of an individual with a qualifying disability, I have signed this referendum petition on the individual's behalf, at the direction of the individual and in the individual's presence, by entering the initials "AV" as the individual's signature;        I certify that, for each individual whose signature is represented in this referendum packet by the initials "AV":              I obtained the individual's voluntary direction or consent to sign the referendum petition on the individual's behalf;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual lacked the mental capacity to give direction or consent;              I do not believe, or have reason to believe, that the individual did not understand the purpose or nature of my signing the referendum petition on the individual's behalf;              I did not intentionally or knowingly deceive the individual into directing me to, or consenting for me to, sign the referendum petition on the individual's behalf; and              I did not intentionally or knowingly enter false information on the signature sheet;I did not knowingly make a misrepresentation of fact concerning the law this petition seeks to overturn; andI believe that each individual's name, post office address, and residence is written correctly, that each signer has read the law that the referendum seeks to overturn, and that each signer is registered to vote in Utah.________________________________________________________________________(Name) (Residence Address) (Date)The correct date of signature appears next to each individual's name.I have not paid or given anything of value to any individual who signed this referendum packet to encourage that individual to sign it._____________________________________________________________________(Name) (Residence Address) (Date)".(5)If the forms described in this section are substantially followed, the referendum petitions are sufficient, notwithstanding clerical and merely technical errors.

Section 47:
Section 47. Section 20A-7-614 is amended to read:20A-7-614Effective 05/25/26. Electronic referendum process -- Form of referendum petition -- Circulation requirements -- Signature collection.(1)This section applies only to the electronic referendum process.(2)(a)The first screen presented on the approved device shall include the following statement:"This REFERENDUM PETITION is addressed to the Honorable ____, County Clerk/City Recorder/Town Clerk:The citizens of Utah who sign this petition respectfully order that (description of local law or portion of local law being challenged), passed by the ____ be referred to the voters for their approval or rejection at the regular/municipal general election to be held on __________(month\day\year)."(b)An individual may not advance to the second screen until the individual clicks a link at the bottom of the first screen stating, "By clicking here, I attest that I have read and understand the information presented on this screen."(3)(a)The second screen presented on the approved device shall include the entire text of the law that is the subject of the referendum petition.(b)An individual may not advance to the third screen until the individual clicks a link at the bottom of the second screen stating, "By clicking here, I attest that I have read and understand the entire text of the law that is the subject of the referendum petition."(4)(a)The third screen presented on the approved device shall include a statement indicating whether persons gathering signatures for the referendum petition may be paid for gathering signatures.(b)An individual may not advance to the fourth screen until the individual clicks a link at the bottom of the third screen stating, "By clicking here, I attest that I have read and understand the information presented on this screen."(5)The fourth screen presented on the approved device shall include the following statement, followed by links where the individual may click "yes" or "no":"I have personally read the entirety of each statement presented on this device;I am personally signing this referendum petition;I am registered to vote in Utah; andAll information I enter on this device, including my residence and post office address, is accurate.It is a class A misdemeanor for an individual to sign a referendum petition with a name other than the individual's own name, or to knowingly sign the individual's name more than once for the same referendum petition, or to sign a referendum petition when the individual knows that the individual is not a registered voter.WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record.Do you wish to continue and sign this referendum petition?"(6)(a)If the individual clicks "no" in response to the question described in Subsection (5), the next screen shall include the following statement, "Thank you for your time. Please return this device to the signature-gatherer."(b)If the individual clicks "yes" in response to the question described in Subsection (5), the website, or the application that accesses the website, shall take the signature-gatherer and the individual signing the referendum petition through the signature process described in Section 20A-21-201.

Section 48:
Section 48. Section 20A-7-616 is amended to read:20A-7-616Effective 05/25/26. Electronic referendum process -- Collecting signatures -- Removal of signatures.(1)This section applies only to the electronic referendum process.(2)A signature-gatherer may not collect a signature after 5 p.m. 45 calendar days after the day on which the first three sponsors receive notice, under Section 20A-7-602.7 or 20A-7-602.8, that the referendum is legally referable to voters.(3)The local clerk shall send to each individual who provides a valid email address during the signature-gathering process an email that includes the following:(a)the subject of the email shall include the following statement, "Notice Regarding Your Petition Signature"; and(b)the body of the email shall include the following statement in 12-point type:"You signed a petition for the following referendum:[insert title of referendum]To access a copy of the referendum petition, the law that is the subject of the referendum petition, and information on the deadline for removing your signature from the referendum petition, please visit the following link: [insert a uniform resource locator that takes the individual directly to the page on the lieutenant governor's website that includes the information referred to in the email]."(4)Except as provided in Subsection (5), the county clerk shall, within two business days after the day on which the signature of an individual who signs a referendum petition is certified under Section 20A-21-201, post the name, voter identification number, and the date of signature of the individual on the lieutenant governor's website, in a conspicuous location designated by the lieutenant governor, for at least 45 calendar days.(5)(a)If the local clerk timely receives a statement requesting signature removal under Subsection 20A-7-615(4), the local clerk shall:(i)ensure that the voter's name, voter identification number, and date of signature are not included in the posting described in Subsection (4); and(ii)remove the voter's signature from the referendum petition and the signature totals.(b)The local clerk shall comply with Subsection (5)(a) before the later of:(i)the deadline described in Subsection (4); or(ii)two business days after the day on which the county clerk receives a statement requesting signature removal under Subsection 20A-7-615(4).

Section 49:
Section 49. Section 20A-7-702 is amended to read:20A-7-702Effective upon governor's approval. Voter information pamphlet -- Form -- Contents.The voter information pamphlet shall contain the following items in this order:(1)a cover title page;(2)an introduction to the pamphlet by the lieutenant governor;(3)a table of contents;(4)a list of all candidates for constitutional offices;(5)a list of candidates for each legislative district;(6)a 100-word statement of qualifications for each candidate for the office of governor, lieutenant governor, attorney general, state auditor, or state treasurer, if submitted by the candidate to the lieutenant governor's office before 5 p.m. on the first business day in August before the date of the election;(7)information pertaining to all measures to be submitted to the voters, beginning a new page for each measure and containing, in the following order for each measure:(a)a copy of the number and ballot title of the measure;(b)the final vote cast by the Legislature on the measure if it is a measure submitted by the Legislature or by referendum;(c)(i)for a measure other than a measure described in Section 20A-7-103, the impartial analysis of the measure prepared by the Office of Legislative Research and General Counsel; or(ii)for a measure described in Section 20A-7-103, the analysis of the measure prepared by the presiding officerslegislative general counsel;(d)the arguments in favor of the measure, the rebuttal to the arguments in favor of the measure, the arguments against the measure, and the rebuttal to the arguments against the measure, with the name and title of the authors at the end of each argument or rebuttal;(e)for each constitutional amendment, a complete copy of the text of the constitutional amendment, with all new language underlined, and all deleted language placed within brackets;(f)for each initiative qualified for the ballot:(i)a copy of the initiative as certified by the lieutenant governor and a copy of the initial fiscal impact statement prepared according to Section 20A-7-202.5; and(ii)if the initiative proposes a tax increase, the following statement in bold type:"This initiative seeks to increase the current (insert name of tax) rate by (insert the tax percentage difference) percent, resulting in a(n) (insert the tax percentage increase) percent increase in the current tax rate."; and(g)for each referendum qualified for the ballot, a complete copy of the text of the law being submitted to the voters for their approval or rejection, with all new language underlined and all deleted language placed within brackets, as applicable;(8)a description provided by the Judicial Performance Evaluation Commission of the selection and retention process for judges, including, in the following order:(a)a description of the judicial selection process;(b)a description of the judicial performance evaluation process;(c)a description of the judicial retention election process;(d)a list of the criteria of the judicial performance evaluation and the certification standards;(e)the names of the judges standing for retention election; and(f)for each judge:(i)a list of the counties in which the judge is subject to retention election;(ii)a short biography of professional qualifications and a recent photograph;(iii)a narrative concerning the judge's performance;(iv)for each certification standard under Section 78A-12-205, a statement identifying whether, under Section 78A-12-205, the judge met the standard and, if not, the manner in which the judge failed to meet the standard;(v)a statement that the Judicial Performance Evaluation Commission:(A)has determined that the judge meets or exceeds minimum performance standards;(B)has determined that the judge does not meet or exceed minimum performance standards; or(C)has not made a determination regarding whether the judge meets or exceeds minimum performance standards;(vi)any statement, described in Subsection 78A-12-206(3)(b), provided by a judge whom the Judicial Performance Evaluation Commission determines does not meet or exceed minimum performance standards;(vii)in a bar graph, the average of responses to each survey category, displayed with an identification of the minimum acceptable score as set by Section 78A-12-205 and the average score of all judges of the same court level; and(viii)a website address that contains the Judicial Performance Evaluation Commission's report on the judge's performance evaluation;(9)for each judge, a statement provided by the Utah Supreme Court identifying the cumulative number of informal reprimands, when consented to by the judge in accordance with Title 78A, Chapter 11, Judicial Conduct Commission, formal reprimands, and all orders of censure and suspension issued by the Utah Supreme Court under Utah Constitution, Article VIII, Section 13, during the judge's current term and the immediately preceding term, and a detailed summary of the supporting reasons for each violation of the Code of Judicial Conduct that the judge has received;(10)an explanation of ballot marking procedures prepared by the lieutenant governor, indicating the ballot marking procedure used by each county and explaining how to mark the ballot for each procedure;(11)voter registration information, including information on how to obtain a ballot;(12)a list of all county clerks' offices and phone numbers;(13)the address of the Statewide Electronic Voter Information Website, with a statement indicating that the election officer will post on the website any changes to the location of a polling place and the location of any additional polling place;(14)a phone number that a voter may call to obtain information regarding the location of a polling place; and(15)on the back cover page, a printed copy of the following statement signed by the lieutenant governor:"I, _______________ (print name), Lieutenant Governor of Utah, certify that the measures contained in this pamphlet will be submitted to the voters of Utah at the election to be held throughout the state on ____ (date of election), and that this pamphlet is complete and correct according to law.SEALWitness my hand and the Great Seal of the State, at Salt Lake City, Utah this ____ day of ____ (month), ____ (year)(signed) ____________________________________Lieutenant Governor".

Section 50:
Section 50. Section 20A-7-703.1 is amended to read:20A-7-703.1Effective upon governor's approval. Analysis of measure submitted to voters by Legislature -- Determination of fiscal effects.(1)The presiding officers shall:(a)prepare an analysis of each measure, described in Section 20A-7-103, that is submitted to the voters by the Legislature; and(b)submit the analysis to the lieutenant governor no later than 90 calendar days before the date of the election in which the measure will appear on the ballot.(1)As provided in this section, the legislative general counsel shall prepare an analysis of each measure described in Section 20A-7-103 that the Legislature submits to the voters.(2)The presiding officerslegislative general counsel shall ensure that the analysis:(a)is not more than 1,000 words long;(b)is prepared in clear and concise language that will easily be understood by the average voter;(c)to the extent possible, avoids the use of technical terms;(d)shows the effect of the measure on existing law;(e)describes the measure;(f)identifies the measure's fiscal effects over the time period or time periods determined by the presiding officerslegislative general counsel to be most useful in understanding the estimated fiscal impact of the measure; and(g)identifies the amount of any increase or decrease in revenue or cost to state or local government.(3)The presiding officerslegislative general counsel shall analyze the measure as the measure is proposed to be adopted, without considering any implementing legislation, unless the implementing legislation has been enacted and will become effective upon the adoption of the measure by the voters.(4)(a)In determining the fiscal effects of a measure, the presiding officerslegislative general counsel shall confer with the legislative fiscal analyst.(b)The presiding officerslegislative general counsel shall consider any measure that requires implementing legislation in order to take effect to have no financial effect, unless implementing legislation has been enacted that will become effective upon adoption of the measure by the voters.(5)If the presiding officers requestlegislative general counsel requests the assistance of any state department, agency, or official in preparing the analysis described in this section, that department, agency, or official shall assist the presiding officerslegislative general counsel.(6)The legislative general counsel shall submit the analysis to the lieutenant governor no later than 90 calendar days before the date of the election in which the measure will appear on the ballot.(7)Consistent with Section 36-12-12, the legislative general counsel performs the duties in this section as counsel for the presiding officers.

Section 51:
Section 51. Section 20A-8-103 is amended to read:20A-8-103Effective 05/25/26. Petition procedures -- Criminal penalty -- Removal of signature.(1)As used in this section, the proposed name or emblem of a registered political party is "distinguishable" if a reasonable person of average intelligence will be able to perceive a difference between the proposed name or emblem and any name or emblem currently being used by another registered political party.(2)To become a registered political party, an organization of registered voters that is not a continuing political party shall:(a)circulate a petition seeking registered political party status beginning no earlier than the date of the statewide canvass held after the last regular general election and ending before 5 p.m. no later than November 30 of the year before the year in which the next regular general election will be held;(b)file a petition with the lieutenant governor that is signed, with a holographic signature, by at least 2,000 registered voters before 5 p.m. no later than November 30 of the year in which a regular general election will be held; and(c)file, with the petition described in Subsection (2)(b), a document certifying:(i)the identity of one or more registered political parties whose members may vote for the organization's candidates;(ii)whether unaffiliated voters may vote for the organization's candidates; and(iii)whether, for the next election, the organization intends to nominate the organization's candidates in accordance with the provisions of Section 20A-9-406.(3)The petition shall:(a)be on sheets of paper 8-1/28.5 inches long and 11 inches wide;(b)be ruled with a horizontal line 3/4 inch.75 inches from the top, with the space above that line blank for the purpose of binding;(c)contain the name of the political party and the words "Political Party Registration Petition" printed directly below the horizontal line;(d)contain the word "Warning" printedfollowing statement directly under the words described in Subsection (3)(c);, in at least the same size type as the majority of the other statements on the page:(e)contain, to the right of the word "Warning," the following statement printed in not less than eight-point, single leaded type: "WARNING"It is a class A misdemeanor for anyone to knowingly sign a political party registration petition signature sheet with any name other than the individual's own name or more than once for the same party or if the individual is not registered to vote in this state and does not intend to become registered to vote in this state before the petition is submitted to the lieutenant governor.";WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record.";(f)(e)contain the following statement directly under the statement described in Subsection (3)(e)(3)(d):"POLITICAL PARTY REGISTRATION PETITION To the Honorable ____, Lieutenant Governor:We, the undersigned citizens of Utah, seek registered political party status for ____ (name);Each signer says:I have personally signed this petition with a holographic signature;I am registered to vote in Utah or will register to vote in Utah before the petition is submitted to the lieutenant governor;I am or desire to become a member of the political party; andMy street address is written correctly after my name.";(g)(f)be vertically divided into columns as follows:(i)the first column shall appear at the extreme left of the sheet, be 5/8 inch wide, be headed with "For Office Use Only," and be subdivided with a light vertical line down the middle;(ii)the next column shall be 2-1/22.5 inches wide, headed "Registered Voter's Printed Name (must be legible to be counted)";(iii)the next column shall be 2-1/22.5 inches wide, headed "Holographic Signature of Registered Voter";(iv)the next column shall be one inch wide, headed "Birth Date or Age (Optional)";(v)the final column shall be 4-3/84.375 inches wide, headed "Street Address, City, Zip Code"; and(vi)at the bottom of the sheet, contain the following statement: "Birth date or age information is not required, but it may be used to verify your identity with voter registration records.  If you choose not to provide it, your signature may not be certified as a valid signature if you change your address before petition signatures are certified or if the information you provide does not match your voter registration records.";(h)(g)have a final page bound to one or more signature sheets that are bound together that contains the following printed statement:"VerificationState of Utah, County of ____I, _______________, of ____, hereby state that:I am at least 18 years old;All the names that appear on the signature sheets bound to this page were signed by individuals who professed to be the individuals whose names appear on the signature sheets, and each individual signed the individual's name on the signature sheets in my presence; andI believe that each individual has printed and signed the individual's name and written the individual's street address correctly, and that each individual is registered to vote in Utah or will register to vote in Utah before the petition is submitted to the lieutenant governor.______________________________________________________________________(Signature) (Residence Address)(Date)"; and(i)(h)be bound to a cover sheet that:(i)identifies the political party's name, which may not exceed four words, and the emblem of the party;(ii)states the process that the organization will follow to organize and adopt a constitution and bylaws; and(iii)is signed by a filing officer, who agrees to receive communications on behalf of the organization.(4)The filing officer described in Subsection (3)(i)(iii)(3)(h)(iii) shall ensure that the individual in whose presence each signature sheet is signed:(a)is at least 18 years old; and(b)verifies each signature sheet by completing the verification bound to one or more signature sheets that are bound together.(5)An individual may not sign the verification if the individual signed a signature sheet bound to the verification.(6)The lieutenant governor shall:(a)use the procedures described in Section 20A-1-1002 to determine whether a signer is a registered voter;(b)review the proposed name and emblem to determine if they are "distinguishable" from the names and emblems of other registered political parties; and(c)certify the lieutenant governor's findings to the filing officer described in Subsection (3)(i)(iii)(3)(h)(iii) within 30 calendar days after the day on which the organization files the petition described in Subsection (2)(b).(7)(a)If the lieutenant governor determines that the petition meets the requirements of this section, and that the proposed name and emblem are distinguishable, the lieutenant governor shall authorize the filing officer described in Subsection (3)(i)(iii)(3)(h)(iii) to organize the prospective political party.(b)If the lieutenant governor finds that the name, emblem, or both are not distinguishable from the names and emblems of other registered political parties, the lieutenant governor shall notify the filing officer that the filing officer has seven calendar days to electronically submit a new name or emblem to the lieutenant governor.(8)A registered political party may not change its name or emblem during the regular general election cycle.(9)(a)It is unlawful for an individual to:(i)knowingly sign a political party registration petition:(A)with any name other than the individual's own name;(B)more than once for the same political party; or(C)if the individual is not registered to vote in this state and does not intend to become registered to vote in this state before the petition is submitted to the lieutenant governor; or(ii)sign the verification of a political party registration petition signature sheet if the individual:(A)has not witnessed the signing by those individuals whose names appear on the political party registration petition signature sheet; or(B)knows that an individual whose signature appears on the political party registration petition signature sheet is not registered to vote in this state and does not intend to become registered to vote in this state.(b)An individual who violates this Subsection (9) is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.(10)(a)A voter who signs a petition under this section may have the voter's signature removed from the petition by, no later than three business days after the day on which the petition is filed with the lieutenant governor, submitting to the lieutenant governor a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed.(b)A statement described in Subsection (10)(a) shall comply with the requirements described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(2).(c)The lieutenant governor shall use the procedures described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(3) to determine whether to remove an individual's signature from a petition after receiving a timely, valid statement requesting removal of the signature.

Section 52:
Section 52. Section 20A-9-203 is amended to read:20A-9-203Effective 05/25/26. Declarations of candidacy -- Municipal general elections -- Nomination petition -- Removal of signature.(1)An individual may become a candidate for any municipal office if:(a)the individual is a registered voter; and(b)(i)the individual has resided within the municipality in which the individual seeks to hold elective office for the 12 consecutive months immediately before the date of the election; or(ii)the territory in which the individual resides was annexed into the municipality, the individual has resided within the annexed territory or the municipality the 12 consecutive months immediately before the date of the election.(2)(a)For purposes of determining whether an individual meets the residency requirement of Subsection (1)(b)(i) in a municipality that was incorporated less than 12 months before the election, the municipality is considered to have been incorporated 12 months before the date of the election.(b)In addition to the requirements of Subsection (1), each candidate for a municipal council position shall, if elected from a district, be a resident of the council district from which the candidate is elected.(c)In accordance with Utah Constitution, Article IV, Section 6, a mentally incompetent individual, an individual convicted of a felony, or an individual convicted of treason or a crime against the elective franchise may not hold office in this state until the right to hold elective office is restored under Section 20A-2-101.3 or 20A-2-101.5.(3)(a)An individual seeking to become a candidate for a municipal office shall, regardless of the nomination method by which the individual is seeking to become a candidate:(i)except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), Section 10-2a-214, or Chapter 4, Part 6, Municipal Alternate Voting Methods Pilot Project, and subject to Subsection 20A-9-404(3)(e), file a declaration of candidacy, in person with the city recorder or town clerk, during the filing period described in Subsection (3)(d) and the office hours described in Subsection 10-3-301(3); and(ii)pay the filing fee, if one is required by municipal ordinance.(b)Subject to Subsection (5)(b), an individual may designate an agent to file a declaration of candidacy with the city recorder or town clerk if:(i)the individual is located outside of the state during the entire filing period;(ii)the designated agent appears in person before the city recorder or town clerk;(iii)the individual communicates with the city recorder or town clerk using an electronic device that allows the individual and city recorder or town clerk to see and hear each other; and(iv)the individual provides the city recorder or town clerk with an email address to which the city recorder or town clerk may send the individual the copies described in Subsection (4).(c)Any resident of a municipality may nominate a candidate for a municipal office by:(i)except as provided in Chapter 4, Part 6, Municipal Alternate Voting Methods Pilot Project, filing a nomination petition with the city recorder or town clerk during the filing period described in Subsection (3)(d) and the office hours described in Subsection 10-3-301(3) that includes signatures in support of the nomination petition of the lesser of at least:(A)25 registered voters who reside in the municipality; or(B)20% of the registered voters who reside in the municipality; and(ii)paying the filing fee, if one is required by municipal ordinance.(d)The filing period to file a declaration of candidacy for an elective office that is to be filled at the next municipal general election:(i)begins at 8 a.m. on the later of:(A)June 1 of the year in which the next municipal general election is held; or(B)if June 1 is not a business day, the first business day after June 1; and(ii)ends at 5 p.m. on the fourth business day after the day on which the filing period begins.(4)(a)Before the filing officer may accept any declaration of candidacy or nomination petition, the filing officer shall:(i)read to the prospective candidate or individual filing the petition the constitutional and statutory qualification requirements for the office that the candidate is seeking;(ii)require the candidate or individual filing the petition to state whether the candidate meets the requirements described in Subsection (4)(a)(i); and(iii)inform the candidate or the individual filing the petition that an individual who holds a municipal elected office may not, at the same time, hold a county elected office.(b)If the prospective candidate does not meet the qualification requirements for the office, the filing officer may not accept the declaration of candidacy or nomination petition.(c)If it appears that the prospective candidate meets the requirements of candidacy, the filing officer shall:(i)inform the candidate that, subject to Section 20A-6-109, the candidate's name will appear on the ballot as it is written on the declaration of candidacy;(ii)provide the candidate with a copy of the current campaign financial disclosure laws for the office the candidate is seeking and inform the candidate that failure to comply will result in disqualification as a candidate and removal of the candidate's name from the ballot;(iii)provide the candidate with a copy of Section 20A-7-801 regarding the Statewide Electronic Voter Information Website Program and inform the candidate of the submission deadline under Subsection 20A-7-801(4)(a);(iv)inform the candidate that the candidate must provide the filing officer with an email address that the candidate actively monitors:(A)to receive a communication from a filing officer or an election officer; and(B)if the candidate wishes to display a candidate profile on the Statewide Electronic Voter Information Website, to submit to the website the biographical and other information described in Subsection 20A-7-801(4)(a)(ii);(v)inform the candidate that the email address described in Subsection (4)(c)(iv) is not a record under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act;(vi)obtain from the candidate the email address described in Subsection (4)(c)(iv);(vii)provide the candidate with a copy of the pledge of fair campaign practices described under Section 20A-9-206 and inform the candidate that:(A)signing the pledge is voluntary; and(B)signed pledges shall be filed with the filing officer; and(viii)accept the declaration of candidacy or nomination petition.(d)If the candidate elects to sign the pledge of fair campaign practices, the filing officer shall:(i)accept the candidate's pledge; and(ii)if the candidate has filed for a partisan office, provide a certified copy of the candidate's pledge to the chair of the county or state political party of which the candidate is a member.(5)(a)The declaration of candidacy shall be in substantially the following form:"I, (print name) ____, being first sworn and under penalty of perjury, say that I reside at ____ Street, City of ____, County of ____, state of Utah, Zip Code ____, Telephone Number (if any) ____; that I am a registered voter; and that I am a candidate for the office of ____ (stating the term).  I will meet the legal qualifications required of candidates for this office. If filing via a designated agent, I attest that I will be out of the state of Utah during the entire candidate filing period. I will file all campaign financial disclosure reports as required by law and I understand that failure to do so will result in my disqualification as a candidate for this office and removal of my name from the ballot.  I request that my name be printed upon the applicable official ballots.  (Signed) _______________Subscribed and sworn to (or affirmed) before me by ____ on this __________(month\day\year).(Signed) _______________ (Clerk or other officer qualified to administer oath)."(b)An agent designated under Subsection (3)(b) to file a declaration of candidacy may not sign the form described in Subsection (5)(a).(c)(i)A nomination petition shall be in substantially the following form:"NOMINATION PETITIONThe undersigned residents of (name of municipality), being registered voters, nominate (name of nominee) for the office of (name of office) for the (length of term of office)."WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record."(ii)The remainder of the petition shall contain lines and columns for the signatures of individuals signing the petition and each individual's address and phone number.(6)If the declaration of candidacy or nomination petition fails to state whether the nomination is for the two-year or four-year term, the clerk shall consider the nomination to be for the four-year term.(7)(a)The clerk shall verify with the county clerk that all candidates are registered voters.(b)With the assistance of the county clerk, and using the procedures described in Section 20A-1-1002, the municipal clerk shall determine whether the required number of signatures of registered voters appears on a nomination petition.(8)Immediately after expiration of the period for filing a declaration of candidacy, the clerk shall:(a)publicize a list of the names of the candidates as they will appear on the ballot by publishing the list for the municipality, as a class A notice under Section 63G-30-102, for seven calendar days; and(b)notify the lieutenant governor of the names of the candidates as they will appear on the ballot.(9)Except as provided in Subsection (10)(c), an individual may not amend a declaration of candidacy or nomination petition filed under this section after the candidate filing period ends.(10)(a)A declaration of candidacy or nomination petition that an individual files under this section is valid unless a person files a written objection with the clerk no later than 5 p.m. on the first business day that is at least 10 calendar days after the last day for filing.(b)If a person files an objection, the clerk shall:(i)mail or personally deliver notice of the objection to the affected candidate immediately; and(ii)decide any objection within 48 hours after the objection is filed.(c)If the clerk sustains the objection, the candidate may, no later than 5 p.m. on the first business day that is at least three calendar days after the day on which the clerk sustains the objection, correct the problem for which the objection is sustained by amending the candidate's declaration of candidacy or nomination petition, or by filing a new declaration of candidacy.(d)(i)The clerk's decision upon objections to form is final.(ii)The clerk's decision upon substantive matters is reviewable by a district court if prompt application is made to the district court.(iii)The decision of the district court is final unless the Supreme Court, in the exercise of its discretion, agrees to review the lower court decision.(11)A candidate who qualifies for the ballot under this section may withdraw as a candidate by filing a written affidavit with the municipal clerk.(12)(a)A voter who signs a nomination petition under this section may have the voter's signature removed from the petition by, no later than 5 p.m. three business days after the day on which the petition is filed with the city recorder or municipal clerk, submitting to the municipal clerk a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed.(b)A statement described in Subsection (12)(a) shall comply with the requirements described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(2).(c)With the assistance of the county clerk and using the procedures described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(3), the municipal clerk shall determine whether to remove an individual's signature from a petition after receiving a timely, valid statement requesting removal of the signature.

Section 53:
Section 53. Section 20A-9-404 is amended to read:20A-9-404Effective 05/25/26. Municipal primary elections.(1)(a)Except as otherwise provided in this section or Chapter 4, Part 6, Municipal Alternate Voting Methods Pilot Project, candidatesCandidates for municipal office in all municipalities shall be nominated at a municipal primary election.(b)Municipal primary elections shall be held:(i)consistent with Section 20A-1-201.5, on the second Tuesday following the first Monday in the August before the regular municipal election; and(ii)whenever possible, at the same polling places as the regular municipal election.(c)Subsections (3) through (5) do not apply to an election to elect local school board members under Section 53G-3-302.(d)Chapter 4, Part 6, Municipal Alternate Voting Methods Pilot Project, does not apply to an election to elect local school board members under Section 53G-3-302.(2)Except as otherwise provided in Chapter 4, Part 6, Municipal Alternate Voting Methods Pilot Project, ifIf the number of candidates for a particular municipal office does not exceed twice the number of individuals needed to fill that office, a primary election for that office may not be held and the candidates are considered nominated.(3)(a)For purposes of this Subsection (3), "convention" means an organized assembly of voters or delegates.(b)(i)By ordinance adopted before the May 1 that falls before a regular municipal election, any third, fourth, or fifth class city or town may exempt itself from a primary election by providing that the nomination of candidates for municipal office to be voted upon at a municipal election be nominated by a municipal party convention or committee.(ii)The municipal party convention or committee described in Subsection (3)(b)(i) shall be held on or before May 30 of an odd-numbered year.(iii)Any primary election exemption ordinance adopted under this Subsection (3) remains in effect until repealed by ordinance.(c)(i)A convention or committee may not nominate more than one candidate for each of the municipal offices to be voted upon at the municipal election.(ii)A convention or committee may not nominate an individual who has accepted the nomination of a different convention or committee.(iii)A municipal party may not have more than one group of candidates placed upon the ballot and may not group the same candidates on different tickets by the same party under a different name or emblem.(d)(i)On or before May 31 of an odd-numbered year, a convention or committee shall prepare and submit to the filing officer a certificate of nomination for each individual nominated.(ii)The certificate of nomination shall:(A)contain the name of the office for which each individual is nominated, the name, post office address, and, if in a city, the street number of residence and place of business, if any, of each individual nominated;(B)designate in not more than five words the party that the convention or committee represents;(C)contain a copy of the resolution passed at the convention that authorized the committee to make the nomination;(D)contain a statement certifying that the name of the candidate nominated by the political party will not appear on the ballot as a candidate for any other political party;(E)be signed by the presiding officer and secretary of the convention or committee; and(F)contain a statement identifying the residence and post office address of the presiding officer and secretary and certifying that the presiding officer and secretary were officers of the convention or committee and that the certificates are true to the best of their knowledge and belief.(iii)A candidate nominated by a municipal party convention or committee shall file a declaration with the filing officer in accordance with Subsection 20A-9-203(3) that includes:(A)the name of the municipal party or convention that nominated the candidate; and(B)the office for which the convention or committee nominated the candidate.(e)A committee appointed at a convention, if authorized by an enabling resolution, may also make nominations or fill vacancies in nominations made at a convention if the committee makes the nomination before the deadline for a write-in candidate to file a declaration of candidacy under Section 20A-9-601.(f)The election ballot shall substantially comply with the form prescribed in Chapter 6, Part 4, Ballot Form Requirements for Municipal Elections, but the party name shall be included with the candidate's name.(4)(a)Any third, fourth, or fifth class city or a town may adopt an ordinance before the May 1 that falls before the regular municipal election that:(i)exempts the city or town from the other methods of nominating candidates to municipal office provided in this section; and(ii)provides for a municipal partisan convention method of nominating candidates as provided in this Subsection (4).(b)(i)Any party that was a registered political party at the last regular general election or regular municipal election is a municipal political party under this section.(ii)Any political party may qualify as a municipal political party by presenting a petition to the city recorder that:(A)is signed, with a holographic signature, by registered voters within the municipality equal to at least 20% of the number of votes cast for all candidates for mayor in the last municipal election at which a mayor was elected;(B)is filed with the city recorder or town clerk no later than 5 p.m. on the last business day before the day on which the municipal party holds a convention to nominate a candidate under this Subsection (4);(C)is substantially similar to the form of the signature sheets described in Section 20A-7-303; and(D)contains the name of the municipal political party using not more than five words.; and(E)includes the following statement on the first page of the petition in at least the same size type as the majority of the other statements on the page:"WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record."(iii)With the assistance of the county clerk, the city recorder or town clerk shall use the procedures described in Section 20A-1-1002 to determine whether each signer is a registered voter who is qualified to sign the petition.(c)(i)If the number of candidates for a particular office does not exceed twice the number of offices to be filled at the regular municipal election, no primary election for that office shall be held and the candidates are considered to be nominated.(ii)If the number of candidates for a particular office exceeds twice the number of offices to be filled at the regular municipal election, those candidates for municipal office shall be nominated at a municipal primary election.(d)The clerk shall ensure that the partisan municipal primary ballot is similar to the ballot forms required by Section 20A-6-401 and, as applicable, Section 20A-6-401.1.(e)After marking a municipal primary ballot, the voter shall deposit the ballot in the blank ballot box.(f)Immediately after the canvass, the election judges shall, without examination, destroy the tickets deposited in the blank ballot box.(5)(a)A voter who signs a petition under Subsection (4)(b)(ii) may have the voter's signature removed from the petition by, no later than 5 p.m. three business days after the day on which the petition is filed with the city recorder or town clerk, submitting to the city recorder or town clerk a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed.(b)A statement described in Subsection (5)(a) shall comply with the requirements described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(2).(c)With the assistance of the county clerk and using the procedures described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(3), the city recorder or town clerk shall determine whether to remove an individual's signature from a petition after receiving a timely, valid statement requesting removal of the signature.

Section 54:
Section 54. Section 20A-9-405 is amended to read:20A-9-405Effective 05/25/26. Nomination petitions for regular primary elections.(1)This section applies to the form and circulation of nomination petitions for regular primary elections described in Subsection 20A-9-403(3)(a).(2)A candidate for elective office, and the agents of the candidate, may not circulate nomination petitions until the candidate has submitted a declaration of candidacy in accordance with Subsection 20A-9-202(1).(3)For the manual candidate qualification process, the nomination petitions shall be in substantially the following form:(a)the petition shall be printed on paper 8-1/28.5 inches long and 11 inches wide;(b)the petition shall be ruled with a horizontal line 3/4 inch.75 inches from the top, with the space above that line blank for purposes of binding;(c)the petition shall be headed by a caption stating the purpose of the petition and the name of the proposed candidate;(d)the petition shall feature the word "Warning" followed by the following statement in no less than eight-point, single leaded type: ""WARNINGIt is a class A misdemeanor for anyone to knowingly sign a nomination petition with any name other than the person's own name, or more than once for the same candidate, or if the person is not registered to vote in this state.";WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record.";(e)the petition shall feature 10 lines spaced one-half inch.5 inches apart and consecutively numbered one through 10;(f)the signature portion of the petition shall be divided into columns headed by the following titles:(i)Registered Voter's Printed Name;(ii)Signature of Registered Voter;(iii)Party Affiliation of Registered Voter;(iv)Birth Date or Age (Optional);(v)Street Address, City, Zip Code; and(vi)Date of Signature; and(g)a photograph of the candidate may appear on the nomination petition.(4)For the electronic candidate qualification process, the lieutenant governor shall design an electronic form, using progressive screens, that includes:(a)the following warningstatement:"Warning: WARNINGIt is a class A misdemeanor for anyone to knowingly sign a nomination petition with any name other than the person's own name, or more than once for the same candidate, or if the person is not registered to vote in this state."; andWARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record."; and(b)the following information for each individual who signs the petition:(i)name;(ii)party affiliation;(iii)date of birth or age, (optional);(iv)street address, city, zip code;(v)date of signature;(vi)other information required under Section 20A-21-201; and(vii)other information required by the lieutenant governor.(5)For the manual candidate qualification process, if one or more nomination petitions are bound together, a page shall be bound to the nomination petition(s) that features the following printed verification statement to be signed and dated by the petition circulator:"VerificationState of Utah, County of ____I, ____, of ____, hereby state that:I am at least 18 years old;All the names that appear on the signature sheets bound to this page were, to the best of my knowledge, signed by the persons who professed to be the persons whose names appear on the signature sheets, and each of them signed the person's name on the signature sheets in my presence;I believe that each has printed and signed the person's name and written the person's street address correctly, and that each signer is registered to vote in Utah."(6)The lieutenant governor shall prepare and make public model nomination petition forms and associated instructions.(7)A nomination petition circulator:(a)must be at least 18 years old; and(b)may affiliate with any political party.(8)It is unlawful for any person to:(a)knowingly sign the nomination petition described in this section or Section 20A-9-408:(i)with any name other than the person's own name;(ii)more than once for the same candidate; or(iii)if the person is not registered to vote in this state;(b)sign the verification of a signature for a nomination petition if the person:(i)has not witnessed the signing by those persons whose names appear on the nomination petition; or(ii)knows that a person whose signature appears on the nomination petition is not registered to vote in this state;(c)pay compensation to any person to sign a nomination petition; or(d)pay compensation to any person to circulate a nomination petition, if the compensation is based directly on the number of signatures submitted to a filing officer rather than on the number of signatures verified or on some other basis.(9)Any person violating Subsection (8) is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.(10)(a)A voter who signs a nomination petition may have the voter's signature removed from the petition by, no later than three business days after the day on which the candidate files the petition with the appropriate filing officer, submitting to the filing officer a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed.(b)A statement described in Subsection (10)(a) shall comply with the requirements described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(2).(c)The filing officer shall use the procedures described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(3) to determine whether to remove an individual's signature from a nomination petition after receiving a timely, valid statement requesting removal of the signature.

Section 55:
Section 55. Section 20A-9-408 is amended to read:20A-9-408Effective 05/25/26. Signature-gathering process to seek the nomination of a qualified political party -- Removal of signature.(1)This section describes the requirements for a member of a qualified political party who is seeking the nomination of the qualified political party for an elective office through the signature-gathering process described in this section.(2)Notwithstanding Subsection 20A-9-201(7)(a), the form of the declaration of candidacy for a member of a qualified political party who is nominated by, or who is seeking the nomination of, the qualified political party under this section shall be substantially as described in Section 20A-9-408.5.(3)Notwithstanding Subsection 20A-9-202(1)(a), and except as provided in Subsection 20A-9-202(4), a member of a qualified political party who, under this section, is seeking the nomination of the qualified political party for an elective office that is to be filled at the next general election shall:(a)except to the extent otherwise provided in Subsection (13)(a), during the applicable declaration of candidacy filing period described in Section 20A-9-201.5, and before gathering signatures under this section, file with the filing officer on a form approved by the lieutenant governor a notice of intent to gather signatures for candidacy that includes:(i)the name of the member who will attempt to become a candidate for a registered political party under this section;(ii)the name of the registered political party for which the member is seeking nomination;(iii)the office for which the member is seeking to become a candidate;(iv)the address and telephone number of the member; and(v)other information required by the lieutenant governor;(b)except as provided in Subsection 20A-9-202(1)(c), file a declaration of candidacy, in person, with the filing officer during the applicable declaration of candidacy filing period described in Section 20A-9-201.5; and(c)pay the filing fee.(4)Notwithstanding Subsection 20A-9-202(2)(a), a member of a qualified political party who, under this section, is seeking the nomination of the qualified political party for the office of district attorney within a multicounty prosecution district that is to be filled at the next general election shall:(a)during the applicable declaration of candidacy filing period described in Section 20A-9-201.5, and before gathering signatures under this section, file with the filing officer on a form approved by the lieutenant governor a notice of intent to gather signatures for candidacy that includes:(i)the name of the member who will attempt to become a candidate for a registered political party under this section;(ii)the name of the registered political party for which the member is seeking nomination;(iii)the office for which the member is seeking to become a candidate;(iv)the address and telephone number of the member; and(v)other information required by the lieutenant governor;(b)except as provided in Subsection 20A-9-202(1)(c), file a declaration of candidacy, in person, with the filing officer during the applicable declaration of candidacy filing period described in Section 20A-9-201.5; and(c)pay the filing fee.(5)Notwithstanding Subsection 20A-9-202(3)(a)(iii), a lieutenant governor candidate who files as the joint-ticket running mate of an individual who is nominated by a qualified political party, under this section, for the office of governor shall, during the applicable declaration of candidacy filing period described in Section 20A-9-201.5, file a declaration of candidacy and submit a letter from the candidate for governor that names the lieutenant governor candidate as a joint-ticket running mate.(6)The lieutenant governor shall ensure that the certification described in Subsection 20A-9-701(1) also includes the name of each candidate nominated by a qualified political party under this section.(7)Notwithstanding Subsection 20A-9-701(2), the ballot shall, for each candidate who is nominated by a qualified political party under this section, designate the qualified political party that nominated the candidate.(8)A member of a qualified political party may seek the nomination of the qualified political party for an elective office by:(a)complying with the requirements described in this section; and(b)collecting signatures, on a form approved by the lieutenant governor that complies with Subsection 20A-9-405(3), during the period beginning on the day on which the member files a notice of intent to gather signatures and ending at the applicable deadline described in Subsection (12), in the following amounts:(i)for a statewide race, 28,000 signatures of registered voters in the state who are permitted by the qualified political party to vote for the qualified political party's candidates in a primary election;(ii)except as provided in Subsection (13)(b), for a congressional district race, 7,000 signatures of registered voters who are residents of the congressional district and are permitted by the qualified political party to vote for the qualified political party's candidates in a primary election;(iii)for a state Senate district race, 2,000 signatures of registered voters who are residents of the state Senate district and are permitted by the qualified political party to vote for the qualified political party's candidates in a primary election;(iv)for a state House district race, 1,000 signatures of registered voters who are residents of the state House district and are permitted by the qualified political party to vote for the qualified political party's candidates in a primary election;(v)for a State Board of Education race, the lesser of:(A)2,000 signatures of registered voters who are residents of the State Board of Education district and are permitted by the qualified political party to vote for the qualified political party's candidates in a primary election; or(B)3% of the registered voters of the qualified political party who are residents of the applicable State Board of Education district; and(vi)for a county office race, signatures of 3% of the registered voters who are residents of the area permitted to vote for the county office and are permitted by the qualified political party to vote for the qualified political party's candidates in a primary election.(9)(a)This Subsection (9) applies only to the manual candidate qualification process.(b)In order for a member of the qualified political party to qualify as a candidate for the qualified political party's nomination for an elective office under this section, using the manual candidate qualification process, the member shall:(i)collect the signatures on a form approved by the lieutenant governor that complies with Subsection 20A-9-405(3), using the same circulation and verification requirements described in Sections 20A-7-105 and 20A-7-204; and(ii)in accordance with Section 20A-9-408.3, submit the signatures to the election officer before the applicable deadline described in Subsection (12).(c)Upon timely receipt of the signatures described in Subsections (8) and (9)(b), and in accordance with Section 20A-9-408.3, the election officer shall, no later than the earlier of 14 calendar days after the day on which the election officer receives the signatures, or one day before the day on which the qualified political party holds the convention to select a nominee for the elective office to which the signature packets relate:(i)check the name of each individual who completes the verification for a signature packet to determine whether each individual is at least 18 years old;(ii)submit the name of each individual described in Subsection (9)(c)(i) who is not at least 18 years old to the attorney general and the county attorney;(iii)with the assistance of the county clerk as applicable, determine whether each signer is a registered voter who is qualified to sign the petition, using the same method, described in Section 20A-1-1002, used to verify a signature on a petition; and(iv)certify whether each name is that of a registered voter who is qualified to sign the signature packet.(d)(i)A registered voter who physically signs a form under Subsections (8) and (9)(b) may have the voter's signature removed from the form by, no later than 5 p.m. three business days after the day on which the member submits the signature form to the election officer, submitting to the election officer a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed.(ii)A statement described in Subsection (9)(d)(i) shall comply with the requirements described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(2).(iii)With the assistance of the county clerk as applicable, the election officer shall use the procedures described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(3) to determine whether to remove an individual's signature after receiving a timely, valid statement requesting removal of the signature.(e)(i)An election officer shall, in accordance with this Subsection (9)(e) and rules made under Section 20A-3a-106, conduct regular audits of signature comparisons made between signatures gathered under this section and voter signatures maintained by the election officer.(ii)An individual who conducts an audit of signature comparisons under this section may not audit the individual's own work.(iii)The election officer shall:(A)audit 1% of all signature comparisons described in Subsection (9)(e)(i) to determine the accuracy of the comparisons made;(B)record the individuals who conducted the audit;(C)record the audit results;(D)provide additional training or staff reassignments, as needed, based on the results of an audit described in Subsection (9)(e)(i); and(E)record any remedial action taken.(iv)The audit results described in Subsection (9)(e)(iii)(C) are a public record.(f)An election officer who certifies signatures under Subsection (9)(c) or  20A-9-403(3)(d) shall, after certifying enough signatures to establish that a candidate has reached the applicable signature threshold described in Subsection (8) or 20A-9-403(3)(a), as applicable, continue to certify signatures submitted for the candidate in excess of the number of signatures required, until the election officer either:(i)certifies signatures equal to 110% of the applicable signature threshold; or(ii)has reviewed all signatures submitted for the candidate before reaching an amount equal to 110% of the applicable signature threshold.(10)(a)This Subsection (10) applies only to the electronic candidate qualification process.(b)In order for a member of the qualified political party to qualify as a candidate for the qualified political party's nomination for an elective office under this section, the member shall, before the deadline described in Subsection (12), collect signatures electronically:(i)in accordance with Section 20A-21-201; and(ii)using progressive screens, in a format approved by the lieutenant governor, that complies with Subsection 20A-9-405(4).(c)Upon timely receipt of the signatures described in Subsections (8) and (9)(b), the election officer shall, no later than the earlier of 14 calendar days after the day on which the election officer receives the signatures, or one day before the day on which the qualified political party holds the convention to select a nominee for the elective office to which the signature packets relate:(i)check the name of each individual who completes the verification for a signature to determine whether each individual is at least 18 years old; and(ii)submit the name of each individual described in Subsection (10)(c)(i) who is not at least 18 years old to the attorney general and the county attorney.(11)(a)An individual may not gather signatures under this section until after the individual files a notice of intent to gather signatures for candidacy described in this section.(b)An individual who files a notice of intent to gather signatures for candidacy, described in Subsection (3)(a) or (4)(a), is, beginning on the day on which the individual files the notice of intent to gather signatures for candidacy:(i)required to comply with the reporting requirements that a candidate for office is required to comply with; and(ii)subject to the same enforcement provisions, and civil and criminal penalties, that apply to a candidate for office in relation to the reporting requirements described in Subsection (11)(b)(i).(c)Upon timely receipt of the signatures described in Subsections (8) and (9)(b), or Subsections (8) and (10)(b), the election officer shall, no later than the day before the day on which the qualified political party holds the convention to select a nominee for the elective office to which the signature packets relate, notify the qualified political party and the lieutenant governor of the name of each member of the qualified political party who qualifies as a nominee of the qualified political party, under this section, for the elective office to which the convention relates.(d)Upon receipt of a notice of intent to gather signatures for candidacy described in this section, the lieutenant governor shall post the notice of intent to gather signatures for candidacy on the lieutenant governor's website in the same location that the lieutenant governor posts a declaration of candidacy.(12)The deadline before which a member of a qualified political party must collect and submit signatures to the election officer under this section is 5 p.m. on the last business day that is at least 14 calendar days before the day on which the qualified political party's convention for the office begins.(13)For the 2026 election year only, an individual who desires to gather signatures to seek the nomination of a qualified political party for the office of United States representative shall:(a)in accordance with Subsection (3)(a), file a notice of intent to gather signatures during the period beginning at 8 a.m. on the first business day of January and ending at 5 p.m. on March 13, 2026; and(b)during the period beginning on the day on which the individual files the notice of intent to gather signatures and ending at 5 p.m. on March 13, 2026, on a form approved by the lieutenant governor that complies with Subsection 20A-9-405(3), collect 7,000 signatures of registered voters who are residents of the state and are permitted by the qualified political party to vote for the qualified political party's candidates in a primary election.

Section 56:
Section 56. Section 20A-9-502 is amended to read:20A-9-502Effective 05/25/26. Certificate of nomination -- Contents -- Circulation -- Verification -- Criminal penalty -- Removal of petition signature.(1)The candidate shall:(a)prepare a certificate of nomination in substantially the following form:"State of Utah, County of ______________________________________________I, ______________, declare my intention of becoming an unaffiliated candidate for the political group designated as ____ for the office of ____.  I do solemnly swear that I can qualify to hold that office both legally and constitutionally if selected, and that I reside at ____ Street, in the city of ____, county of ____, state of ______, zip code ____, phone ____, and that I am providing, or have provided, the required number of holographic signatures of registered voters required by law; that as a candidate at the next election I will not knowingly violate any election or campaign law; that, if filing via a designated agent for an office other than president of the United States, I will be out of the state of Utah during the entire candidate filing period; I will file all campaign financial disclosure reports as required by law; and I understand that failure to do so will result in my disqualification as a candidate for this office and removal of my name from the ballot.__________________________________________Subscribed and sworn to before me this ______(month\day\year).__________________________________________Notary Public (or other officer qualified to administer oaths)";(b)for each signature packet, bind signature sheets to a copy of the certificate of nomination and the circulator verification, that:(i)are printed on sheets of paper 8-1/28.5 inches long and 11 inches wide;(ii)are ruled with a horizontal line 3/4 inch.75 inches from the top, with the space above that line blank for the purpose of binding;(iii)contain the name of the proposed candidate and the words "Unaffiliated Candidate Certificate of Nomination Petition" printed directly below the horizontal line;(iv)contain the word "Warning" printedfollowing statement, directly under the words described in Subsection (1)(b)(iii);,(v)contain, to the right of the word "Warning," the following statement printed in not less than eight-point, single leaded type:"WARNING"It is a class A misdemeanor for anyone to knowingly sign a certificate of nomination signature sheet with any name other than the person's own name or more than once for the same candidate or if the person is not registered to vote in this state and does not intend to become registered to vote in this state before the county clerk certifies the signatures.";WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record.";(vi)(v)contain the following statement directly under the statement described in Subsection (1)(b)(v)(1)(b)(iv):"Each signer says:I have personally signed this petition with a holographic signature;I am registered to vote in Utah or intend to become registered to vote in Utah before the county clerk certifies my signature; andMy street address is written correctly after my name.";(vii)(vi)contain horizontally ruled lines, 3/8 inch.375 inches apart under the statement described in Subsection (1)(b)(vi)(1)(b)(v); and(viii)(vii)be vertically divided into columns as follows:(A)the first column shall appear at the extreme left of the sheet, be 5/8 inch.625 inches wide, be headed with "For Office Use Only," and be subdivided with a light vertical line down the middle;(B)the next column shall be 2-1/22.5 inches wide, headed "Registered Voter's Printed Name (must be legible to be counted)";(C)the next column shall be 2-1/22.5 inches wide, headed "Holographic Signature of Registered Voter";(D)the next column shall be one inch wide, headed "Birth Date or Age (Optional)";(E)the final column shall be 4-3/84.375 inches wide, headed "Street Address, City, Zip Code"; and(F)at the bottom of the sheet, contain the following statement: "Birth date or age information is not required, but it may be used to verify your identity with voter registration records.  If you choose not to provide it, your signature may not be certified as a valid signature if you change your address before petition signatures are certified or if the information you provide does not match your voter registration records."; and(c)bind a final page to one or more signature sheets that are bound together that contains, except as provided by Subsection (3), the following printed statement:"VerificationState of Utah, County of ____I, _______________, of ____, hereby state that:I am at least 18 years old;All the names that appear on the signature sheets bound to this page were signed by persons who professed to be the persons whose names appear on the signature sheets, and each of them signed the person's name on the signature sheets in my presence;I believe that each has printed and signed the person's name and written the person's street address correctly, and that each signer is registered to vote in Utah or will register to vote in Utah before the county clerk certifies the signatures on the signature sheet.______________________________________________________________________(Signature) (Residence Address)(Date)".(2)An agent designated to file a certificate of nomination under Subsection 20A-9-503(2)(b) or (4)(b) may not sign the form described in Subsection (1)(a).(3)(a)The candidate shall circulate the nomination petition and ensure that the person in whose presence each signature sheet is signed:(i)is at least 18 years old; and(ii)verifies each signature sheet by completing the verification bound to one or more signature sheets that are bound together.(b)A person may not sign the circulator verification if the person signed a signature sheet bound to the verification.(4)(a)It is unlawful for any person to:(i)knowingly sign a certificate of nomination signature sheet:(A)with any name other than the person's own name;(B)more than once for the same candidate; or(C)if the person is not registered to vote in this state and does not intend to become registered to vote in this state before the county clerk certifies the signatures; or(ii)sign the verification of a certificate of nomination signature sheet if the person:(A)has not witnessed the signing by those persons whose names appear on the certificate of nomination signature sheet; or(B)knows that a person whose signature appears on the certificate of nomination signature sheet is not registered to vote in this state and does not intend to become registered to vote in this state.(b)Any person violating this Subsection (4) is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.(5)(a)To qualify for placement on the general election ballot, the candidate shall, no earlier than the start of the applicable declaration of candidacy period described in Section 20A-9-201.5 and no later than 5 p.m. on June 15 of the year in which the election will be held:(i)comply with Subsection 20A-9-503(1); and(ii)submit each signature packet to the county clerk where the majority of the signatures in the packet were collected, with signatures totaling:(A)at least 1,000 registered voters residing within the state when the nomination is for an office to be filled by the voters of the entire state; or(B)at least 300 registered voters residing within a political division or at least 5% of the registered voters residing within a political division, whichever is less, when the nomination is for an office to be filled by the voters of any political division smaller than the state.(b)A candidate has not complied with Subsection (5)(a)(ii), unless the county clerks verify that each required signature is a valid signature of a registered voter who is eligible to sign the signature packet and has not signed a signature packet to nominate another candidate for the same office.(c)In reviewing the signature packets, the county clerk shall count and certify only those persons who signed with a holographic signature, who:(i)are registered voters within the political division that the candidate seeks to represent; and(ii)did not sign any other certificate of nomination for that office.(d)The county clerk shall count and certify the number of registered voters who validly signed a signature packet, no later than 30 calendar days after the day on which the candidate submits the signature packet.(e)The candidate may supplement the signatures or amend the certificate of nomination or declaration of candidacy at any time on or before 5 p.m. on June 15 of the year in which the election will be held.(f)The county clerk shall use the procedures described in Section 20A-1-1002 to determine whether a signer is a registered voter who is qualified to sign the signature packet.(6)(a)A voter who signs a signature packet under this section may have the voter's signature removed from the signature packet by, no later than 5 p.m. three business days after the day on which the candidate submits the signature packet to the county clerk, submitting to the county clerk a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed.(b)A statement described in Subsection (6)(a) shall comply with the requirements described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(2).(c)The county clerk shall use the procedures described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(3) to determine whether to remove an individual's signature from a signature packet after receiving a timely, valid statement requesting removal of the signature.

Section 57:
Section 57. Section 20A-15-103 is amended to read:20A-15-103Effective 05/25/26. Delegates -- Candidacy -- Qualifications -- Nominating procedures -- Removal of petition signature.(1)Candidates for the office of delegate to the ratification convention shall be citizens, residents of Utah, and at least 21 years old.(2)Persons wishing to be delegates to the ratification convention shall:(a)circulate a nominating petition meeting the requirements of this section; and(b)obtain the signature of at least 100 registered voters.(3)(a)A single nominating petition may nominate any number of candidates up to 21, the total number of delegates to be elected.(b)Nominating petitions may not contain anything identifying a candidate's party or political affiliation.(c)Each nominating petition shall contain a written statement signed by each nominee, indicating either that the candidate will:(i)vote for ratification of the proposed amendment; or(ii)vote against ratification of the proposed amendment.(d)A nominating petition containing the names of more than one nominee may not contain the name of any nominee whose stated position in the nominating petition is inconsistent with that of any other nominee listed in the petition.(e)The first page of a nominating petition described in this section shall include the following statement in at least the same size type as the majority of the other statements on the page:"WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record."(4)(a)A candidate shall file the candidate's nominating petition with the lieutenant governor no later than 5 p.m. on the last business day that is at least 40 calendar days before the proclaimed date of the election.(b)Within 10 calendar days after the last day for filing the petitions, the lieutenant governor shall:(i)use the procedures described in Section 20A-1-1002 to determine whether a signer is a registered voter;(ii)declare nominated the 21 nominees in favor of ratification and the 21 nominees against ratification whose nominating petitions have been signed by the largest number of registered voters;(iii)decide any ties by lot drawn by the lieutenant governor; and(iv)certify the nominated candidates of each group to the county clerk of each county within the state.(5)(a)A voter who signs a nomination petition under this section may have the voter's signature removed from the petition by, no later than 5 p.m. three business days after the last day for filing the petitions, submitting to the lieutenant governor a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed.(b)A statement described in Subsection (5)(a) shall comply with the requirements described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(2).(c)The lieutenant governor shall use the procedures described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(3) to determine whether to remove an individual's signature from a petition after receiving a timely, valid statement requesting removal of the signature.

Section 58:
Section 58. Section 53G-3-301.1 is amended to read:53G-3-301.1Effective 05/25/26. Creation of a new school district -- Citizens' petition -- Procedures to follow -- Removal or reinstatement of signature.(1)Citizens may file a petition to create a new school district in accordance with this section and Section 53G-3-301.(2)(a)The county clerk shall ensure that a petition described in Subsection (1) is signed by registered voters residing within the geographical boundaries of the proposed new school district in an amount equal to at least 10% of all votes cast within the geographic boundaries of the proposed new school district for all candidates for president of the United States at the last regular general election at which a president of the United States was elected.(b)The sponsors of a petition described in Subsection (1) shall file the petition with the clerk of each county in which any part of the proposed new school district is located.(c)The petition sponsors shall ensure that the petition described in Subsection (1):(i)indicates the typed or printed name and current residence address of each voter who signs the petition;(ii)describes the proposed new school district boundaries; and(iii)designates up to five signers of the petition as sponsors, designating one as the contact sponsor, with the mailing address and telephone number of each.(d)The first page of a petition described in this section shall include the following statement in at least the same size type as the majority of the other statements on the page:"WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record."(3)(a)(i)A signer of a petition described in Subsection (1) may remove or, once removed, reinstate the signer's signature by filing a written statement requesting removal or reinstatement with the county clerk no later than three business days after the day on which the petition is filed with the county clerk.(ii)A statement described in Subsection (3)(a)(i) shall comply with the requirements described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(2).(iii)The county clerk shall use the procedures described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(3) to determine whether to remove or reinstate an individual's signature from a petition after receiving a timely, valid statement.(b)The county clerk shall use the procedures described in Section 20A-1-1002 to determine whether the petition has been signed by the required number of registered voters residing within the geographical boundaries of the proposed new school district.(4)Within 14 days after the day on which a petition described in Subsection (1) is filed, the clerk of each county with which the request or petition is filed shall:(a)determine whether the petition complies with Subsections (2) and (3), as applicable, and Section 53G-3-301; and(b)(i)if the county clerk determines that the request or petition complies with the applicable requirements:(A)certify the petition and deliver the certified petition to the county legislative body; and(B)mail or deliver written notification of the certification to the contact sponsor; or(ii)if the county clerk determines that the petition fails to comply with any of the applicable requirements, reject the petition and notify the contact sponsor in writing of the rejection and reasons for the rejection.(5)(a)If the county clerk fails to certify or reject a petition within the time specified in Subsection (4), the petition is considered to be certified.(b)If the county clerk rejects a petition, the individual who submitted the petition may amend the petition to correct the deficiencies for which the county clerk rejected the petition and refile the petition.(6)Within 10 days after the day on which a county legislative body receives a certified petition as described in Subsection (4) or (5), the county legislative body shall request a feasibility study.(7)(a)The county legislative body shall:(i)provide for a 30-day public comment period to begin on the day the county legislative body receives the study under Subsection (6); and(ii)hold at least two public hearings on the study and recommendations.(b)Within five business days after the day on which the public comment period ends, the legislative body of each county with which a petition is filed shall vote on the creation of the proposed new school district.(c)A county legislative body approves a petition proposing a new school district if a majority of the members of the legislative body vote in favor of the petition.(8)(a)Within five business days after the day on which a county legislative body approves a petition proposing a new school district under Subsection (7), the county legislative body shall provide notice of the approval and a copy of the petition to which the approval relates to the county clerk of each county described in Subsection (2)(b).(b)If each county described in Subsection (2)(b) approves a petition proposing a new school district, the county clerks of the counties shall submit the proposal for the creation of a new school district to all legal voters in the proposed new school district for approval or rejection at the next regular general election that is at least 65 days after the day on which all of the counties described in Subsection (2)(b) have complied with Subsection (8)(a).(c)The new school district proposed in the petition and the reorganized new school district are created if a majority of the voters in the proposed new school district vote in favor of creating the new school district.

Section 59:
Section 59. Section 53G-3-401 is amended to read:53G-3-401Effective 05/25/26. Consolidation of school districts -- Resolution by local school board members -- Petition by electors -- Certification of petition signatures -- Removal of signature -- Election.(1)Two or more school districts may unite and form a single school district in one of the following ways:(a)a majority of the members of each of the local school boards of the affected districts shall approve and present to the county legislative body of the affected counties a resolution to consolidate the districts.  Once this is done, consolidation shall be established under this chapter; or(b)a majority of the members of the local school board of each affected district, or 15% of the registered voters in each of the affected districts, shall sign and present a petition to the county legislative body of each affected county. The question shall be voted upon at an election called for that purpose, which shall be the next general or municipal election. Consolidation shall occur if a majority of those voting on the question in each district favor consolidation.(2)The first page of a petition described in this section shall include the following statement in at least the same size type as the majority of the other statements on the page:"WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record."(2)(3)If a registered voter petition is presented to the county legislative body under Subsection (1)(b):(a)within three business days after the day on which the county legislative body receives the petition, the county legislative body shall provide the petition to the county clerk; and(b)within 14 days after the day on which a county clerk receives a petition from the county legislative body, the county clerk shall:(i)use the procedures described in Section 20A-1-1002 to determine whether the petition satisfies the requirements of Subsection (1)(b) for a registered voter petition;(ii)certify on the petition whether each name is that of a registered voter in one of the affected districts; and(iii)deliver the certified petition to the county legislative body.(3)(4)(a)A voter who signs a registered voter petition under Subsection (1)(b) may have the voter's signature removed from the petition by, no later than three business days after the day on which the county legislative body provides the petition to the county clerk, submitting to the county clerk a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed.(b)A statement described in Subsection (3)(a)(4)(a) shall comply with the requirements described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(2).(c)The county clerk shall use the procedures described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(3) to determine whether to remove an individual's signature from a petition after receiving a timely, valid statement requesting removal of the signature.(4)(5)The elections required under Subsection (1)(b) shall be conducted and the returns canvassed as provided by election laws.

Section 60:
Section 60. Section 53G-3-501 is amended to read:53G-3-501Effective 05/25/26. Transfer of a portion of a school district -- Required boundary adjustments -- Local school board petition -- Elector petition -- Certification of petition signatures -- Removal of signature -- Transfer election.(1)(a)Part of a school district may be transferred to another district in one of the following ways:(a)(i)presentation to the county legislative body of each of the affected counties of a resolution requesting the transfer, approved by at least four-fifths of the members of the local school board of each affected school district;(b)(ii)presentation to the county legislative body of each affected county of a petition requesting that the voters vote on the transfer, signed by a majority of the members of the local school board of each affected school district; (c)(iii)presentation to the county legislative body of each affected county of a petition requesting that the voters vote on the transfer, signed by 15% of the registered voters in each of the affected school districts within that county; or(d)(iv)for a boundary adjustment required under Subsection (2) or (3), submission to the county legislative body of each of the affected counties of a resolution requesting the transfer from the local school board of the school district that is required to initiate the boundary adjustment.(b)The first page of a petition described in Subsection (1)(a)(iii) shall include the following statement in at least the same size type as the majority of the other statements on the page:"WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record."(2)(a)As used in this Subsection (2):(i)"Expansion area" means the area of land approved for annexation and located outside the boundaries of a specified school district.(ii)"Municipality" means a city or town.(iii)"Originating school district" means the school district whose boundaries an expansion area is located within prior to the boundary adjustment required under Subsection (2)(b).(iv)"Specified school district" means a school district:(A)that serves residents within a single municipality; and(B)for which the municipality whose residents the school district serves enacts an ordinance in accordance with Title 10, Chapter 2, Part 4, AnnexationTitle 10, Chapter 2, Part 8, Annexation, approving the annexation of an area of land located outside the boundaries of the school district.(b)Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter and except as provided in Subsection (2)(c)(ii), the local school board of a specified school district shall initiate boundary adjustment proceedings under Subsection (1)(d)(1)(a)(iv):(i)to request the expansion area to be transferred to the specified school district from the originating school district; and(ii)by submitting the resolution requesting the transfer, as provided in Subsection (1)(d)(1)(a)(iv), within 60 days after the day on which the municipality enacts the ordinance approving annexation of the expansion area.(c)(i)Before initiating the boundary adjustment required under Subsection (2)(b), the local school board presidents of the specified school district and the originating school district shall, within the timeframe described in Subsection (2)(b)(ii), meet to determine whether allowing the expansion area to remain within the boundaries of the originating school district is in the best interests of the municipality's residents.(ii)The requirements of Subsection (2)(b) do not apply to a specified school district if, upon meeting under Subsection (2)(c)(i), the presidents of the local school boards mutually agree that allowing the expansion area to remain within the boundaries of the originating school district is in the best interests of the municipality's residents.(3)(a)This Subsection (3) applies to a school district that:(i)serves residents within a single municipality; and(ii)in calendar year 2018, completed construction on a secondary school within an area of land located outside the boundaries of the school district.(b)Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the local school board of a school district described in Subsection (3)(a) shall initiate boundary adjustment proceedings under Subsection (1)(d)(1)(a)(iv):(i)to request the land described in Subsection (3)(a)(ii) to be transferred to the school district from the school district whose boundaries the land is located within; and(ii)by submitting the resolution requesting the transfer, as provided in Subsection (1)(d)(1)(a)(iv), on or before June 1, 2024.(4)If a registered voter petition is presented to the county legislative body under Subsection (1)(c)(1)(a)(iii):(a)within three business days after the day on which the county legislative body receives the petition, the county legislative body shall provide the petition to the county clerk; and(b)within 14 days after the day on which a county clerk receives a petition from the county legislative body, the county clerk shall:(i)use the procedures described in Section 20A-1-1002 to determine whether the petition satisfies the requirements of Subsection (1)(c)(1)(a)(iii) for a registered voter petition;(ii)certify on the petition whether each name is that of a registered voter in one of the affected districts; and(iii)deliver the certified petition to the county legislative body.(5)(a)A voter who signs a registered voter petition under Subsection (1)(c)(1)(a)(iii) may have the voter's signature removed from the petition by, no later than three business days after the day on which the county legislative body provides the petition to the county clerk, submitting to the county clerk a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed.(b)A statement described in Subsection (5)(a) shall comply with the requirements described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(2).(c)The county clerk shall use the procedures described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(3) to determine whether to remove an individual's signature from a petition after receiving a timely, valid statement requesting removal of the signature.(6)(a)The voters of each affected district shall vote on the transfer requested under Subsection (1)(b) or (c)(1)(a)(ii) or (iii) at an election called for that purpose, which may be the next general election.(b)The election shall be conducted and the returns canvassed as provided by election law.(c)A transfer is effected only if a majority of votes cast by the voters in both the proposed transferor district and in the proposed transferee district are in favor of the transfer.

Section 61:
Section 61. Section 53H-3-1304 is enacted to read:53H-3-1304Effective 04/06/26. Research university -- Duty to research.(1)As used in this section, "research university" means the University of Utah or Utah State University.(2)The conduct of research by a research university is, for purposes of Section 20A-2-605, an official duty imposed by law on the research university.

Section 62:
Section 62. Section 63G-2-202 is amended to read:63G-2-202Effective upon governor's approval. Access to private, controlled, and protected documents.(1)Except as provided in Subsection (11)(a), a governmental entity:(a)shall, upon request,  disclose a private record to:(i)the subject of the record;(ii)the parent or legal guardian of an unemancipated minor who is the subject of the record;(iii)the legal guardian of a legally incapacitated individual who is the subject of the record;(iv)any other individual who:(A)has a power of attorney from the subject of the record;(B)submits a notarized release from the subject of the record or the individual's legal representative dated no more than 90 days before the date the request is made; or(C)if the record is a medical record described in Subsection 63G-2-302(1)(b), is a health care provider, as defined in Section 26B-8-501, if releasing the record or information in the record is consistent with normal professional practice and medical ethics; or(v)any person to whom the record must be provided pursuant to:(A)court order as provided in Subsection (7); or(B)a legislative subpoena as provided in Title 36, Chapter 14, Legislative Subpoena Powers; and(b)may disclose a private record described in Subsections 63G-2-302(1)(j) through (n), without complying with Section 63G-2-206, to another governmental entity for a purpose related to administering:(i)the voter registration list; or(ii)the administration of an election.(2)(a)Upon request, a governmental entity shall disclose a controlled record to:(i)a physician, physician assistant, psychologist, certified social worker, insurance provider or producer, or a government public health agency upon submission of:(A)a release from the subject of the record that is dated no more than 90 days prior to the date the request is made; and(B)a signed acknowledgment of the terms of disclosure of controlled information as provided by Subsection (2)(b); and(ii)any person to whom the record must be disclosed pursuant to:(A)a court order as provided in Subsection (7); or(B)a legislative subpoena as provided in Title 36, Chapter 14, Legislative Subpoena Powers.(b)A person who receives a record from a governmental entity in accordance with Subsection (2)(a)(i) may not disclose controlled information from that record to any person, including the subject of the record.(3)If there is more than one subject of a private or controlled record, the portion of the record that pertains to another subject shall be segregated from the portion that the requester is entitled to inspect.(4)Upon request, and except as provided in Subsection (11)(b), a governmental entity shall disclose a protected record to:(a)the person that submitted the record;(b)any other individual who:(i)has a power of attorney from all persons, governmental entities, or political subdivisions whose interests were sought to be protected by the protected classification; or(ii)submits a notarized release from all persons, governmental entities, or political subdivisions whose interests were sought to be protected by the protected classification or from their legal representatives dated no more than 90 days prior to the date the request is made;(c)any person to whom the record must be provided pursuant to:(i)a court order as provided in Subsection (7); or(ii)a legislative subpoena as provided in Title 36, Chapter 14, Legislative Subpoena Powers; or(d)the owner of a mobile home park, subject to the conditions of Subsection 41-1a-116(5).(5)Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), a  governmental entity may disclose a private, controlled, or protected record to another governmental entity, political subdivision, state, the United States, or a foreign government only as provided by Section 63G-2-206.(6)Before releasing a private, controlled, or protected record, the governmental entity shall obtain evidence of the requester's identity.(7)A governmental entity shall disclose a record pursuant to the terms of a court order signed by a judge from a court of competent jurisdiction, provided that:(a)the record deals with a matter in controversy over which the court has jurisdiction;(b)the court has considered the merits of the request for access to the record;(c)the court has considered and, where appropriate, limited the requester's use and further disclosure of the record in order to protect:(i)privacy interests in the case of private or controlled records;(ii)business confidentiality interests in the case of records protected under Subsection 63G-2-305(1), (2), (40)(a)(ii), or (40)(a)(vi); and(iii)privacy interests or the public interest in the case of other protected records;(d)to the extent the record is properly classified private, controlled, or protected, the interests favoring access, considering limitations thereon, are greater than or equal to the interests favoring restriction of access; and(e)where access is restricted by a rule, statute, or regulation referred to in Subsection 63G-2-201(3)(b), the court has authority independent of this chapter to order disclosure.(8)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (8)(d), a governmental entity may disclose or authorize disclosure of private or controlled records for research purposes if the governmental entity:(i)determines that the research purpose cannot reasonably be accomplished without use or disclosure of the information to the researcher in individually identifiable form;(ii)determines that:(A)the proposed research is bona fide; and(B)the value of the research is greater than or equal to the infringement upon personal privacy;(iii)(A)requires the researcher to assure the integrity, confidentiality, and security of the records; and(B)requires the removal or destruction of the individual identifiers associated with the records as soon as the purpose of the research project has been accomplished;(iv)prohibits the researcher from:(A)disclosing the record in individually identifiable form, except as provided in Subsection (8)(b); or(B)using the record for purposes other than the research approved by the governmental entity; and(v)secures from the researcher a written statement of the researcher's understanding of and agreement to the conditions of this Subsection (8) and the researcher's understanding that violation of the terms of this Subsection (8) may subject the researcher to criminal prosecution under Section 63G-2-801.(b)A researcher may disclose a record in individually identifiable form if the record is disclosed for the purpose of auditing or evaluating the research program and no subsequent use or disclosure of the record in individually identifiable form will be made by the auditor or evaluator except as provided by this section.(c)A governmental entity may require indemnification as a condition of permitting research under this Subsection (8).(d)A governmental entity may not disclose or authorize disclosure of a private record for research purposes as described in this Subsection (8) if the private record is a record described in Subsection 63G-2-302(1)(x).(9)(a)Under Subsections 63G-2-201(5)(b) and 63G-2-401(6), a governmental entity may disclose to persons other than those specified in this section records that are:(i)private under Section 63G-2-302; or(ii)protected under Section 63G-2-305, subject to Section 63G-2-309 if a claim for business confidentiality has been made under Section 63G-2-309.(b)Under Subsection 63G-2-403(11)(b), the State Records Committee may require the disclosure to persons other than those specified in this section of records that are:(i)private under Section 63G-2-302;(ii)controlled under Section 63G-2-304; or(iii)protected under Section 63G-2-305, subject to Section 63G-2-309 if a claim for business confidentiality has been made under Section 63G-2-309.(c)Under Subsection 63G-2-404(7), the court may require the disclosure of records that are private under Section 63G-2-302, controlled under Section 63G-2-304, or protected under Section 63G-2-305 to persons other than those specified in this section.(10)(a)A private record described in Subsection 63G-2-302(2)(f) may only be disclosed as provided in Subsection (1)(a)(v).(b)A protected record described in Subsection 63G-2-305(43) may only be disclosed as provided in Subsection (4)(c) or Section 26B-6-212.(11)(a)A private, protected, or controlled record described in Section 26B-1-506 shall be disclosed as required under:(i)Subsections 26B-1-506(1)(b)and (2); and(ii)Subsections 26B-1-507(1) and (6).(b)A record disclosed under Subsection (11)(a) shall retain its character as private, protected, or controlled.

Section 63:
Section 63. Section 63G-2-210 is amended to read:63G-2-210Effective upon governor's approval. Access to and use of voter or election information by a government officer.(1)As used in this section, "government officer" means:(a)an elected official; or(b)an officer, employee, volunteer, or agent of a governmental entity.(2)A government officer may not:(a)disclose, or attempt to discover, any information from a ballot cast by an identifiable voter;(b)except as provided in Subsection (3), disclose in relation to an identifiable voter:(i)the method by which the voter voted or returned a ballot;(ii)when or where the voter voted;(iii)how or when the voter's ballot was received;(iv)whether a ballot was mailed to the voter;(v)whether the voter placed postage on a return envelope; or(vi)any information from the return envelope of a voter.(3)Subsection (2) does not prohibit the disclosure, in mass, of the information included in a voting history record, in accordance with Section 20A-5-410disclosed in accordance with Title 20A, Chapter 2, Part 6, Provision and Protection of Voter Data.(4)Except as provided in Subsection (5), a government officer who, due to the government officer's position as a government officer, has access to election records, may not access, use, copy, or release the information except to the extent that the access, use, copying, or release:(a)is reasonably related to a duty of the government officer;(b)is in accordance with the requirements of law; and(c)is not done for a primarily personal purpose, including:(i)a political purpose;(ii)furthering the government officer's personal agenda; or(iii)a purpose relating to the government officer's private business, hobbies, or personal interests.(5)Subsection (4) does not prevent a government officer from accessing, using, copying, or releasing government information in the same manner available to a member of the general public, including by filing a record request under Section 20A-2-603, 20A-2-604, or 63G-2-204.

Section 64:
Section 64. Section 63G-2-301 is amended to read:63G-2-301Effective 04/06/26. Public records.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Business address" means a single address of a governmental agency designated for the public to contact an employee or officer of the governmental agency.(b)"Business email address" means a single email address of a governmental agency designated for the public to contact an employee or officer of the governmental agency.(c)"Business telephone number" means a single telephone number of a governmental agency designated for the public to contact an employee or officer of the governmental agency.(d)"Correctional facility" means the same as that term is defined in Section 77-16b-102.(2)The following records are public except to the extent they contain information expressly permitted to be treated confidentially under the provisions of Subsections 63G-2-201(3)(b) and (6)(a):(a)laws;(b)the name, gender, gross compensation, job title, job description, business address, business email address, business telephone number, number of hours worked per pay period, dates of employment, and relevant education, previous employment, and similar job qualifications of a current or former employee or officer of the governmental entity, excluding:(i)undercover law enforcement personnel; and(ii)investigative personnel if disclosure could reasonably be expected to impair the effectiveness of investigations or endanger any individual's safety;(c)final opinions, including concurring and dissenting opinions, and orders that are made by a governmental entity in an administrative, adjudicative, or judicial proceeding except that if the proceedings were properly closed to the public, the opinion and order may be withheld to the extent that they contain information that is private, controlled, or protected;(d)final interpretations of statutes or rules by a governmental entity unless classified as protected as provided in Subsection 63G-2-305(17) or (18);(e)information contained in or compiled from a transcript, minutes, or report of the open portions of a meeting of a governmental entity as provided by Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act, including the records of all votes of each member of the governmental entity;(f)judicial records unless a court orders the records to be restricted under the rules of civil or criminal procedure or unless the records are private under this chapter;(g)unless otherwise classified as private under Section 63G-2-303, records or parts of records filed with or maintained by county recorders, clerks, treasurers, surveyors, zoning commissions, the Division of Forestry, Fire, and State Lands, the School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration, the Division of Oil, Gas, and Mining, the Division of Water Rights, or other governmental entities that give public notice of:(i)titles or encumbrances to real property;(ii)restrictions on the use of real property;(iii)the capacity of persons to take or convey title to real property; or(iv)tax status for real and personal property;(h)records of the Department of Commerce that evidence incorporations, mergers, name changes, and uniform commercial code filings;(i)data on individuals that would otherwise be private under this chapter if the individual who is the subject of the record has given the governmental entity written permission to make the records available to the public;(j)documentation of the compensation that a governmental entity pays to a contractor or private provider;(k)summary data;(l)voter registration records, including an individual's voting history, except for a voter registration record or those parts of a voter registration record that are classified as private under Subsections 63G-2-302(1)(j) through (n) or withheld under Subsection 20A-2-104(7);(l)subject to Title 20A, Chapter 2, Part 6, Provision and Protection of Voter Data, standard voter data, as defined in Section 20A-2-601, in the voter registration record of a public registered voter, as defined in Section 20A-2-601;(m)for an elected official, as defined in Section 11-47-102, a telephone number, if available, and email address, if available, where that elected official may be reached as required in Title 11, Chapter 47, Access to Elected Officials;(n)for a school community council member, a telephone number, if available, and email address, if available, where that elected official may be reached directly as required in Section 53G-7-1203;(o)annual audited financial statements of the Utah Educational Savings Plan described in Section 53H-10-210; and(p)an initiative packet, as defined in Section 20A-7-101, and a referendum packet, as defined in Section 20A-7-101, after the packet is submitted to a county clerk.(3)The following records are normally public, but to the extent that a record is expressly exempt from disclosure, access may be restricted under Subsection 63G-2-201(3)(b), Section 63G-2-302, 63G-2-304, or 63G-2-305:(a)administrative staff manuals, instructions to staff, and statements of policy;(b)records documenting a contractor's or private provider's compliance with the terms of a contract with a governmental entity;(c)records documenting the services provided by a contractor or a private provider to the extent the records would be public if prepared by the governmental entity;(d)contracts entered into by a governmental entity;(e)any account, voucher, or contract that deals with the receipt or expenditure of funds by a governmental entity;(f)records relating to government assistance or incentives publicly disclosed, contracted for, or given by a governmental entity, encouraging a person to expand or relocate a business in Utah, except as provided in Subsection 63G-2-305(35);(g)chronological logs and initial contact reports;(h)correspondence by and with a governmental entity in which the governmental entity determines or states an opinion upon the rights of the state, a political subdivision, the public, or any person;(i)empirical data contained in drafts if:(i)the empirical data is not reasonably available to the requester elsewhere in similar form; and(ii)the governmental entity is given a reasonable opportunity to correct any errors or make nonsubstantive changes before release;(j)drafts that are circulated to anyone other than:(i)a governmental entity;(ii)a political subdivision;(iii)a federal agency if the governmental entity and the federal agency are jointly responsible for implementation of a program or project that has been legislatively approved;(iv)a government-managed corporation; or(v)a contractor or private provider;(k)drafts that have never been finalized but were relied upon by the governmental entity in carrying out action or policy;(l)original data in a computer program if the governmental entity chooses not to disclose the program;(m)arrest warrants after issuance, except that, for good cause, a court may order restricted access to arrest warrants prior to service;(n)search warrants after execution and filing of the return, except that a court, for good cause, may order restricted access to search warrants prior to trial;(o)records that would disclose information relating to formal charges or disciplinary actions against a past or present governmental entity employee if:(i)the disciplinary action has been completed and all time periods for administrative appeal have expired; and(ii)the charges on which the disciplinary action was based were sustained;(p)records maintained by the Division of Forestry, Fire, and State Lands, the School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration, or the Division of Oil, Gas, and Mining that evidence mineral production on government lands;(q)final audit reports;(r)occupational and professional licenses;(s)business licenses;(t)a notice of violation, a notice of agency action under Section 63G-4-201, or similar records used to initiate proceedings for discipline or sanctions against persons regulated by a governmental entity, but not including records that initiate employee discipline; and(u)(i)records that disclose a standard, regulation, policy, guideline, or rule regarding the operation of a correctional facility or the care and control of inmates committed to the custody of a correctional facility; and(ii)records that disclose the results of an audit or other inspection assessing a correctional facility's compliance with a standard, regulation, policy, guideline, or rule described in Subsection (3)(u)(i).(4)The list of public records in this section is not exhaustive and should not be used to limit access to records.

Section 65:
Section 65. Section 63G-2-302 is amended to read:63G-2-302Effective 04/06/26. Private records.(1)The following records are private:(a)records concerning an individual's eligibility for unemployment insurance benefits, social services, welfare benefits, or the determination of benefit levels;(b)records containing data on individuals describing medical history, diagnosis, condition, treatment, evaluation, or similar medical data;(c)records of publicly funded libraries that when examined alone or with other records identify a patron;(d)records received by or generated by or for:(i)the Independent Legislative Ethics Commission, except for:(A)the commission's summary data report that is required under legislative rule; and(B)any other document that is classified as public under legislative rule; or(ii)a Senate or House Ethics Committee in relation to the review of ethics complaints, unless the record is classified as public under legislative rule;(e)records received by, or generated by or for, the Independent Executive Branch Ethics Commission, except as otherwise expressly provided in Title 63A, Chapter 14, Review of Executive Branch Ethics Complaints;(f)records received or generated for a Senate confirmation committee concerning character, professional competence, or physical or mental health of an individual:(i)if, prior to the meeting, the chair of the committee determines release of the records:(A)reasonably could be expected to interfere with the investigation undertaken by the committee; or(B)would create a danger of depriving a person of a right to a fair proceeding or impartial hearing; and(ii)after the meeting, if the meeting was closed to the public;(g)employment records concerning a current or former employee of, or applicant for employment with, a governmental entity that would disclose that individual's home address, home telephone number, social security number, insurance coverage, marital status, or payroll deductions;(h)records or parts of records under Section 63G-2-303 that a current or former employee identifies as private according to the requirements of that section;(i)that part of a record indicating a person's social security number or federal employer identification number if provided under Section 31A-23a-104, 31A-25-202, 31A-26-202, 58-1-301, 58-55-302, 61-1-4, or 61-2f-203;(j)that part of a voter registration record identifying a voter's:(i)driver license or identification card number;(ii)social security number, or last four digits of the social security number;(iii)email address;(iv)dateday, month, or year of birth; or(v)phone number;(k)a voter registration record that is classified as a private record by the lieutenant governor or a county clerk under Subsection 20A-2-101.1(5)(a), 20A-2-104(4)(h), or 20A-2-204(4)(b);(l)a voter registration record that is withheld under Subsection 20A-2-104(7)of an at-risk voter, as defined in Section 20A-2-601;(m)the following forms and supporting verification:(i)a withholding request form used, before April 6, 2026, to request that a voter's voter registration be withheld as a private record, and any verification submitted in support of the form;(ii)an at-risk voter designation request form described in Subsections 20A-2-104(7) and (8)Section 20A-2-606 and any verification submitted in support of the form;(iii)a notice described in Section 20A-2-602; and(iv)a form relating to a request described in Section 20A-2-603, 20A-2-604, 20A-2-605, or 20A-2-607;(n)a record or information regarding whether a voter returned a ballot with postage attached;(o)a record that:(i)contains information about an individual;(ii)is voluntarily provided by the individual; and(iii)goes into an electronic database that:(A)is designated by and administered under the authority of the Chief Information Officerchief information officer; and(B)acts as a repository of information about the individual that can be electronically retrieved and used to facilitate the individual's online interaction with a state agency;(p)information provided to the Commissioner of Insurancecommissioner of insurance under:(i)Subsection 31A-23a-115(3)(a);(ii)Subsection 31A-23a-302(4); or(iii)Subsection 31A-26-210(4);(q)information obtained through a criminal background check under Title 11, Chapter 40, Criminal Background Checks by Political Subdivisions Operating Water Systems;(r)information provided by an offender that is:(i)required by the registration requirements of Title 53, Chapter 29, Sex, Kidnap, and Child Abuse Offender Registry; and(ii)not required to be made available to the public under Subsection 53-29-404(3)(a);(s)a statement and any supporting documentation filed with the attorney general in accordance with Section 34-45-107, if the federal law or action supporting the filing involves homeland security;(t)electronic toll collection customer account information received or collected under Section 72-6-118 and customer information described in Section 17B-2a-815 received or collected by a public transit district, including contact and payment information and customer travel data;(u)an email address provided by a military or overseas voter under Section 20A-16-501;(v)a completed military-overseas ballot that is electronically transmitted under Title 20A, Chapter 16, Uniform Military and Overseas Voters Act;(w)records received by or generated by or for the Political Subdivisions Ethics Review Commission established in Section 63A-15-201, except for:(i)the commission's summary data report that is required in Section 63A-15-202; and(ii)any other document that is classified as public in accordance with Title 63A, Chapter 15, Political Subdivisions Ethics Review Commission;(x)a record described in Section 53G-9-604 that verifies that a parent was notified of an incident or threat;(y)a criminal background check or credit history report conducted in accordance with Section 63A-3-201;(z)a record described in Subsection 53-5a-104(7);(aa)on a record maintained by a county for the purpose of administering property taxes, an individual's:(i)email address;(ii)phone number; or(iii)personal financial information related to a person's payment method;(bb)a record submitted by a taxpayer to establish the taxpayer's eligibility for an exemption, deferral, abatement, or relief under:(i)Title 59, Chapter 2, Part 11, Exemptions; or(ii)Title 59, Chapter 2a, Tax Relief Through Property Tax;(cc)a record provided by the State Tax Commission in response to a request under Subsection 59-1-403(4)(y)(iii);(dd)a record of the Child Welfare Legislative Oversight Panel regarding an individual child welfare case, as described in Subsection 36-33-103(3);(ee)a record relating to drug or alcohol testing of a state employee under Section 63A-17-1004;(ff)a record relating to a request by a state elected official or state employee who has been threatened to the Division of Technology Services to remove personal identifying information from the open web under Section 63A-16-109;(gg)a record including confidential information as that term is defined in Section 67-27-106; and(hh)a record or notice received or generated under Title 53, Chapter 30, Security Improvements Act, relating to:(i)an application for certification described in Section 53-30-201; or(ii)a security improvement, including a building permit application or building permit for a security improvement described in Section 53-30-301.(2)The following records are private if properly classified by a governmental entity:(a)records concerning a current or former employee of, or applicant for employment with a governmental entity, including performance evaluations and personal status information such as race, religion, or disabilities, but not including records that are public under Subsection 63G-2-301(2)(b) or 63G-2-301(3)(o) or private under Subsection (1)(b);(b)records describing an individual's finances, except that the following are public:(i)records described in Subsection 63G-2-301(2);(ii)information provided to the governmental entity for the purpose of complying with a financial assurance requirement; or(iii)records that must be disclosed in accordance with another statute;(c)records of independent state agencies if the disclosure of those records would conflict with the fiduciary obligations of the agency;(d)other records containing data on individuals the disclosure of which constitutes a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;(e)records provided by the United States or by a government entity outside the state that are given with the requirement that the records be managed as private records, if the providing entity states in writing that the record would not be subject to public disclosure if retained by it;(f)any portion of a record in the custody of the Division of Aging and Adult Services, created in Section 26B-6-102, that may disclose, or lead to the discovery of, the identity of a person who made a report of alleged abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult; and(g)audio and video recordings created by a body-worn camera, as defined in Section 77-7a-103, that record sound or images inside a home or residence except for recordings that:(i)depict the commission of an alleged crime;(ii)record any encounter between a law enforcement officer and a person that results in death or bodily injury, or includes an instance when an officer fires a weapon;(iii)record any encounter that is the subject of a complaint or a legal proceeding against a law enforcement officer or law enforcement agency;(iv)contain an officer-involved critical incident as defined in Subsection 76-2-408(1)(f); or(v)have been requested for reclassification as a public record by a subject or authorized agent of a subject featured in the recording.(3)(a)As used in this Subsection (3), "medical records" means medical reports, records, statements, history, diagnosis, condition, treatment, and evaluation.(b)Medical records in the possession of the University of Utah Hospital, its clinics, doctors, or affiliated entities are not private records or controlled records under Section 63G-2-304 when the records are sought:(i)in connection with any legal or administrative proceeding in which the patient's physical, mental, or emotional condition is an element of any claim or defense; or(ii)after a patient's death, in any legal or administrative proceeding in which any party relies upon the condition as an element of the claim or defense.(c)Medical records are subject to production in a legal or administrative proceeding according to state or federal statutes or rules of procedure and evidence as if the medical records were in the possession of a nongovernmental medical care provider.

Section 66:
Section 66. Section 63G-2-303 is amended to read:63G-2-303Effective 04/06/26. Private information concerning certain government employees.(1)As used in this section:(a)"At-risk government employee" means a current or former:(i)peace officer as specified in Section 53-13-102;(ii)state or federal judge of an appellate, district, justice, or juvenile court, or court commissioner;(iii)judge authorized by Title 39A, Chapter 5, Utah Code of Military Justice;(iv)judge authorized by Armed Forces, Title 10, United States Code;(v)federal prosecutor;(vi)prosecutor appointed pursuant to Armed Forces, Title 10, United States Code;(vii)law enforcement official as defined in Section 53-5a-311;(viii)prosecutor authorized by Title 39A, Chapter 5, Utah Code of Military Justice; or(ix)state or local government employee who, because of the unique nature of the employee's regular work assignments or because of one or more recent credible threats directed to or against the employee, would be at immediate and substantial risk of physical harm if the employee's personal information is disclosed.(b)"Family member" means the spouse, child, sibling, parent, or grandparent of an at-risk government employee who is living with the employee.(c)"Personal information" means the employee's or the employee's family member's home address, home telephone number, personal mobile telephone number, personal pager number, personal email address, social security number, insurance coverage, marital status, or payroll deductions.(2)(a)Pursuant to Subsection 63G-2-302(1)(h), an at-risk government employee may file a written application that:(i)gives notice of the employee's status as an at-risk government employee to each agency of a government entity holding a record or a part of a record that would disclose the employee's personal information; and(ii)requests that the government agency classify those records or parts of records as private.(b)An at-risk government employee desiring to file an application under this section may request assistance from the government agency to identify the individual records containing personal information.(c)Each government agency shall develop a form that:(i)requires the at-risk government employee to designate each specific record or part of a record containing the employee's personal information that the applicant desires to be classified as private;(ii)affirmatively requests that the government entity holding those records classify them as private;(iii)informs the employee that by submitting a completed form the employee may not receive official announcements affecting the employee's property, including notices about proposed municipal annexations, incorporations, or zoning modifications; and(iv)contains a place for the signature required under Subsection (2)(d).(d)A form submitted by an employee under Subsection (2)(c) shall be signed by the highest ranking elected or appointed official in the employee's chain of command certifying that the employee submitting the form is an at-risk government employee.(3)A county recorder, county treasurer, county auditor, or a county tax assessor may fully satisfy the requirements of this section by:(a)providing a method for the assessment roll and index and the tax roll and index that will block public access to the home address, home telephone number, situs address, and Social Security number; and(b)providing the at-risk government employee requesting the classification with a disclaimer informing the employee that the employee may not receive official announcements affecting the employee's property, including notices about proposed annexations, incorporations, or zoning modifications.(4)A government agency holding records of an at-risk government employee classified as private under this section may release the record or part of the record if:(a)the employee or former employee gives written consent;(b)a court orders release of the records; or (c)the government agency receives a certified death certificate for the employee or former employee; or.(d)as it relates to the employee's voter registration record:(i)the person to whom the record or part of the record is released is a qualified person under Subsection 20A-2-104(4)(n); and(ii)the government agency's release of the record or part of the record complies with the requirements of Subsection 20A-2-104(4)(o).(5)(a)If the government agency holding the private record receives a subpoena for the records, the government agency shall attempt to notify the at-risk government employee or former employee by mailing a copy of the subpoena to the employee's last-known mailing address together with a request that the employee either:(i)authorize release of the record; or(ii)within 10 days of the date that the copy and request are mailed, deliver to the government agency holding the private record a copy of a motion to quash filed with the court who issued the subpoena.(b)The government agency shall comply with the subpoena if the government agency has:(i)received permission from the at-risk government employee or former employee to comply with the subpoena;(ii)not received a copy of a motion to quash within 10 days of the date that the copy of the subpoena was mailed; or(iii)received a court order requiring release of the records.(6)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (6)(b), a form submitted under this section remains in effect until the earlier of:(i)four years after the date the employee signs the form, whether or not the employee's employment terminates before the end of the four-year period; and(ii)one year after the government agency receives official notice of the death of the employee.(b)A form submitted under this section may be rescinded at any time by:(i)the at-risk government employee who submitted the form; or(ii)if the at-risk government employee is deceased, a member of the employee's immediate family.

Section 67:
Section 67. Section 73-10d-4 is amended to read:73-10d-4Effective 05/25/26. Notice of intention to enter privatization project -- Petition for election -- Certification of petition signatures -- Removal of signature -- Election procedures -- Powers of political subdivision -- Public bidding laws not to apply.(1)(a)The governing authority of any political subdivision considering entering into a privatization project agreement shall issue a notice of intention setting forth a brief summary of the agreement provisions and the time within which and place at which petitions may be filed requesting the calling of an election in the political subdivision to determine whether the agreement should be approved.  (b)The notice of intention shall specify the form of the petitions.  (c)If, within 30 days after the publication of the notice of intention, petitions are filed with the clerk, recorder, or similar officer of the political subdivision, signed by at least 5% of the registered voters of the political subdivision (as certified by the county clerks of the respective counties within which the political subdivision is located pursuant to Subsections (7) and (8)) requesting an election be held to authorize the agreement, then the governing authority shall proceed to call and hold an election.  (d)If an adequate petition is not filed within 30 days, the governing authority may adopt a resolution so finding and may proceed to enter into the agreement.(e)The first page of a petition described in this Subsection (1) shall include the following statement in at least the same size type as the majority of the other statements on the page:"WARNING TO SIGNERS WITH PRIVATE VOTER REGISTRATION RECORDSIf you sign this petition, your voter identification number and the date you signed may be publicly disclosed. This disclosure may occur even if you are an at-risk voter with a voter registration record that has been classified as a private record."(2)If, under Subsection (1), the governing authority of a political subdivision is required to call an election to authorize an agreement, the governing authority shall adopt a resolution directing that an election be held in the political subdivision for the purpose of determining whether the political subdivision may enter into the agreement.  The resolution calling the election shall be adopted, notice of the election shall be given, voting precincts shall be established, the election shall be held, voters' qualifications shall be determined, and the results shall be canvassed in the manner and subject to the conditions provided for in Title 11, Chapter 14, Local Government Bonding Act.(3)A political subdivision may, upon approval of an agreement as provided by Subsections (1) and (2) and subject to the powers and rules of the supervising agency:(a)supervise and regulate the construction, maintenance, ownership, and operation of all privatization projects within its jurisdiction or in which it has a contractual interest;(b)contract, by entry into agreements with private owner/operators for the provision within its jurisdiction of the services of privatization projects;(c)levy and collect taxes, as otherwise provided by law, and impose and collect assessments, fees, or charges for services provided by privatization projects, as appropriate, and, subject to any limitation imposed by the constitution, pledge, assign, or otherwise convey as security for the payment of its obligations under any agreements any revenues and receipts derived from  any assessments, fees, or charges for services provided by privatization projects;(d)require the private owner/operator to obtain any and all licenses as appropriate under federal, state, and local law and impose other requirements which are necessary or desirable to discharge  the responsibility of the political subdivision to supervise and regulate the construction, maintenance, ownership, and operation of any privatization project;(e)control the right to contract, maintain, own, and operate any privatization project and the services provided in connection with that project within its jurisdiction;(f)purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire all or any part of a privatization project;(g)with respect to the services of any privatization project, control the right to establish or regulate the rates paid by the users of the services within the jurisdiction of the political subdivision;(h)agree that the sole and exclusive right to provide the services within its jurisdiction related to privatization projects be assumed by any private owner/operator;(i)contract for the lease or purchase of land, facilities, equipment, and vehicles for the operation of privatization projects;(j)lease, sell, or otherwise convey, as permitted by state and local law, but without any requirement of competitive public bidding, land, facilities, equipment, and vehicles, previously used in connection with privatization projects, to private owner/operators; and(k)establish policies for the operation of any privatization project within its jurisdiction or with respect to which it has a contractual interest, including hours of operation, the character and kinds of services, and other rules necessary for the safety of operating personnel.(4)Any political subdivision may enter into agreements with respect to privatization projects.  Agreements may contain provisions relating to, without limitation, any matter provided for in this section or consistent with the purposes of this chapter.(5)Any agreement entered into between a political subdivision and a private owner/operator for the provision of the services of a privatization project is considered an exercise of that political subdivision's business or proprietary power binding upon its succeeding governing authorities.  Any agreement made by a political subdivision with a private owner/operator for payment for services provided or to be provided may not be construed to be an indebtedness or a lending of credit of the political subdivision within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory restriction.(6)The provisions of the various laws of the state and the rules or ordinances of a political subdivision which would otherwise require public bidding in respect to any matter provided for in this chapter shall have no application to that matter.(7)If a petition is presented to the clerk of a political subdivision under Subsection (1):(a)as applicable, within three business days after the day on which the clerk receives the petition, the clerk shall provide the petition to the county clerk for the county in which the political subdivision is located; and(b)within 14 days after the day on which a county clerk receives a petition under this section, the county clerk shall:(i)use the procedures described in Section 20A-1-1002 to determine whether the petition satisfies the requirements of Subsection (1) for a registered voter petition;(ii)certify on the petition whether each name is that of a registered voter in the affected political subdivision; and(iii)as applicable, deliver the certified petition to the governing authority of the affected political subdivision.(8)(a)A voter who signs a petition under Subsection (1) may have the voter's signature removed from the petition by, no later than three business days after the day on which the petition is provided to the county clerk, submitting to the county clerk a statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed. (b)A statement described in Subsection (8)(a) shall comply with the requirements described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(2).(c)The county clerk shall use the procedures described in Subsection 20A-1-1003(3) to determine whether to remove an individual's signature from a petition after receiving a timely, valid statement requesting removal of the signature.

Section 68:
Section 68.  Effective Date.(1)Except as provided in Subsections (2)-(4), this bill takes effect May 25, 2026.(2)(a)The actions affecting sections described in Subsection (2)(b) take effect:(i)except as provided in Subsection (2)(a)(ii), May 6, 2026; or(ii)if approved by two-thirds of all members elected to each house:(A)upon approval by the governor;(B)without the governor's signature, the day following the constitutional time limit of Utah Constitution, Article VII, Section 8; or(C)in the case of a veto, the date of veto override.(b)Subsection (2)(a) applies to the actions affecting the following sections:(i)Section 20A-1-102(Effective upon governor's approval);(ii)Section 20A-2-504(Effective upon governor's approval);(iii)Section 20A-2-601(Effective upon governor's approval);(iv)Section 20A-2-602(Effective upon governor's approval);(v)Section 20A-2-607(Effective upon governor's approval);(vi)Section 20A-7-103(Effective upon governor's approval)(Superseded 01/01/27Contingently );(vii)Section 20A-7-702(Effective upon governor's approval);(viii)Section 20A-7-703.1(Effective upon governor's approval);(ix)Section 63G-2-202(Effective upon governor's approval); and(x)Section 63G-2-210(Effective upon governor's approval).(3)(a)The actions affecting sections described in Subsection (3)(b) take effect:(i)except as provided in Subsection (3)(a)(ii), May 6, 2026; or(ii)if approved by two-thirds of all members elected to each house, the later of April 6, 2026; or:(A)upon approval by the governor;(B)without the governor's approval, the day following the constitutional time limit of Utah Constitution, Article VII, Section 8; or(C)with the governor's veto and a vote of the Legislature to override the veto, the date of veto override.(b)Subsection (3)(a) applies to the actions affecting the following sections:(i)Section 20A-2-101.1(Effective 04/06/26);(ii)Section 20A-2-104(Effective 04/06/26);(iii)Section 20A-2-108(Effective 04/06/26);(iv)Section 20A-2-204(Effective 04/06/26);(v)Section 20A-2-206(Effective 04/06/26);(vi)Section 20A-2-304(Effective 04/06/26);(vii)Section 20A-2-505(Effective 04/06/26);(viii)Section 20A-2-603(Effective 04/06/26);(ix)Section 20A-2-604(Effective 04/06/26);(x)Section 20A-2-605(Effective 04/06/26);(xi)Section 20A-2-606(Effective 04/06/26);(xii)Section 20A-5-410(Effective 04/06/26);(xiii)Section 20A-3a-401(Effective 04/06/26);(xiv)Section 20A-6-105(Effective 04/06/26);(xv)Section 53H-3-1304(Effective 04/06/26);(xvi)Section 63G-2-301(Effective 04/06/26);(xvii)Section 63G-2-302(Effective 04/06/26); and(xviii)Section 63G-2-303(Effective 04/06/26).(4)The actions affecting Section 20A-7-103 (Effective 01/01/27Contingently ) take effect on January 1, 2027.

Section 69:
Section 69.  Coordinating S.B. 153 with H.B. 209.If S.B. 153, Election Amendments, and H.B. 209, Voting Amendments, both pass and become law, the Legislature intends that:(1) Subsections 20A-2-204(3)(c) and (4), in S.B. 153 and H.B. 209, be amended to read:"(c) on or before the first business day that is at least five calendar days after the day on which the division receives a voter registration form, electronically transmit the form to the Office of the Lieutenant Governorlieutenant governor, including the following for the individual named on the form:(i) the name, date of birth, driver license or state identification card number, last four digits of the social security number, Utah residential address, place of birth, and signature;(ii) a mailing address, if different from the individual's Utah residential address;(iii) an email address and phone number, if available;(iv) the desired political affiliation, if indicated;(v) an indication of whether the individual requested that the individual's voter registration record be classified as a private record under Subsection 20A-2-108(2)(b); and(vi)(v) a withholdingan at-risk designation request form described in Subsections 20A-2-104(7) and (8)Section 20A-2-606 and any verification submitted with the form.; and(vi) an indication regarding whether the individual provided proof of United States citizenship.(4) Upon receipt of an individual's voter registration form from the Driver License Division under Subsection (3), the lieutenant governor or county clerk shall:(a) enter the information into the statewide voter registration database; and(b) make a record of the indication described in Subsection (3)(c)(vi); and(b)(c) if the individual requests on the individual's voter registration form that the individual's voter registration record be classified as a private record or the individual submits a withholding request form described in Subsections 20A-2-104(7) and (8)submits an at-risk designation request form described in Section 20A-2-606 and any required verification, classify the individual's voter registration record as a private record.";(2) Subsections 63G-2-302(1)(j) through (m), in S.B. 153 and H.B. 209, be amended to read:"(j) that part of a voter registration record:(i) identifying a voter's:(i)(A) driver license or identification card number;(ii)(B) social security number, or last four digits of the social security number;(iii)(C) email address;(iv)(D) dateday, month, or year of birth; or(v)(E) phone number;(ii) submitted by the voter as proof of United States citizenship;(iii) indicating whether the voter has provided proof of United States citizenship; or(iv) indicating whether the voter is restricted to voting a federal ballot;(k) a voter registration record that is classified as a private record by the lieutenant governor or a county clerk under Subsection 20A-2-101.1(5)(a), 20A-2-104(4)(h), or 20A-2-204(4)(b) or 20A-2-204(4)(c);(l) (i) a voter registration record that is withheld under Subsection 20A-2-104(7); of an at-risk voter, as defined in Section 20A-2-601; or(ii) before January 1, 2027, a voter registration record of a voter who is limited to voting a federal ballot only;(m) the following forms and supporting verification:(i) a withholding request form used, before April 6, 2026, to request that a voter's voter registration be withheld as a private record, and any verification submitted in support of the form;(ii) an at-risk voter designation request form described in Subsections 20A-2-104(7) and (8)Section 20A-2-606 and any verification submitted in support of the form;(iii) a notice described in Section 20A-2-602; and(iv) a form relating to a request described in Section 20A-2-603, 20A-2-604, 20A-2-605, or 20A-2-607;";(3) Subsection 20A-2-104(2)(d) in H.B. 209 not be enacted as Subsection 20A-2-104(2)(d) and, instead, be enacted as Subsection 20A-2-104(1)(c) in S.B. 153;(4) Subsection 20A-2-104(7) in H.B. 209 not be enacted as 20A-2-104(7) and, instead, be enacted as Subsection 20A-2-104(4) in S.B. 153; and(5) Subsections (1) through (4) of this coordination clause take effect on:(a) except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), May 6, 2026; or(b) April 6, 2026, if S.B. 153 and H.B. 209 are both approved by two-thirds of all members elected to each house.

Section 70:
Section 70.  Coordinating S.B. 153 with H.B. 361.If S.B. 153, Election Amendments, and H.B. 361, Election Provisions Amendments, both pass and become law, the Legislature intends that, on May 6, 2026, Subsections 20A-2-504(4) through (7), in S.B. 153 and H.B. 361, be amended to read:"(3)(4) The county clerk shall remove a voter's name from the official register within five business days after the day on which the county clerk:(a) receives, from the lieutenant governor, the information described in Subsection (3) or 26B-8-114(11) in relation to the voter; or(b) receives confirmation from the Office of Vital Records that the voter is deceased. from:(i) the Office of Vital Records and Statistics or the lieutenant governor;(ii) the United States Social Security Administration data; or(iii) another reliable source or document that clearly identifies that the voter is deceased.(5) (a) Except as provided in Subsection (5)(b), the county clerk may not remove the name of a voter from the official register during the 90 calendar days before a regular primary election or the 90 calendar days before a regular general election.(b) The county clerk may remove the name of a voter from the official register during the 90 calendar days before a regular primary election or the 90 calendar days before a regular general election if:(i) the voter requests, in writing, that the voter's name be removed; or(ii) the voter dies.(4)(6) No later than 90 calendar days before each primary election day and general election day,:(a) the county clerk shall update the official register by reviewing the official register and taking the actions permitted or required by law under this section, Section 20A-2-503, and Section 20A-2-505.; and(b) the lieutenant governor shall compare the records that the lieutenant governor receives under Subsections (3) and 26B-8-114(11) to the official register to ensure that each county clerk complies with Subsection (4).(7) Ninety calendar days before each primary and general election the lieutenant governor shall compare the information the lieutenant governor has received from the Office of Vital Records and Statistics, the United States Social Security Administration data, and other reliable sources with the official register of voters to ensure that all deceased voters have been removed from the official register.".